
The tentacle and flash of ice blue color light shadow contact, it looks like a dark red whip, what is more fearful, is also containing Can's silver brilliance, the ray twinkle, must icing the blue light blade edge pulls out.

----------------------------------------------

In the evening also has, remembers to come to see!( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-605-part-3





Volume 13

#605 - The Holy Ghost Extinguishes


The Purple gold color glare has glittered together suddenly, in Zongli Wu whole body big change of hysteria call, the look becomes in the next flash dim, gradually vanished the brilliance.

What regardless of comes is, is impossible to change Huo Yuhao to strike to kill his determination, is Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master he, must die. This possibly does not have any other.

Holy Spirit Cult, starting from this moment, finally from Continent thorough cancelled, this does not know that has cruelly harmed Evil Soul Master clan/sect of many lives, forever withers away!

“Humanity. Affronts the main body dignity, must pay the price.”The sound of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler powerful resounds, the diameter surpasses the hundred zhang (333m) the dark red glare to drop from the clouds together suddenly, covers Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong completely.

Back then, Huo Yuhao had withstood an attack of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, that time, he was relying on Spiritual Immunity, barely escaped. Fled Evil Spirit Forest.

But this time, he is not initially that talent just becomes Soul Saint Huo Yuhao.

In the dark red ray that drops from the clouds, Huo Yuhao vision brilliant, huge vertical eye shines suddenly, glitters the golden-rose color brilliance to glisten together instantaneously.

Martial Soul avatar, Eye of Asura!

Compared with the dark red ray that drops from the clouds, the golden-rose color ray that Huo Yuhao sends out obviously many that others are smaller and weaker . But when, two pupil light from the sky collide instant.

In the sky, the Wu Yun (black clouds) fierce change, that huge dark red light beam was blocked unexpectedly. Moreover, its color also has the transformation, unexpectedly many light ice blue color, moreover is spreading toward its source.

Eye of Asura and Soul Assault! Huo Yuhao Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus mixes Soul Power in dripping Absolute that this moment displays.

“Well?”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler surprised snort|hum, the dark red ray has collected suddenly inward. Originally the diameter of hundred zhang (333m) almost in ray dodges, collected, only then diameter about one zhang (3.33 m). The terrifying mind storm erupts in the midair.

The sky turned into the red instantaneously, looks like a piece of bloodshed is ordinary. The fierce mind fluctuation, making all Soul Beast in entire Evil Spirit Forest all crawl in the place. Does not dare to have moves slightly. They felt to come from the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler anger. But here, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is all control.

Tang Wutong arrives at side Huo Yuhao, saw the dignity of Huo Yuhao look, a time spells. The Huo Yuhao mouth and nose place seeps out the blood unexpectedly.

Is dares to challenge Di Tian worthily, and existence that can the whole body draw back!

When flash of both sides Spiritual Power collision, Huo Yuhao felt what is a constriction beyond description. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler unexpectedly fused formidable Spiritual Power and Space Power completely, what in Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power fuses is Absolute Ice, but in Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Spiritual Power has actually filled the space storm. The space thought of that terror, has nearly torn to pieces Huo Yuhao Spiritual Source.

“We come up.”Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, selects for promotion, changes into two light shadow, arrived in the upper air instantaneously.

He had pledged that does not strike to kill Soul Beast easily. In this Evil Spirit Forest is living massive Soul Beast. By them and Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler strength, if spells to fight in the ground, certainly will create loss of life. Therefore, he must place in the sky the battlefield.

In sky originally huge pressure under the terror mind storm wreaks havoc is nothing left. When Huo Yuhao is bringing Tang Wutong after that storms, finally saw has placed Continent Ten Great Ferocious Beasts second. Is next to the Beast God Di Tian terror exists.

The body of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler was too huge, that is over 300 meters in diameter giant eye pupil. Around the terrifying great eye body 9981 tentacles, each length over 500 meters, from the sky brandish.

Behind its huge body, completely is piece of dark red, that is its Soul Power sea, therefore had formerly that it, as soon as appears. Just like world end general feeling.

“Evil Tyrant hello, below Huo Yuhao, enters Evil Spirit Forest with my wife, is not to disturb your deep sleep. That Holy Spirit Cult made my humanity loss of life, must extinguish it kills. Also asked Evil Tyrant to forgive.”Huo Yuhao vision gentle said to Evil Eye Tyrant.

He does not plan and this Evil Eye Tyrant mutual hatred, after all, this is also on Continent the illustrious powerhouse, is controlling Evil Spirit Forest, and what is more. Even entire Sun-Moon Continent Soul Beast is headed by it.

The spirit system won initial success along with the development of time, in the future wants to promote, on need more powerhouse's support, if can convince Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, carries on the spirit dissemination in Sun-Moon Continent, regarding the relations between human and Soul Beast relaxes will have big impetus, therefore Huo Yuhao so will be polite.

The Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler giant eye pupil looks at Huo Yuhao, the low and deep sound is reverberating in the entire space, “humanity, you are very formidable. You in I have seen humanity, is only one can the frontage and my Spiritual Power contends. However, you killed had the humanity of cooperation agreement with me, this matter, cannot such consider as finished. You must pay the corresponding price to be good.”

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “Evil Tyrant, you, although is formidable, but actually do not think that our humanity is very small and weak. I do not hope and you to become an enemy, but, actually does not mean that we fear you. We will not accept your any condition, but does not hope with you for the enemy. If you must with our mutual hatred, that also as you like. You can try greatly, whether can profit on us.”

“Hey!”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler laughs suddenly. 81 tentacles from the sky are brandishing unceasingly, the sky turned into a piece of distortion, formidable Spiritual Power from the sky reverberates, the pressure of that blotting out the sky appears again.

Huo Yuhao also secretly admires to this Evil Tyrant, can own spiritual sea projection in outside the body, and creates so formidable mind fluctuation, he self-examines could not have achieved. Perhaps, in the future after achievement third Soul Nucleus, is a little this level the opportunity.

However, such that just like he said that he did not fear Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, self-confident, stemmed from the strength.

“Humanity, very long nobody has dared to speak with me like this. Very good, then, I must try today but actually, your this arrogant humanity has many abilities. So long as you can run away from main body hand today, this time matter, otherwise, you have stayed behind to my this Evil Spirit Forest make the manure.”

At the same time was saying, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler that 81 tentacles turned into the scarlet red instantaneously, from all directions pulls out toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong strikes, but.

Really valiant! Initially it dared to leave oneself territory to challenge Beast God Di Tian, this Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler temperament could be imagined. It is impossible unable to feel that Tang Wutong also has close Limit Douluo strength, even if is this, it has also chosen the fight.

Although Huo Yuhao pledged that does not kill Soul Beast on own initiative, but if is Soul Beast dares to attack itself, he will not show mercy. Moreover, in all Soul Ring of his present, but also lacks one, lacks Spirit Eyes ninth Soul Ring. Perhaps on this world, does not have anybody compared with Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler appropriately.

Huo Yuhao is Twin Martial Souls, if general Soul Master, even if has killed the powerhouse of Evil Tyrant this level, also impossible absorption Soul Ring that it has produced, because the energy of that implication was really too huge.

But Huo Yuhao is different! He cultivated for on close Limit Douluo level, had Dual Soul Nucleus, absorbed Evil Tyrant Soul Ring also really to have the possibility.

Pulls out the tentacle that strikes to come facing these, the Huo Yuhao surface sinks like the water, he does not have to display his domain ability directly. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler was too formidable.

Although this is first time fights with it directly, but Huo Yuhao has faced the experience of Beast God Di Tian. He is very clear, to Evil Tyrant and powerhouse of Beast God this level, they have stood in the world peak, truly is not general Limit Douluo can contend.

Control of Evil Tyrant to Space Power, absolutely not meeting in Beast God. Therefore, wants to defeat it, only then defeats the enemy by a surprise attack, and cannot with it to consuming. This cultivated had about 700,000 years powerhouses fully, can project including spiritual sea in outside the body, own Soul Power must vigorously to what kind degree Ah?

The light mist raises from Huo Yuhao, Morning Dew Knife appeared during he grasps. In Tang Wutong both hands is Zuo Chuiyou the spear|gun, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection and Sharing already and she completely is as before connected.

Facing the powerhouse of Evil Tyrant this level, in their hearts does not have the least bit to fear, some are excited. Their strengths were just increased, the foundation is not steady, since breaking through 95 levels, they do not have to precipitate well. But wants better experience oneself to cultivate is, was completely grasped the strength that these select for promotion suddenly by oneself, the best means are, fight!

Like initially Huo Yuhao outrageously proposed that selects ten, after is that time, established him became the Transcendent Douluo foundation.

Although Evil Tyrant is formidable, but Huo Yuhao has the absolute confidence to be able the whole body to draw back, even if cannot hit, runs or inescapable. Such being the case, then on full war, enhances own actual combat experience.

Treadonned Ghost Shadow Perplexing Track, Huo Yuhao brings Tang Wutong to glitter instantaneously, under the function of Spiritual Detection and Sharing, they simultaneously used Teleportation to look like general that a person used.

Shifts hundred meters instantaneously. Huo Yuhao appears in a completing the order form tentacle front, in the hand Morning Dew Knife cuts instantaneously.

In the sky, ices blue light shadow to dodge to pass together.

The tentacle and flash of ice blue color light shadow contact, it looks like a dark red whip, what is more fearful, is also containing Can's silver brilliance, the ray twinkle, must icing the blue light blade edge pulls out.

----------------------------------------------

In the evening also has, remembers to come to see!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-605-part-4





Volume 13

#606 - Evil Monarch Perishes


However, above that ice blue color light blade edge, instantaneous ray greatly Sheng, the silver and golden color hands over to glitter. The temperature in air reduces instantaneously, that blade edge has only wiped the tentacle.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler called out pitifully, a tentacle such had cut off one section by Huo Yuhao unexpectedly. Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong personal appearance glitters and accelerates once more. Suddenly under the acceleration, the aura of his whole person became somewhat rapid, but actually actually drilled from the slits of other tentacles.

Shakes by the huge energy frontage hardly, might as well wrestle in the skill. Evil Tyrant does not know that Huo Yuhao has Morning Dew Knife this type of Divine Weapon sharp weapon, unexpectedly comes up to suffer a loss.

But at the same time, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler one was also enraged, sees only his giant eye pupil center suddenly becomes profound, a dark red thorn corona appears in the addendum circle.

“Buzz”sky as if fiercely shook, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong simultaneously felt that is similar myriad sharp thorns to dig in own spiritual sea, then entrains own spiritual sea to detach.

What ability is this? Huo Yuhao is surprised. He is also first time faces Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, did not exaggerate said that although Evil Tyrant was inferior in the overall strength in Beast God Di Tian, but in the mind level, actually absolutely can become now the Continent's Number One Expert title.

Traded has cultivated for slightly weakly, perhaps spiritual sea will directly be stripped outside the body, not having spiritual sea, the person to turn into the idiot, but can also revolt?

Luckily, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong have mind Soul Nucleus, feels that formidable force of traction, Huo Yuhao and mind Soul Nucleus in Tang Wutong mind immediately the fierce fluctuation, strong Spiritual Power resists with the thorn that these prick fiercely, has withstood that powerful attack stiffly. However, even if so, their personal appearance slightly sluggish. The massive tentacles of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler have twined.

Also at this moment, an ice blue color halo also suddenly outward bursts out from Huo Yuhao, a glittering and translucent carving grass appears in his shoulder, is Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass.

Does not need Huo Yuhao to control, his spirit launched the attack for him.

Octagonal Ten Thousands Directional Thorns!

The innumerable giant ice spears are centered on the body of Huo Yuhao bursts out outward, gets rid to pull out strikes on the ice lance, the shaved ice scatters in all directions the splash, but went against eventually by these ice spears, has not fallen on Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

The dark blue sword glow sweeps away together, Snow Emperor animated standing side Huo Yuhao, Snow Emperor Three Ultimate, Peerless Extreme Ice.

More than ten tentacles were cut by this sword, although Peerless Extreme Ice is inferior to Morning Dew Knife sharply, cannot cut off these tentacles directly, but also makes these several get rid under Absolute Ice to freeze.

Ice Emperor appears side Snow Emperor, in the beautiful pupil green jade light puts greatly, a tender body revolution, has appeared Ice Emperor avatar, the giant tail hook flings, the aquamarine ray, directly soars Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler of distant place to shoot together.

This Soul Ability, even if Huo Yuhao does not have, after was Ice Emperor gradually restored the original strength, can use again. But her present condition, has displayed Martial Soul avatar in Huo Yuhao.

“Well!”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is once more surprised, in eye pupil projects together black light, collides in the aquamarine ray together, airborne splashes immediately the innumerable halos. But also at this time, before a Ice Emperor pair, the chela makes an effort closed up, immediately, got rid to have a series of explosions by several that Peerless Extreme Ice froze before.

She has never thought her attack can injure to formidable Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler directly, but must attract his attention, does not make him have the freeze that the time disposal gets rid, immediately has inspired then Ice Explosion Technique.

The tentacle of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is truly formidable, even if the function of Ice Explosion Technique, cannot destroy them, is only the purple blood splashes.

“Roar! You enraged me really!”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler roars, all tentacles also raise up. At this time has withstood its mind attack Huo Yuhao to come soberly, sees surprised, before tentacle that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler each raising up, with its own exactly the same eye, but wants small many. At this time, on each eye is sending out the strange brilliance.

81 tentacles, besides by that Huo Yuhao cuts off, the surplus 80 tentacles are all sending out the spooky ray.

“Yuhao, was careful.”The Snow Emperor sinking sound shouted to clear the way. Meanwhile, her tender body revolution, vanished baseless, changes into the big piece the snowflake to diverge toward the surroundings, is the frontage moved forward to meet somebody in the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler direction unexpectedly.

This is Snow Emperor, ranks Ten Great Ferocious Beasts third Snow Emperor.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler roars, 80 tentacles release 80 beams instantaneously, these beam any rays, have not been the pure black, when they simultaneously appear, greatly somewhat the feeling of world discoloration.

Snow Emperor flies to shoot, but snowflake dances lightly, in these beams able to move unhindered, is fending its attack alternately, but these black beams itself do not aim at her. But directly soars Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao clearly can feel that through Spiritual Detection their path, does not have the means to fend, in the resistance of mind level, he also has the disparity with Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler eventually.

Tang Wutong goes forward suddenly one step, before arriving at the Huo Yuhao body, in the hand Clear Sky Hammer rumbles void, this time, in her behind, reappeared a shadow of great hammer, the great hammer appeared, rose suddenly against the wind, is almost in a flash, rises suddenly has been hundred meters, great hammer across the sky, numerous bombardments in air.

Clear Sky Hammer avatar, even if Huo Yuhao, is first time sees Tang Wutong to display this ability.

Fierce thundering resounds suddenly, the entire sky as if instantaneously ruptured generally, the sky caves, the huge suction, made Huo Yuhao and Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler shakes, was attracted several points forward.

These Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler project black light in airborne is defeated and dispersed immediately.

However, is defeated and dispersed is actually only the flash, next one flickers, these are defeated and dispersed black light vanished unexpectedly. Waits for Tang Wutong to discover the time, these 80 black light arrived in front of them unexpectedly.

Space Power, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler unexpectedly Space Power and own Spiritual Power union such good.

Tang Wutong as before has not actually retroceded, the great hammer keeps off before the body, a terrifying thought bursts out from her.

On Clear Sky Hammer avatar, a golden trace blooms outward. Is centered on Clear Sky Hammer, the surroundings space all turned into the silver, then in abundance to shatter. This time, that 80 black rays really completely to shatter fell.

Similarly is Space Power, Space Power that but, Tang Wutong displays, is actually and Clear Sky Hammer Absolute Strength to the fusion.

to shatter black light from the sky blasts out, the complementary waves actually as before arrived on Tang Wutong. Her body trembles slightly, Clear Sky Hammer avatar vanished immediately. A thought also transmitted to Huo Yuhao.

“mind paralysis.”

Said these four characters, on Tang Wutong is golden light greatly puts, this is she takes oneself to cultivate for is resisting the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler sign.

In this time, the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler main body of distant place, is bursting out a wild thought suddenly, its diameter achieved 300 meters giant eye pupil to turn suddenly completely bright red, a giant bright red light beam, suddenly suddenly to launch.

That the diameter achieves 300 meters terrifying red light beam together! Almost covers the snowflakes of Snow Emperor all incarnations completely. Moreover shells to come toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

This is the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler most formidable attack.

Huo Yuhao only thought that own spiritual sea one has seethed with excitement, that is a total destruction arrives at the general feeling. After several probing attacks, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler finally started to use it most formidable weapon successively.

Snow Emperor reappears suddenly before his body, fuses with Ice Emperor together. Next flickers, ices the white and deep green union together, instantaneously blooms.

Compared with terrorist attack that the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler aggressive side leaks, this Ice and Snow Two Emperor's Pride be only the diameter about ten meters, the volume is much smaller. However, actually also Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong protecting firmly in behind.

“Bang”fierce thundering in the airborne explosive, the entire sky seemed held big hole. Terrifying mind thought that Absolute Ice powerful aura, dispersing of innumerable Soul Power fluctuation.

The sky finds at everywhere various to shatter gaps, even cannot close for a very long time. The wild thought that making the entire sky shiver. This is fighting of limit level, absolutely is existence of destroying the heaven and extinguishing the earth.

Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor after all are only the spirits, was not once main body, otherwise their two collaborated, has not necessarily feared Evil Tyrant. At this time they actually can only reply on the Huo Yuhao strength. Huo Yuhao present cultivating also has the disparity for and Snow Emperor of heyday.

The collision ended, the Huo Yuhao complexion is somewhat pale, within the body Soul Power one turns intermittently wells up. Then was suppressed in the dantian, belongs to Long Xiaoyao Soul Power he unable to use now completely, at this time own Soul Power reduces at the same time, Soul Power in within the body compression started some trends of being ready to make trouble.

Good strength big Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler! However also finally can withstand its attack directly.

The next round attack of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler has not arrived immediately, its gloomy sound resounds through the sky, “good, is very good, you can actually make Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor your strength, this stemmed from this King to be unexpected actually. However, relies on such strength also to dare to this King to provoke, today, must ask you dead without the burial ground surely.”

81 tentacles raise up once more, 80 black glow put greatly, is the mind beam lacking in vigilance. 1152

The quickest renewal, non- ball window reading invited.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-606-part-1





Volume 13

#606 - Evil Monarch Perishes


This mind paralysis beam also has the Space Power effect, wants to destroy extremely difficultly, under locking of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, fends is almost the impossible matter. To resist, is it may be said that difficult.

Tang Wutong works loose with great difficulty from the beforehand mind paralysis. Her personal appearance dodges, fended behind Huo Yuhao.

To Huo Yuhao behind she, the body started a vitality Purple gold color halo, the buddhist image is dignified, the body surrounding light fog is dense.

Huo Yuhao blue light twinkle, Extreme Ice Battle God Armor covers the whole body rapidly. Morning Dew Knife holds up, cuts in void.

A strange thought bursts out from him suddenly, that is an excited thought that even if Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler of distant place is affected, thought one happy got up.

These locked the mind paralysis beam of enemy to deflect unexpectedly suddenly, shoots toward the position of Huo Yuhao body side, place that his blade chops.

A blade space crack opens suddenly, swallows 80 mind paralysis beams completely.

“Well? What ability are you?”Evil Tyrant felt curiously, because after Huo Yuhao that blade cut, its surprised discovery, oneself unexpectedly lost to the beam the control.

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, said: “Spiritual Power! Except for you, didn't allow others to excel at the mind ability?”

He uses, is Power of Emotion.

After these days polishes and practice, he had some own comprehensions to Power of Emotion finally, these comprehensions are not profound, but is very useful regarding him.

He a moment ago displayed, is in the mood, pleasant.

That blade cuts, seems like ordinary, is actually his self-created Soul Ability.

The eye pupil sudden contraction of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, “the mind level, was very good, boy, today in any event. The main body must keep here you. If makes you continue to grow again, perhaps in the near future really can threaten the main body.”

Huo Yuhao sighed, said: “Planned to live in peace together, how you to compel with hardship. Such being the case, that today in any event, I must cut to kill you, making you my mind level ninth Soul Ring. Is you must injure first our, do not blame our heavy hand being heartless.”

The voice falls, the body of Huo Yuhao suddenly started to have the change, radiant golden light erupted from him together instantaneously, at the same time, Ice Emperor, Snow Emperor or Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass, in integrated in his body instantaneously.

That golden light from out of the blue. Rises into the upper air suddenly, the dark red sky had been ripped open a crack unexpectedly directly, golden light drops from the clouds together, returns nurturing to parents on Huo Yuhao. Thick Bing Wu (ice mist), is centered on his body outward diffusion.

Huge dragon wings opens behind him. Huo Yuhao behind Tang Wutong vanished, but his personal appearance in Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, cannot see any change from outside.

Void, one step steps forward, the silver light appears in the front together, in an instant, the space passes through.

“Um?”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is startled. When that golden light arrives on Huo Yuhao, he feels impressively that this young people completely changed, the beforehand aura had the earth-shaking change, as if the whole person turned into light part.

Giant pupil contraction and expansion, this time. Turned into dark green completely, the air/Qi of terrifying withering is centered on its huge body outward diffusion. The sky also similarly turned into dark green, only then descends that [say / way] vertical golden color light beam on Huo Yuhao is unable to be closed by its space oppression.

The silver light dodges again, when Huo Yuhao appears again, appeared in a Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler dead ahead hundred meters place unexpectedly.

81 tentacle crazy sweeping across of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler on. To block him.

The right hand of Huo Yuhao lifts, in the hand Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife is cuts to strike as in void, this time thought is sad, under that thick sad intent affects, the tentacle was towed again side.

“Light of Destruction!”The Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler sound is flooding a strange tonality, each character said that the air will twist strangely, as if condensed the solid the terror to Absolute Spiritual Power, next one flickered, together the diameter only then about hundred meters dark green ray suddenly to launch, shone on Huo Yuhao directly.

Huo Yuhao does not know, the pupil light diameter that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler releases is bigger, the might is smaller, but the diameter is smaller, then the might is bigger, this together Light of Destruction, even if Beast God Di Tian wants to resist here, must pay not the small price to be good.

However, those who made the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler incomparable shock was, float there Huo Yuhao, after withstanding this has struck, the whole person as if became the nihility generally, unexpectedly has not had any change.

If must say that has the change, was he behind were then many attractive merpeople light shadow, interesting to listen to merpeople singing sound along with it resounding.

On Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife, bloomed the unequalled radiant brilliance, the Absolute chill in the air promotes the unprecedented degree instantaneously. 260 degrees below zero ultra-low temperatures, making the tentacle that these wanted to pester once more in airborne become stagnate.

How possible? My Light of Destruction, has he been able a matter? This is impossible, this is absolutely impossible.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler panic-stricken, in this flash, it felt the giant crisis finally.

Also in this flickers, on Huo Yuhao bursts out a glare suddenly, a handle golden color great hammer raises from him, arrived in front of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler instantaneously.

Both sides were away from were too tight, oppression strength that presented instantaneously, even let the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler giant eye pupil central downward hollow. A powerful mind guard shield erupts from his eye pupil instantaneously, hits with that golden great hammer together.

The mind guard shield congeals instantaneously the ice, to shatter, golden light four shoot piece by piece.

Extremely frozen blaze, Celestial Emperor Hammer.

The body of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler shivered fiercely, but it also showed to place the super strength of second powerhouse in this moment as Ten Great Ferocious Beasts.

While just bore the attack, his eye pupil deep place, turned into dark blue, together only then diameter one zhang (3.33 m) dark blue ray suddenly suddenly to launch.

When this dark blue ray appears, the time as if static, has been holding up Morning Dew Knife Huo Yuhao, in this flickers is imprisoned unexpectedly completely in the midair. Surrounding all spaces, at an exceptional pace in compressing, the dark blue ray seems like very slow is moving, in process that but, moves in it, the sky turned into the dark blue, the earth turned into the dark blue, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler all turned into the dark blue.

Space-Time Ray!

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler ultimate deep meaning. Initially, it was relying on this formidable ability, can escape from the Di Tian hand ascends to heaven.

Is relying on to the sensibility of mind and space, he comprehended this time spatial strength, came from in Spiritual Source Power of Space-Time. Power of Space-Time can eliminate all living thing Spiritual Source, making its Spiritual Source weaken instantaneously.

Initially, Beast God Di Tian, although heavy wound it, but Di Tian itself, because also this Space-Time Ray, recuperated the millenniums to restore in peak condition, obviously this Space-Time Ray was formidable.

Dark blue Space-Time Ray stable falling on Huo Yuhao, making on him was releasing outward the incorruptible aura all turn into the dark blue. The whole person is also so.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler relaxed finally, after he can display Space-Time Ray this formidable deep meaning, after was only hit, does not die, is Beast God Di Tian, in addition, did not have any living thing to be able in front of Space-Time Ray to escape by luck.

But displays this Space-Time Ray, in fact regarding Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, must pay the enormous price, he must consume his vitality, can use.

Must know, shortly afterward, he must again faced with Great Tribulation difficult approached, consumed the vitality at this time, for him was nearly fatal. But, in a moment ago, Huo Yuhao took to his sense of crisis is really too intense. To the powerhouse of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler this level, regarding own sensation has believed that extremely, some least bits will not suspect, therefore, it without hesitation has used Space-Time Ray.

“Pū”

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler huge body slight shivered, an extremely huge thought erupts suddenly outward.

This thought is, no! But! Think! Discuss!

Yes, inconceivable! Because, a handle is glittering the thick Bing Wu (ice mist) sharp knife blade, inserted in its pupil most core position. The form, is grasping that handle sharp knife blade together, even on him, but also has the dark blue ray of beforehand contamination.

The giant vertical pupil nearly sticks to its Evil Eye to appear. The vertical pupil presents is the ice blue color, right, is the ice blue color, but is not golden-rose color.

Ices the blue ray to stick to the pupil of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler to rumble together instantaneously outrageously into its within the body, with resounding of merpeople singing sound, ices the blue ray bang to enter together outrageously.

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife, vanished thoroughly, was rumbled completely into that terror great eye.

“Roar”sad and shrill roaring made entire Evil Spirit Forest shiver, the trees, changed into the powder powder instantaneously.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler huge body instantaneous flying upside down, tentacle pulling out maliciously struck is just changing on human form Huo Yuhao. In that eye pupil, is dark blue Space-Time Ray projects together, coagulates Huo Yuhao in the midair.

But, that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler huge body, actually in fierce is shivering. Terrifying ice blue color capillaries, are centered on its pupil sends out outward, not having the blood to flow out, only then endless incorruptible spreads on that 300 meters in diameter giant pupil.

Even if until at this moment, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler completely is not clear, why will lose, why will suffer Huo Yuhao fatal strikes.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-606-part-2





Volume 13

#606 - Evil Monarch Perishes


Why is this? Why Ah?

Huo Yuhao in airborne was stagnated was less than two seconds, returned to normal, but he again has not actually continued to attack, but turns around runs. In that flash, he ran out of the sonic bang sound directly, escapes instantaneously hundred li (0.5km).

The left hand gathers grasps, Ice Explosion Technique inspiring.

The distant place, the terrifying bellow, is common just like great Thunder Kuanghong sky over Evil Spirit Forest, for a very long time unceasingly.

Lifts the mask, reveals is actually not the Huo Yuhao appearance, but has a Tang Wutong appearance of big wave long hair, no, said accurately that should be: Ice Frost Solo Dance, Raiment of Light.

Yes, from launching fatal attack that flickers to start, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong melted for a body, Ice Frost Solo Dance, Raiment of Light, makes them have the qualification that and Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler contended with directly.

From the front exploratory fight, Huo Yuhao on deep understanding, oneself adds on Tang Wutong, possibly is not the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler match, this is the absolute strength disparity. But, he as before has actually chosen the challenge.

Dark, has the divine intervention.

Even if has put on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, Huo Yuhao adds on Tang Wutong to display Raiment of Light again, most is also in a short time can contend with Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler directly, but faces the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler terror the explosive force, that formidable mind ability, their final results should reluctantly run away.

But, they successful striking has actually killed Evil Tyrant, why?

Having Huo Yuhao can reply that unwillingness of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler. Depends on is, three mind attack immunities.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler most formidable three mind attack, was melted by Huo Yuhao three Spiritual Immunity thoroughly, this is also most important reason that he can live.

But he who has not withstood the attack, after can use Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler erupts the empty space calmly, using the most intrepid strength to attack.

Celestial Emperor Hammer. Has driven out the Evil Tyrant mind barrier.

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath adds on by two Eye of Asura Soul Assault that merpeople second level plays to erupt, has given Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler most fatal heavy wound.

During the Absolute Ice nearly Absolute Zero terrifying low temperature integrates mind to attack completely, that is Raiment of Light. Goddess of Light strength. In light of Huo Yuhao and absolute Soul Power of Tang Wutong two people, had that ultimate strikes.

Body separation. Tang Wutong dull float side Huo Yuhao, until at this moment, them also likes general the feeling in the dream.

“We and our really success?”Tang Wutong asked to Huo Yuhao in a low voice, “that was next to Beast God Di Tian strong Great Ferocious Beasts! The terror that Ten Great Ferocious Beasts is listed second exists.”

Huo Yuhao looks to Tang Wutong, fierce grasps her, “has succeeded, our really success. We struck to kill Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, our really success!”

This war. It may be said that thrillingly extremely, this time Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, Soul Power insufficient originally one-fifth. If not by Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui their cultivating to promote to 98 levels, they are an opportunity do not have.

Spiritual Immunity no doubt can help the mind attack of Huo Yuhao immunity Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, but that must consume continually. If not their Martial Soul Fusion techniques makes Goddess of Light Soul Power nearly inexhaustible, he also at all impossible to live under Space-Time Ray.

Two Space-Time Ray! Huo Yuhao does not dare to imagine, if without Spiritual Immunity, withstands Space-Time Ray to let the effect that mind declines directly, how that can be the scene. Perhaps do not die must turn into the idiot.

But now, they were finally successful. Then formidable Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, stiffly was killed by their striking unexpectedly.

“Walks, we go back.”Tang Wutong is drawing Huo Yuhao. They simultaneously launch the personal appearance, flies in the Evil Spirit Forest direction.

In the sky, as before was dark blue, the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler strength is really too formidable, until at this moment, its aura has not diverged completely.

In the ground, everywhere is the blood of dark red, as well as bulk bulk Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler corpse. The brightest several things, one attracted Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong attention.

First is Morning Dew Knife. Is glittering Bing Wu (ice mist) ray Morning Dew Knife float not any change in the midair, in addition. Is dark red Halo, has seven gold mark dark red Halo!

In that Halo center. Unexpectedly also the dark blue eye pupil of Xiao Xiao, seems, only then palm of the hand size, but is actually glittering the monster different brilliance.

“Is this? Soul Bone?”Huo Yuhao surprised looks at that Soul Ring central existence.

Soul Beast of over 100,000 years level besides will present 100,000 years of Soul Ring, will also present simultaneously formidable 100,000 years of Soul Bone. But, Soul Bone of this eye pupil style, Huo Yuhao actually first time sees, even if in Shrek Academy during ten thousand years of record, as if no this type of Soul Bone to exist.

“This is any Soul Bone Ah?”Tang Wutong curious asking.

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “I do not know, seems, should be External Soul Bone, moreover should be the eye pupil class. Does not know how should use.”

Tang Wutong excited [say / way]: “Naturally has absorbed directly, your Martial Soul is Spirit Eyes, absorbs this kind of Soul Bone to be appropriate, has not thought really that the eye can also be Soul Bone! Too was really mysterious.”

Huo Yuhao brought Tang Wutong to fly, first took back Morning Dew Knife, then used own Spiritual Power has towed the past to that Soul Ring and Soul Bone.

His Spiritual Power just fell above that Soul Ring, immediately felt an intense incomparable repelling force bursts out from Soul Ring.

Clearly, that belongs to the thought of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler.

However, this regarding Huo Yuhao, makes the inadequate too big puzzle obviously. If Evil Tyrant is also living, Huo Yuhao naturally is not his match, now it died, entire Continent, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power cultivates for is existence of most top, wants to tow its Soul Ring and Soul Bone does not have the issue.

Increases the Spiritual Power output, Huo Yuhao guides its Soul Ring and Soul Bone to fall to the ground.

Seven golden traces 100,000 years of Soul Ring! In Huo Yuhao all Soul Ring, only then Daydream Ice Silkworm 1 million years of Soul Ring can dominate above, but Daydream Ice Silkworm itself must compared with Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, actually the difference was too is really far. In the past was its 1 million years cultivated for the time, facing Evil Tyrant, only then by destiny of demanding everything.

Now, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler changed into Soul Ring unexpectedly, this regarding Huo Yuhao, was unable to describe with the pleasant surprise.

Tang Wutong jumps for joy saying: “Quickly absorbs, I give you protector. Our Dual Soul Nucleus Soul Power restore quickly, in this piece of Evil Spirit Forest, besides this Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, did not have anything to threaten our existence. You have quickly absorbed, can perhaps touch the third Soul Nucleus edge.”

“Good.”Huo Yuhao complies with one, sits cross-legged to sit down directly.

While he plans to start to absorb Soul Nucleus time, suddenly, the white light dodges, Snow Emperor drilled from his within the body.

“Yuhao, you first wait a moment.”Snow Emperor complexion dignified said to Huo Yuhao.

“How Snow Emperor?”Asking of Huo Yuhao doubts.

Snow Emperor brow micro wrinkle, said: “You on absorption Evil Tyrant Soul Ring, can perhaps now some issues.”

“?”Huo Yuhao knows that Snow Emperor will certainly not be aimless, Soul Ring of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler this level he has not absorbed, hurries to stop, is waiting for the Snow Emperor explanation.

Snow Emperor said: “If before, does not have that human Limit Douluo to pass to you Soul Power, should not have the issue. Has absorbed Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Soul Ring, will only make you cultivate to increase. But now is different, Soul Power of your within the body were too many, although just has consumed, but these quickly can restore. But you now are impossible to have third Soul Nucleus immediately, once has absorbed this Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Soul Ring, may probably face within the body energy very much to be huge, is unable to divulge the aspect that is unable to absorb, even might let you faced with the danger.”

“This truly is an issue. But, on me has not brought to be used to seal Soul Ring Soul Guidance Device.”Huo Yuhao brow tight wrinkle. Today can strike to kill Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, absolutely is the luck excellent, in addition restraint of Spiritual Immunity. Such fully has 700,000 years cultivate for Soul Ring not to absorb shortly, after a while it may voluntarily dissipate!

Tang Wutong also wrinkles the delicate eyebrows, a war, she was knows a moment ago was thrilling, in fact, after Huo Yuhao and her incarnation were Goddess of Light, has left leeway the ample force, prepared to escape at any time. On Huo Yuhao, three nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, even if that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is strong, was used to bring up the rear was also enough.

Now strikes to kill this formidable Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler with great difficulty, if such gives up his Soul Ring really not giving up! Soul Bone said fortunately that can retard absorption. But Soul Ring what to do?

However, cannot make Huo Yuhao take risk to absorb, no one knows these 700,000 years cultivate for in Soul Ring, will contain the huge energy, this can let the huge energy that the Transcendent Douluo level powerhouses are promoted absolutely! If had problems, is fatal.

“All right, you have me!”Has several points of badly bad happy expression sound to resound, golden light dodges, side Huo Yuhao were many a person, for a long time has not come out Daydream Ice Silkworm.

Daydream Ice Silkworm at this time is a face complacent appearance, double hand back after behind, greatly somewhat self-satisfied flavor.

“Brother Daydream, do you have the means?”Huo Yuhao pleasantly surprised looks at Daydream Ice Silkworm.

-------------------------------------------------

Four finished, does obeisance to seek monthly ticket and recommendation vote support! ( to be continued ) 580

The quickest renewal, non- ball window reading invited.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-606-part-3





Volume 13

#607 - Rain Hao To


Daydream Ice Silkworm favorite [say / way]: “Fight, I am not good. However, must say that this holds energy, the brother very much has one. Don't forget, I may once be 1 million years of Soul Beast, initially, my Spiritual Power gradually has given you, but my ability also. Brother has practiced for 1 million years, majors is Spiritual Power, this Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler also similarly is the mind ability. You felt relieved that absorbed its this Soul Ring to be good, unnecessary Spiritual Power, the brother helped you save first, when you had the time calmed the mind to practice the time, the brother integrated your body this strength again, didn't have the issue? When storage pot is easy.”

Huo Yuhao immediately eye one bright, Tang Wutong also reveals the happy expression, yes! Daydream Ice Silkworm is 1 million years cultivate for Spiritual System Soul Beast, no matter how first his source combat capability, must say that this to the carrying capacity of energy, he actually should be extremely powerful is right. His Spiritual Source originally has given Huo Yuhao, the ability that now empties, load bearing Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler 700,000 years cultivates for should the issue not be big. Let alone, this is only Soul Ring, is not Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler huge Spiritual Power.

Snow Emperor knit the brows, said: “Daydream, do you have confidence really? Evil Tyrant Spiritual Power with your initial is different, comparison Spiritual Power is overbearing. You may probably handle affairs carefully, otherwise, not good......”

Daydream Ice Silkworm showed the whites of the eyes, said: “You do not have the confidence to me! This is only Soul Ring, relax, the brother has confidence. Come, but also hesitant anything, Yuhao, quickly fused this Evil Tyrant Soul Ring. If can make its any Space-Time Ray Soul Ability, you were developed and ensure can let you understanding upper formation building to the space ability, even can also touch to the time domain mystery.”

Trust of Huo Yuhao Daydream Ice Silkworm is long-standing, in the past must not have the fusion of Brother Daydream, does not have her today.

At that moment, he sits cross-legged to sit down without hesitation, by the Spiritual Power hauling, starts to fuse Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Soul Ring. Similar to eye general Soul Bone as for that was received by Tang Wutong first. Now does not fuse its good opportunity, waits later to attack third Soul Nucleus the time, said again.

dark red Soul Ring enters the body. Huo Yuhao the whole body shivered immediately fiercely, he only thought that is extremely powerful and overbearing, filled unwillingly broke in own spiritual sea with the ruinous terror mind thought instantaneously, the crazy impact, wanted to tear into shreds his spiritual sea completely.

Huo Yuhao is not the generation of being easy, mind Soul Nucleus instantaneous revolves high-speed, this is supplementing Spiritual Power of certain Absolute Ice special effect instantaneously the mind thought freezes of these terrors, then gradually destroys, energy will depute, with own fusion.

The Daydream Ice Silkworm strength appeared in next second. Like such that he said that just like swallowing up general, was deputed later Spiritual Power to inhale oneself within the body to carry on the seal these.

Had his help, the absorption of Huo Yuhao becomes does not hinder, has to say. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Spiritual Power is extremely huge and overbearing, is 700,000 years cultivate for exists worthily, but in Soul Ring is containing the essence energy, makes Huo Yuhao spiritual sea be instantaneous.

At the beginning, but also filtered with enough time, after certain extent, he did not have the means to filter completely. Without the time. Each second, has the massive mind energies to release from that Soul Ring, fuses with his spiritual sea.

Daydream Ice Silkworm is truly powerful, at this time, being outspoken is absorbing these Spiritual Power fully, even if heterogeneous does not let off.

It appears the Daydream Ice Silkworm main body in Huo Yuhao spiritual sea. Already vanished the golden mark, one after another is only restoring, but, in this golden color is also mixing with some scarlet, this was Spiritual Power purely does not display.

But so. Also helped Huo Yuhao be busy.

Mermaid Princess Li Ya also similarly appears sky over spiritual sea, although she does not have the means to swallow up like Daydream Ice Silkworm, but also through own effort, helping Huo Yuhao filter part of Spiritual Power, melts these cruel aura.

As the matter stands, the Spiritual Power fusion of Huo Yuhao became well much.

Now on Continent, only then Spiritual Power of this level, dares to fuse six spirits . Moreover, each spirit is also dead set on to him.

Now among the spirits already did not have any contradiction, will not have any interference to Huo Yuhao, besides them the trust Huo Yuhao, a more important point, because they saw the hope, yes, hopes.

Huo Yuhao and God of Emotion met, obtained the approval of God of Emotion, this regarding the stimulation of six big spirits was really too big.

Although originally they in the heart have that goal, may in fact, regarding illusory God Realm, they not hold the too high hope, after has felt the aura of god truly, their in sad in disdaining of God Realm to Soul Beast simultaneously, rejoices in own choice. Is following Huo Yuhao, may leave this world, may arrive at that world to obtain freshman really! What does this have to be good to complain? They definitely will not hesitate at all costs helps Huo Yuhao, to obtain in that world freshman opportunity.

Enough three days three nights, the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Soul Ring halo truly fuses Huo Yuhao within the body. The fusion does not calculate specially thoroughly, because to finally, Daydream Ice Silkworm on ten golden light marks unexpectedly already full load. Therefore, Huo Yuhao withstood part of not small wild Spiritual Power.

These Spiritual Power made his spiritual sea very not tranquil, had to raise the dreadful wave anytime the possibility.

Present Huo Yuhao, in cultivates for on, absolutely is the powerhouse of Limit Douluo level, moreover Twin Martial Souls Limit Douluo.

But present he, likely is a giant rubber ball, has filled the air/Qi, can only control itself reluctantly, should not be supported to explode. It is not good, has the possibility of having problems.

“Yuhao, the best means that find a place now, you and Wutong calm the mind to practice, has absorbed within the body these huge energies completely, perhaps a time association president point, but is safest, moreover you have to attack the Limit Douluo possibility.”Snow Emperor has given critical suggestion.

Although the Huo Yuhao present condition is formidable, but is also very dangerous, if the bitter experience powerful enemy, own ability overuse, causes unable to control these not to be digested the energy of absorption, he has to explode the danger that the body perishes.

Reason that these energies could not absorb, was because his present body is also not enough to withstand, wish can withstand, needs through the unceasing practice, to become by oneself formidable is better.

But, can Huo Yuhao really find a place to practice now? Answer obviously negative. That side Bright Capital City, the important matter processes.

Huo Yuhao calculated to know slightly that he wanted to absorb completely the energy in within the body, attacked Limit Douluo with Tang Wutong, at least also took three years had the possibility.

They after becoming Transcendent Douluo, strength promotion was really too quick, this caused the foundation the extreme not to be steady, in this case, was impossible in a short time again to make the breakthrough, that will have the danger of overstation.

The change that but, three years, can have was really too big, at least now, they have not been able to close up. First must solve the Bright Capital City problem. Only then has killed Xu Tianran, obtains ten years of commitment from Ju Zi(orange) there, he can steadfast cultivates, attacks.

“Walks, we return to Bright Capital City.”After listening to the opinion of Snow Emperor, Huo Yuhao hesitant moment, said to Tang Wutong.

Tang Wutong and his regard are interlinked, naturally understands that he is worried about anything, nod of without hesitation, at this time, she must support own man. Moreover, that side Sun-Moon Empire, is in must solve may not the situation.

Without the restriction of Holy Spirit Cult, by the Sun-Moon Empire present national strength, one year, can save enough strength to start the eastern expedition absolutely. This time, the goal inevitably is unification entire Continent.

In this case, the most effective matter that they can handle, completes among the commitment with Ju Zi(orange), only has so, can make Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries have the respite time.

Although Huo Yuhao is very clear, by own strength, can prevent for a while, actually unable forever to prevent. After all, after he attacks Limit Douluo that level, must challenge Beast God Di Tian, accepts the inheritance of God of Emotion, what change later will have, he does not know, future destiny unknown. But the Continent aspect was very difficult to change, the progress of Soul Guidance Technology, making entire Continent be controlled by Soul Guidance Technology gradually, this is almost irreversible.

After Sky Soul Empire was invaded, just started various rebellion are many, but along with the unceasing seepage of Soul Guidance Technology, the rebellion were getting fewer and fewer.

Common people's request is actually very simple, so long as can enjoy a good and prosperous life, eats to the full to put on warmly, was enough. Let alone Soul Guidance Technology gave back to their life to bring that many convenient, the time grew, they naturally also adapted, integrated, even before having forgotten.

In environment such situation, Sun-Moon Empire unifies Continent is very as if difficult to reverse, but in any event, as a Star Lou Empire person, he must for own country, for Shrek Academy as far as possible will retard this time.

Looks from the distant place upper air, Bright Capital City is similar to a giant monster, is stopped up above the plain, only then the imperial palace position of core place, some unharmonious appearance.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-607-part-1





Volume 13

#607 - Rain Hao To Medium


Several days pass by, the imperial palace that side seems is declaring martial law as before, but without a doubt, soon, the martial law will turn into the construction. By the Sun-Moon Empire national strength, most two years, a brand-new imperial palace can rise straight from the ground, moreover was absolutely grander than before, defended is also stricter. This is the strength of science and technology.

Nobody can prevent the advance in technology, the sustained progress of science and technology, has caused various issues on present society, has caused fluctuation of Continent situation.

Distant looks at the direction of Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace, Huo Yuhao disappointed light sighs one.

Tang Wutong is holding his hand, “? Our present abilities, should affect the entire Continent aspect sufficiently. So long as you suppress under the heart, after we Xu Tianran has killed, Ju Zi(orange) also kills. Sun-Moon Empire, inevitable chaos. To that time, the step that they invaded will be definitely slow. In the near future, any person inherited the throne, we homicide, making Sun-Moon Empire always be in the disorder the situation, one day, Star Luo and Dou Ling will catch up. So long as we have been protecting Continent, will not let Sun-Moon Empire the Continent unification.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “If all think you think is so simple, that was too good. What a pity, this world cannot so. Such will not change according to our imagination. We killed Xu Tianran, the Sun-Moon Empire interior have met the civil strife, but also had Ju Zi(orange), by the Ju Zi(orange) ability and in military the influence, soon, she can by oneself be the status of queen mother, was leading the young emperor, controlled the overall situation. Sun-Moon Empire is insufficient to have the chaos. However, if we have also killed Ju Zi(orange), entire Sun-Moon Empire really will be then chaotic. The Sun-Moon Empire strength was too strong, these Soul Engineer Corp, let out any, facing Star Luo and Dou Ling, almost approaches in invincible existence. Once these strengths no longer were restrained. Becoming unscrupulous, then, on entire Continent, Sun-Moon Empire. Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire, can beacon rise from all directions, the innumerable lives will submit to and destroy in front of unscrupulous Soul Engineer.”

“Reason that I have tolerated Ju Zi(orange), a very big reason, is her not bloodthirsty, good that very only if beside the necessary war, she has restrained to her subordinate, each war solves at the minimum price. If in the future Continent really because of Soul Guidance Technology by unified words, that. Ju Zi(orange) is actually the best candidate.”

“The world situation, being divided the long time must gather and must divide about the long time. Once Heaven Dou Empire and Star Lou Empire, have ruled the Continent several thousand years, two big empires have also opposed for several thousand years. After they destroy Martial Soul Hall, many people think. Continent will enter the peace time. Also, how many years has used? Did Heaven Dou Empire split Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire? The dispute has not reduced throughout. This is national numerous reasons. A unified big empire, perhaps to future Douluo Continent is a good deed, at least in a short time is the good deed.”

Tang Wutong surprised looks at Huo Yuhao, said: “Do you support Sun-Moon Empire to unify Continent?”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “Naturally, I did not say. To tell you, I do not hope saw flame of war are flying, chaotic incomparable Continent. Our strengths were very strong, but absolutely is actually not able to affect the change of entire Continent. We cannot, because own temporary pleased, but makes entire Continent fall into the flames of war. Let alone, Sun-Moon Empire coped with Ye Xishui and Old Long process you also sees. Along with the development of Soul Guidance Technology. Limit Douluo also no longer is invincible existence. In the future, Sun-Moon Empire, has not necessarily coped with our methods!”

“Therefore, we can affect Continent by our strength, but must know when to stop. On the other hand. Existence of Limit Douluo, more significances are the deterrents.”

“Um.”Tang Wutong sighed one lightly, said: “Actually, I hope now that can be far away from these disputes to be good with you. In recent years, we have undergone the tribulation were too many, I am quite tired! After this and Ju Zi(orange) completes for ten years approximately, we close up, anything does not manage, first attacked Limit Douluo to say again. Has completed making of these ten years, we done were many enough.”

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, holds in the arms her slender waist, during making her integrate itself to embrace. Since something are irreversible, that can only complies with the development of time, performs the human affairs to listen to the destiny. What in the future Continent will turn into, who also said well? 10,000 years ago, Martial Soul Hall controls Continent time, who can think that once dominated Continent Soul Master, to 10,000 years later today, will have been substituted by Soul Engineer unexpectedly gradually, does existence of Soul Guidance Device, let the function of Soul Master is weakened to so the degree unexpectedly? Soul Master legion facing Soul Engineer legion, actually does not have many including the revolt ability. This is how inconceivable!

The speech did not affect Huo Yuhao to seek for Ju Zi(orange), the Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace is destroyed, but Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family as before still in Bright Capital City, completely was actually encircled from the imperial palace recent several buildings, was guarded with large army, Huo Yuhao has discovered directly several Soul Engineer Corp traces through Spiritual Detection, moreover there is an unusual complete Soul Guidance Array place of construction, various Surveying Soul Guidance Device were even more crowded than before, perhaps during these surveys, Xu Tianran was wants to go to bathroom, can be monitored. These monitoring almost make all people not have to hide, during anything constructs.

These constructions are not big, establish the construction around imperial palace, does not permit big, this is certain. But the imperial palace itself will not construct special is big, this is because the big construction is easiest to be attacked by Soul Guidance Device, naturally, by the Bright Capital City surrounding defense, if were not initially Huo Yuhao once led three Soul Engineer Corp surprise attacks to be successful, perhaps this imperial palace newly-built really can construct was bigger.

Ju Zi(orange) in a building three room, Xu Tianran not with her in the same place, but in another building, that side defense is stricter.

Slightly makes the judgment, Huo Yuhao understands that now here defense so will be why close. Xu Tianran has not grasped to that two Limit Douluo life and death obviously, will therefore have such situation.

This also no wonder, Limit Douluo was really too fearful, has not achieved that level cultivated for the person, is actually unable to go to true judgment that level to be able formidable to any degree.

But the retaliation of Limit Douluo, is not anybody can withstand, wants to come these days, Xu Tianran certainly to live in constant anxiety.

“What is most intelligent is Ju Zi(orange)!”Huo Yuhao sighed to sigh one, feeling so far here change, he even already Ju Zi(orange) thoughts guess almost.

Listened to his such saying, Tang Wutong was also the thoughts moves slightly, said: “You said that here defends so strictly, is Ju Zi(orange) intentionally for it? She such does, what advantage has to her? The defense was strict, was disadvantageous to our beginning!”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “If I have not guessed that wrong, Ju Zi(orange) has certainly the subsequent party, we are not her only depending on. You think that we and Sun-Moon Empire are hostile, moreover we are impossible to be controlled by Ju Zi(orange), in this case, if you are she, you will do? Has changed me, I definitely approximately will not regard the reality the gambling. But Ju Zi(orange) must cope with the Xu Tianran thoughts to be grave, does not begin is impossible. Therefore, she also has certainly other means that but this means that should appear in Sun-Moon Empire. Perhaps she has bribed some people.”

“However the atmosphere that now she creates, for must cover their ears and eyes, once Xu Tianran died, then, she can shift blame the Xu Tianran death on two Limit Douluo greatly, this is possibly does not have to verify, at that time, whole nation with sad, in addition she in the influence of military, wanted to control the entire empire on the other hand on easy many. These Imperial Family, but also unqualified resists with her.”

Listened to the analysis of Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong to hold breath cold air, but was quick she to smile, moreover smiled happily.

“What do you smile?”Huo Yuhao said in consternation.

Tang Wutong said with a smile: “I am smiling, hasn't her intelligent person, lost to me? This showed that I am more intelligent than her. Dominant country, even rules Continent to have anything to be good, where has our Xiaoyao to be comfortable, what is more important, you are my! All is my, does not give her.”

Felt the Tang Wutong small thoughts, Huo Yuhao has also been smiling, although regarding the Ju Zi(orange) ambition and deep plans, in his heart some were uncomfortable, but finally in his acceptance range, after all, in that environment, if were not ruthless, then, likely becomes the sacrificial victim of political struggle.

“Walks, we help her.”Huo Yuhao brings Tang Wutong to integrate quietly in the nihility, this time, directly is Space Power that draws support from.

When they appear again, already in the Bright Capital City city, in a gloomy corner.

Similarly has not appeared the personal appearance, Imitation Soul Ability and space control perfect union, has produced such results, in addition the adjustment and control to the mind fluctuation of temperature, making oneself integrate in the air completely. At least by the present technical standard, wants to discover them, is almost impossible.

The space breaks once more, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong personal appearance dodges, entered that to discover during the construction of Ju Zi(orange).

This is a hotel, luxurious, only then three, the area is extremely broad, does not need to ask that is the industry of Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family.

Ju Zi(orange) in three biggest rooms. In the room has several maidservants, this time she, is actually accompanying the child.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-607-part-2





Volume 13

#607 - Rain Hao To Below


Xu Yunhan is not initially that always needs to hug the kid, he has grown up much, everywhere was running, the robust appearance, particularly annoys the person to love.

Ju Zi(orange) sits on a luxurious high back chair, looks that the child runs and jumps for joy in the room, on the fair elegant face full is the color of affection.

She under this condition, who can with that able to move unhindered invincible female war-god link?

“Yunhan, ran slowly, has perspired, drank a water.”Ju Zi(orange) smiles is waving to the son.

Little Yunhan runs up to side her, the sparkling big eye sees mother, on the face has piled up with the smiling face, “mother and mother, I must nurse.”

Ju Zi(orange) embarrassed [say / way]: “Brat, was big, mother already did not have the milk.”

Little Yunhan has almost all child common identities, to nurturing own mother has unequalled being intimate with, grabs the clothes, climbed up the body of Ju Zi(orange), hee hee is rubbing in mother front with a smile.

Ju Zi(orange) embraces tightly Little Yunhan, in this moment, this young person is all in her heart, when is hugging the son, she has that substantial feeling. At this time, her anything does not think that completely immerses in the happiness of son.

“Ju Zi(orange).”The slight sound appeared at this time in her ear.

The Ju Zi(orange) whole body trembles, Little Yunhan in bosom felt immediately mother's change, has looked up to her, “mother, you how?”

Ju Zi(orange) has gawked, eye socket was instantaneously was red, at the same time, most important man of two in her life simultaneously appeared unexpectedly, this feeling, is not really able to describe in the spoken language.

She wants to tell the kid in bosom, that once came by the person who he was called the father, she more wants to lead this kid to put into during the arms of that fellow together!

So long as thinks of here, her heart, is similar to by the boiling hot boiling water hot is consoled generally, not being able to say is the pain or the comfort.

Because as if never will arrive on that day, when at this time. These two men all in front of her, in her heart long.

The god several seconds, that sound again had not appeared, Ju Zi(orange) has kissed one on the son face. Said: “Yunhan, mother a little matter must process, you go out to play with the aunt first.”At the same time was saying, she beckons, naturally had the maidservant to come, has picked Little Yunhan. Ju Zi(orange) waved, the maidservants all got down.

Before she arrives at her desk sits down, returns to normal the mood that reluctantly are surging, thinking aloud main road that muttered: “Do not come, here strengthened the security. Once you appear, will immediately be discovered.”

She wants to have a look at his appearance! But at this time obviously is not good opportunity. Gradually calms down her, in heart also cannot help but raises several points of surprised mood.

She thinks that to here defense, Huo Yuhao they not be at present impossible to have the opportunity to look for itself again. Because during these constructions of entire Imperial Family housing, all searches to observe the level to aim in Limit Douluo now! Ju Zi(orange) cannot sleep every day, can only restore wearily through meditate.

How long such time must insist, she does not know that Xu Tianran has issued the order in any case, was waiting for that momentarily the retaliation that may present. Meanwhile, now the empire industry is increasing the effort search. Before had not found that two Limit Douluo corpse, Xu Tianran will not relax easily.

He is also thinking must unify entire Continent, at this time, nobody feared death compared with him.

The Huo Yuhao sound resounds once more, “we will not appear, here situation I also search the clarity that observes with Spiritual Detection. You have anything to plan. How we must cope with Xu Tianran, did you think?”

On the Ju Zi(orange) face reveals a forced smile, said: “Thinks you could not come, all plans must carry on. Now the defense of temporary temporary palace was really too stern, could not find any loophole to exist. Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp surrounds and protects completely side him. Simultaneously also has the massive powerhouses, wants in this case to strike to kill him, only if the storm. But, the storm is almost is impossible to complete! Therefore, we can do now, only then waited for that waits for him to expose weaknesses, how long can you wait for?”

“We and others.”Huo Yuhao saying without hesitation, is not he does not have the patience, but is these energies of his within the body does not have the patience!

Present he, constantly no longer withstands is coming from the Spiritual Power oppression as well as the fluctuation of Long Xiaoyao of huge Soul Power Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler. At the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus intensity, somewhat accepted unexpectedly, he continues the time now, cultivates, all fuses these strengths. Therefore, here matter must be solved as soon as possible is good.

But after he cannot wait till practice to complete, comes back again, Huo Yuhao has the premonition, oneself this closing up, certainly is historical longest one time that practice, perhaps is the year, even may be ten years. This no one can reach an agreement, perhaps at that time, Continent already had the great change. Therefore, before closing up, he must handle to be good here matter.

The Ju Zi(orange) brow wrinkles, “can't wait? That I could not think of means temporarily. Xu Tianran suspects now seriously, actually obtains him to trust very much, has Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp. His side these hide the powerhouse in hidden place. He is during the protections of these powerhouses every day. But around the temporary palace, had already arranged the Soul Guidance Array place of maximum intensity, once the slightest sign of trouble appears, Soul Guidance Array will immediately start. Although the intensity and High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device compares also has the disparity, but defends the attack of Limit Douluo very much to have confidence. You said that in this case, how making us begin to him?”

Looks at the helplessness on Ju Zi(orange) face, Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “Ju Zi(orange), in front of the honorable person did not tell the lie. If I have not guessed wrong, now this aspect, there is your certain building ingredient. You do this, for must frame by planting stolen goods on to that two Limit Douluo on, I said right? Such being the case, you definitely have subsequent party. Side Xu Tianran should have your person. I have not talked circuitously with you, creates an opportunity to us, I create a miracle for you. How you must control Sun-Moon Empire in the future I, no matter, so long as you cash to talk too much, within ten years do not attack, were OK.”

On the Ju Zi(orange) face has not revealed any surprised, sighed, said: “Why you must such understand me. Do you know that this is not very good. This will make me have the fantasy to your heart in as before.”

“That also can only be fantasy.”The Tang Wutong coldly sound resounds.

Ju Zi(orange) complexion changed changed, said: “The present opportunity is not very good, I can create an opportunity of getting rid to you, but, after getting rid, is very difficult to guarantee that your securities, I do not think that you die here. Therefore, I hope that you wait. When a more appropriate opportunity begins again.”

Huo Yuhao firm [say / way]: “It is not good, we and others. Must begin immediately, as for our safety, you do not need to manage, we have the means to withdraw. You created an opportunity of getting rid to be enough to us.”

Ju Zi(orange) surprised [say / way]: “Do you such have confidence?”

Huo Yuhao light [say / way]: “I can tell you several news. First, Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui truly died, is we aids them, then they died in our front. As for Holy Spirit Cult, you do not need to be worried, the Holy Spirit Cult almost complete high level had been killed by us, is forever impossible to pose the threat to you again. The Holy Spirit Cult headquarters in Evil Spirit Forest, their commodities were also used nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to ruin by me surely, at that time had alarmed Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler.”

“Ah?”Ju Zi(orange) surprised has stood, her these time was startled, opens wide the eyes. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, that is what kind of existence Ah?

Belongs to that side the Douluo Continent three countries, actually too had not understood. But is the Sun-Moon Empire person, listens to the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler legend was too many, are too really many. Sun-Moon Empire even names own imperial Soul Engineer Corp with Evil Tyrant, in some sense, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler regarding Sun-Moon Empire, looks like the totem is ordinary.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong encountered Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler unexpectedly, moreover now can also live coming back, it can be imagined their strengths strong.

“Are you all right? Has injured?”Ju Zi(orange) asked anxiously, her mouth asked that although was your character, may in fact she ask that who was very obvious.

Huo Yuhao said: “Evil Tyrant died, was killed by us. Now you should understand, our confidence where. Zongli Wu and Feng Ling also died. This is we give your gift. Now you did not have extra worries, the urgent matter, has killed Xu Tianran. How later you, are those words, the Sun-Moon Empire domestic matter I do not manage. I only want to complete this commitment with you, then I must find the place to practice some time with Wutong with concentration.”

Ju Zi(orange) was silent, she lowers the head slightly, does not let Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong sees her eye pupil. Huo Yuhao can feel that the Ju Zi(orange) this time mind fluctuation is very fierce, obviously is pondering anything high-speed.

He had not urged, but is waiting for silently, at this time, must give the time that she ponders.

Long time!

Ju Zi(orange) gains ground, look became very firm, did not have formerly tender feelings honey intent again, that murdered resolute War-God Empress to come back.

“You wait a bit here, I exit, urges to go faster. Begins, tonight.”Left behind these words, the Ju Zi(orange) half step left the room, went toward outside.

Huo Yuhao is actually very curious, in the situation of this strict monitoring, how she to stimulate to movement this matter? To dispatch these her person, perhaps is not easy! Because in the temporary palace range the motions of all people in various Surveying Soul Guidance Device covering scopes, she are War-God Empress, at this time, one of the certainly monitored main targets.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-607-part-3





Volume 13

#608 - The Feast Kills


Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection has been covering the entire temporary palace, is following the Ju Zi(orange) form.

He discovered with amazement that Ju Zi(orange) is looks for Xu Tianran unexpectedly, but, the speed that she walks is not all the way quick, does not seem any exceptionally.

However, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection, in the observation capability must absolutely above these Surveying Soul Guidance Device.

At least, these Surveying Soul Guidance Device are impossible to investigate the Ju Zi(orange) heartbeat, pulse and mind to fluctuate these slight places, but Huo Yuhao cultivated by present own mind to has actually been able to achieve.

In this case, he has been feeling the overall change of Ju Zi(orange), has discovered some clue gradually.

First, the Ju Zi(orange) petty action were too many, walks, often being coquettish, makes a time petty action every time time, her heartbeat has the trend of obvious acceleration. Although the acceleration is not big, moreover does not have any stop, but changes has, the mind fluctuation will also stiffen.

This does not act itself to cause absolutely, can only be because her thinking and acts the significance that itself has.

It seems like that she already had been really ready! Even if through Spiritual Detection, Huo Yuhao is also uncertainty, actually Ju Zi(orange) has made anything.

Enough after 20 minutes, Ju Zi(orange) found Xu Tianran, with him in the same place, does not know that was saying anything. Also about half double-hour, occasionally will have some people after Ju Zi(orange) formerly once the place of process. These person common characteristics, that is the heartbeat acceleration and mind fluctuation is fierce.

Such person are not many, about seven and eight appearances, but person who former Ju Zi(orange) after place walked, had several hundreds fully, in several hundred people, these seven and eight people was very not conspicuous. Nobody will discover radically they have anything not to be right, this is any Surveying Soul Guidance Device is impossible to make to judge.

Huo Yuhao eyes narrows the eyes, said to Tang Wutong: “Ju Zi(orange) should use a secret contact way, as for the way is anything. I do not know, but the effect should be very good.”

Tang Wutong asked to Huo Yuhao in a low voice: “Do we such wait? You said that she can threaten us? A moment ago she when listened to you saying that struck to kill Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, the mood had the fierce fluctuation obviously. Moreover is indistinct has fear mood to appear. In an individual heart presents fear, will possibly take some not sane action. Although she has the friendship to you, but clearly, in her heart, her son is most important. Right, son. Her son? You have a look, her son where?”

A Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection revolution, the attention will seek for Little Yunhan.

Quick, he discovered that Xu Yunhan in being away from another room of Ju Zi(orange) this room not far away. Had not been shifted. This discovery, let Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong relaxed.

Such that just like Tang Wutong said that in the Ju Zi(orange) heart, is her son who first level wants, therefore. In this case, she kept the son, but is not shifts, very much obviously was does not have the evil intention to Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong. Otherwise, will she make the beloved son place oneself in the strategic place?

Ju Zi(orange) comes back, after is two double-hour, outside weather gradually faded out. In the evening will soon approach.

Opened the door, Ju Zi(orange) dispatches to draw back the maidservant immediately, a person walked into the room.

Her breath until this time, started becomes is somewhat rapid, after all, this time matter was really too big. Those who aim is now the monarchs in Continent first empire! Once is defeated, that is beyond redemption. Not only she must be finished, son's the position of crown prince can also end. Ju Zi(orange) too understood Xu Tianran. Therefore, when handles these matters especially to be careful.

After Ju Zi(orange) turns back own table, muttered thought aloud: “After a double-hour. The weather will get dark completely. Upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device completely from exploding. Various Surveying Soul Guidance Device of ground will lose the effect temporarily. At least in half double-hour, anybody does not have the means to restore these survey effects. Therefore, opportunity that you begin, in these Surveying Soul Guidance Device before exploding. Then while runs away randomly.”

“Passes half double-hour again, is his supper time, today, his supper invited six nine levels of Soul Engineer to dine together, this is his custom. I will ask Old Kong to protect my son. Other matter, I do not know. In that six nine levels of Soul Engineer, without my person. But besides them, other nine levels of Soul Engineer, will not begin temporarily. Linkage defense guard shield, only meets in all upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device after exploding, will release. Is worth being worried that truly, is the Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp person, they have protected in the temporary palace surrounding, most approaches Xu Tianran, once that side Xu Tianran had problems. These Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer, will overtake immediately.”

“Xu Tianran oneself, 11 nine levels of Defensive Soul Guidance Device, all are triggering, various effects have, can defend various attacks. Spiritual System, the physical attack, has. After Consecrate Hall provides these nine levels of Soul Guidance Device consecrate evaluates, even if Limit Douluo, in half double-hour, is impossible to break through on him completely all defenses. This present is the biggest problem that you must face.”

“I suggested that if you attack, carries on a way, or physical attack, either mind attack. This can not make all Defensive Soul Guidance Device have an effect. On the other hand, the mind attack is much better, Yuhao most excels at these, but what now Xu Tianran main guard is that two Limit Douluo, is primarily the physics to defend. Therefore, I estimate on him nine levels of Soul Guidance Device defense classes, total quantity not over four. Yuhao, as the matter stands, do you have confidence? Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp the gate pulse will come in he suffers attack for a while. Even if in the temporary palace the topography is narrow, cannot make them display comprehensively, but they, so long as clashes is Xu Tianran resists the attack, is enough to the time that he runs away.”

Huo Yuhao continuously in silently listens to Ju Zi(orange) to narrate, Ju Zi(orange) spoke of here time, elegant face already slightly some blood flushes.

“Don't you plan to use your person?”Huo Yuhao light asking.

The Ju Zi(orange) respite slightly is rapid, “if you have definitely grasp, I......”

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “This matter, who dares to say one have the absolute assurance, since you grasped Consecrate Hall, must make them also go into action.”

The Ju Zi(orange) pupil contracts suddenly, fierce has stood from own position, “what did you and you say?”

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, said: “Did I speak incorrectly? Can transfer that to have Old Kong of father of titles nine levels of Soul Engineer, haven't you controlled entire Consecrate Hall?”

The breath of Ju Zi(orange) somewhat is obviously rapid, looks at Huo Yuhao, the look cloudy clear uncertain twinkle. After long time, on the face reveals a forced smile, “you were really too intelligent, you can actually through a little clues see that I grasped Sun-Moon Empire imperial family Consecrate Hall, this made me very surprised.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Actually I have not been able completely to affirm, but I can actually affirm now. Actually, the clues are unimportant, more importantly your confidence was too full. Why you can think one can after Xu Tianran was struck kills controls the Sun-Moon Empire aspect rapidly? If not the back has the powerful support, this is impossible to achieve. You now were very big in the fame of military, but this is insufficient, now is at least insufficient. The support of military, but also being insufficient makes you be able to suppress Imperial Family, preserves your son's throne. When you said Old Kong will help you protect the crown prince, if I am not clear, that was too silly. Although I do not know that you used any price to convince Old Kong, but there is his support, all your motions will be much easier. Even if no us, you should have not the small chance of success, after all you are the Xu Tianran empress. The Soul Guidance Device defense capability is strong, is impossible not to have the flaw. Therefore, even if we do not come, it is estimated that you also meet after some time, waits for Xu Tianran to be lax the time begins.”

Ju Zi(orange) has smiled suddenly, the chuckle shaking the head, was saying: “I believe that your talent all in the practice, by the brains, eventually compared with me must almost, now look like, I made a mistake. However, I am very happy, but why cannot tell you. You said right, I have the complete plan, even if no you to coordinate, I have many assurances. Old Kong to my only request is, cannot use any Consecrate Hall person to complete this matter. Regardless of successfully with the failure, and Consecrate Hall has nothing to do, but Consecrate Hall will only support the emperor. Therefore, I do not have the means to help you through the manpower really directly. The plan of motion has two, one is you, another, is I.”

At the same time was saying, Ju Zi(orange) lifts the hand slowly, reveals the unusual beautiful nail that oneself repair, on the nail is putting on the pearl cuticle cream, seems very beautiful.

“In my nail has the opium pill, Xu Tianran each dish, has the special person to taste first, in these people, was bribed by me. I at our evening banquet, under the toxin in a dish, only will occupy a dish scrap region, another side that person in tasting, will taste, gives Xu Tianran time, is one side of this that I intoxicate. Because after is on the table, will intoxicate, therefore, I will have very big assurance to succeed.”

“disadvantage that but such makes lies, after some people know that Xu Tianran is the poison, but perishing, will certainly have many disturbances. But now, if strikes to kill him through the surprise attack, is actually the best opportunity, because all people think that can be the retaliation of that two Limit Douluo.”

----------------------------------------------------

Four finished, at the end of the month final time, does obeisance to ask the monthly ticket to support!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-608-part-1





Volume 13

#608 - The Feast Kills


Huo Yuhao silent, “hopes that you will keep your promise.”

Ju Zi(orange) cannot see Huo Yuhao, her vision in this flickers, suddenly becomes profound, then said with the sound that sinking to congeal: “My meeting.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Said it and meant it.”

Xu Tianran has been very anxious for serveral days, since thinks on that day after is the flawless motion made the careless mistake unexpectedly, his was not happy.

Almost all Bright Capital City high-end strengths all are used to defend this temporary temporary palace now, the authority of person is bigger, more regards as important to own life, why after this was also the line of kings old, very easy wants to track down the immortal to be the same.

Xu Tianran fears death very much, he wants to be a eternity emperor in Douluo Continent history, he must unify entire Continent, he cannot certainly die.

Although numerous nine levels of Soul Engineer including Old Kong has analyzed for him, that two Limit Douluo live possibly approaches in zero infinitely, even if lives, received irreversible heavy wound inevitably, soon will die. But, in the Xu Tianran heart, actually as before filled worried. He can think, if that two Limit Douluo, only then the strength of final striking? Then, their without a doubt this attack function on oneself! Therefore, he does not hesitate at all costs defends, to guard against this situation that may have. Wants into an eternity emperor, lives is most important.

The body is carrying 11 nine levels of Soul Guidance Device, including wear Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, even if not take off in sleeping, can appear to appear in the Xu Tianran mentality.

Every day at any time, his side at least over over six nine levels of Soul Engineer will be protecting . Moreover, for serveral days, he had never left temporary palace one step, whole person anxious is stronger and stronger.

Because he does not know how long own such condition must maintain, outside simply does not have any news about that two Limit Douluo to pass on, is this. Anxiety in his heart is serious.

“Your majesty, you should eat a meal. Sir who you invited arrived.”In waits on respectful saying.

“Um.”Xu Tianran nodded, raises head mask. Went out of the room, arrives hall that dines.

Even if around this dining room. Has small Soul Guidance Protective Cover to arrange, prepares strain at any time.

Six nine levels of Soul Engineer came a while, their duties besides accompanying Xu Tianran eat meal, a more vital duty naturally is to protect him, naturally, looks like in these six nine levels of Soul Engineer, more important is actually makes Xu Tianran relieved.

After the attack of that degree, that two Limit Douluo how possibly live getting down! But no one went back to say Xu Tianran to have groundless fears, recently this anxious king, had struck to kill in several to wait on successively.

“Is the people on one's own side. Everybody should not be polite, dines.”The Xu Tianran complexion is somewhat wooden, supper was very sumptuous, has chocked up a table, but for him. Even if delicacy delicacy, now is the taste is also ordinary with the nobility wax.

Six nine levels of Soul Engineer also appear very silent, is impolite, the respective food and drink, eats meal with an anxious king, is not any happy matter, after they also only want to finish eating the food. Sooner leaves. The life of nine levels of Soul Engineer are very busy, manufactures Soul Guidance Device, to experiment Soul Guidance Device, to design Soul Guidance Device, other matters that they govern, need them to control.

Drank several glasses of liquor, the Xu Tianran serious expression relaxed several points finally. Possibly because of the growth of age, in addition controls increase of power and influence. He now more and more in hobby cup thing. Especially recently, every night, must always depend upon the anaesthesia of alcohol to rest to be good to think.

In waited on is Xu Tianran but actually one glass of liquor, Xu Tianran has carried the wine class, on the face reveals a smile. Said: “Come, everybody consecrates, making us hobnob one cup, wishing my Sun-Moon army soon to quell Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries, series Continent.”

“Cheers!”Six nine levels of Soul Engineer hurry to carry the wine class to say with one voice.

Listens sound that they are acknowledging boisterously, how many minutes Xu Tianran was happier, six so formidable nine levels of aren't Soul Engineer, same must obey their order? This grasps the world advantage!

Before the wine class delivers to the lip, simultaneously raises glass to hobnob with other six nine levels of Soul Engineer. During this banqueted the normal situation, but, what nobody noted was, in they sent in the flash before oneself lip the quilt. In the wine class of everyone, quietly were many a common small vortex, this small vortex is the dark blue, today's meal liquor is the grape ferments, in that dark red liquor fluid, cannot see clue.

The grape ferments sour and sweet, the flavor is mellow, when six consecrate with Xu Tianran hobnobs this cup, the liquor fluid enters the throat, some of they actually strange feelings, this cup of grapes ferment, as if especially cool, drinks not in part of ones duty to gladden the heart, the comfort of not being able to say.

“Um? Does not know that is because your majesty offers wine, this glass of liquor drink the taste are really good!”Old nine levels of Soul Engineer said with a smile.

Xu Tianran actually in suddenly the complexion big change, suddenly turns head to look that waits on to nearby.

The same pot liquor, how possible previous cup and do the latter cup of flavors differ from? He remembers clearly, has not changed the wine pot very much. In time that this is frightened by the slightest sound, Xu Tianran regarding all slightest signs of trouble is particularly sensitive.

Those who made him quite relieved was, in that waited on has not had anything to change because of his gaze, instead was somewhat vacant, lowered the head, respectful [say / way]: “Your majesty, but can come one cup again?”

In time that Xu Tianran relaxes slightly, next one flickers, he and six nine levels of Soul Engineer complexions present actually simultaneously changed.

The cool liquor fluid, becomes ice-cold got up suddenly, after that enters the abdomen, should approach the body temperature the liquor fluid, actually likely suddenly starts to freeze general, the woods cold aura sends out to the whole body instantaneously, made each of them's body is one cold.

“It is not good!”Nine levels of Soul Engineer give a loud shout, the whole body ascended immediately mist, his response was nothing less than quick, the goal was also very simple, that by oneself powerful Soul Power, forced from within the body the beforehand liquor fluid.

However, this revolution Soul Power, had discovered is not right, although within the body Soul Power is as before powerful, is, that liquor fluid place visited, the bloodlines or Soul Power, as if must freeze, when his Soul Power moves with the ice-cold liquor fluid of that terror in the same place, will be being been freezing unexpectedly immediately, must be frozen including the energy, this is the fearful strength!

Xu Tianran in handling same matter, but after his Soul Power and that ice-cold move feels the incorrect time, the complexion immediately changed, becomes exceptionally ugly. This situation his first meeting, violently poisonous? This is he first thinks that besides the violent poisonousness, absolutely does not have other possibilities. The liquor that but, oneself drink, before on table, has tasted by the special person, and examines carefully, confirmed does not have the issue, might place to oneself in front, how to be possible? This is how possible!

Side arriving Xu Tianran that four black forms are quietly, before one of them a hand has caught, the neck that but actually in the liquor waits on, has raised him, in another three people, a person is observing all around vigilantly, on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device has been glittering the intense ray, the other two are arrive both hands behind Xu Tianran, stimulates to movement vigorous Soul Power, pours into to Xu Tianran within the body.

“Quick, passes on me to order, the blockade......”Xu Tianran shouted to clear the way in a low voice. He discovered that oneself this time spoke became difficult, because the throat as if must be frozen, in the speech, the mouth will even spout the white fog.

This is overbearing violently poisonous! Actually can be so the degree. Did the retaliation of Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui, come finally?

Although Xu Tianran is panic-stricken, but finally is calm, after all, in this room, him, 11 Titled Douluo rank powerhouses, outside also has formidable Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp in addition fully, some these many powerhouses, even if that two Limit Douluo begins, will not have will immediately possibly strike to kill. But that violently poisonous, regardless of being strong, takes own cultivating as, in a short time will not have the matter, thinks the means disintoxicating again slowly and that's the end.

“Useless, your order is impossible to have a character to pass on, including here all.”

That idle black form just the body exited, the strength rebound that does not have to resist is returned by one, on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device of whole body, has covered incorruptible.

In the entire dining room, has all covered a light distortion ray, all of outside, is unable to appear in the sensation of numerous position Titled Douluo rank powerhouse again.

This and this are what kind of strength Ah?

Although that six nine levels of Soul Engineer are feeling blood more and more ice-cold in within the body, but will not resign oneself to extinction, immediately has opened own Soul Guidance Protective Cover, protects itself, then revolves around Xu Tianran all round, vigilant looks to all around.

Two forms, appear slowly from illusory, tranquil appearance in Xu Tianran as well as in front of numerous Sun-Moon Empire powerhouse.

When Xu Tianran sees clearly the person, slightly stares, at present this person, he is far familiar, but absolutely has actually seen.

“You and you are Shrek Academy......”Xu Tianran surprised looks at front person.

“Yes, I am Shrek Academy Huo Yuhao, this, is my girlfriend, Tang Wutong. Very accidental? Your majesty.”Huo Yuhao be with smile on the face saying.

Xu Tianran coldly [say / way]: “Huo Yuhao, is you to select ten, has defeated my Sun-Moon Empire powerhouse?”

Huo Yuhao nodded, “good, is I.”

-------------------------------------------------

The new month, the plea guarantees a minimum the monthly ticket, this is our last month, it is expected that peerless Tang Sect within 20 th will finish in half a month. Last month, did not ask position, but hopes that we can have a glorious memory, thank you.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-608-part-2





Volume 13

#608 - The Feast Kills


Xu Tianran coldly snorted, “good, I must acknowledge that perhaps in the younger generation, nobody can compare favorably with you, but, you dare so to pull rank, merely two people, dare to come to my Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace, but also dares to sneak attack me, you believe that today you also do have to live the possibility of departure?”

Huo Yuhao he he smiles, said: “Your majesty, you thought many, should consider that this issue, was not I, but was you are right.”

Together light shadow, appearance of being quietly behind Huo Yuhao.

Numerous position Soul Engineer on the scene already are the heartstrings tied tight, feels Huo Yuhao here change, almost first launched the attack to him.

Glares discussed instantaneously that the powerful Soul Power fluctuation, making the entire hall shiver.

Several Soul Engineer startle, the attack has not faced Huo Yuhao, but to nearby hall bombardment in the past, their goals was very simple, makes the sound, alarms outside Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, so long as this goal has been achieved, then did not need to worry. At present the strengths of these two young people are strong, the impossible and entire Sun-Moon Empire high-end strength contends.

However, what making all people dumbfounded was, after their launches on attack, which direction facing, the ultimate objective, unexpectedly all was Huo Yuhao, but surrounding all rays, all twisted.

Before Huo Yuhao body, a strange whirlpool is revolving baseless, the whirlpool presents is the ice blue color, after these light beams enter in the ice blue color whirlpool, has not sent out the sound unexpectedly, disappeared in that vortex completely. But the form that Huo Yuhao behind presents completely has also appeared.

That is a beautiful female, has the human feminine upper body, but also has the strange attractive fish tail, the big eye, is having the light happy expression. The clear and wonderful singing sound, lingers in the entire main hall instantaneously.

On Huo Yuhao, Soul Ring rays shine. Present he, early has not needed to conceal his mixing to trade the color.

First Soul Ring, no longer is pure white like the jade, but presents for the brilliant bright golden color, then, most common Soul Ring is also the black, but more is actually, the red, the conspicuous red, is having the golden trace red.

The Huo Yuhao low and deep sound spreads presents in everyone ear, is frightening their mind, “spirit! Soul! Shake! Explodes!”

In entire hall, air slight fluctuation, but presents all people, including Xu Tianran, the body actually burst out the intense ray, they were used to defend the mind attack Defensive Soul Guidance Device, all immediately burst out the extremely intense ray. In the entire hall, turned into piece of honored world immediately.

If merely is this, that was also not anything, achieved the apex in that brilliance the flash, a series of to shatter sounds also along with it resounding. Including Xu Tianran, presents on each Soul Engineer, at least to shatter mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device.

Reason that said is at least, because on two people does not have mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device to shatter. Because, on them has not carried this type Defensive Soul Guidance Device.

mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device, in various Defensive Soul Guidance Device, in nine levels of this levels, is particularly most difficult to manufacture. Therefore initially Ju Zi(orange) to Zongli Wu proposed condition time, Zongli Wu also can only be hold one's noses to recognize.

In nine levels of Soul Engineer, is not each will provide this Defensive Soul Guidance Device, after all, excels at mind attack Soul Master or is Soul Beast eventually is minority.

However, today, at this time, Soul Engineer that these two have not provided, is actually doomed only to become the tragedy.

Although they promote the limit their Spiritual Power immediately, spiritual sea in brain has even seethed with excitement, but, could they actually possibly resist one just to obtain the Limit Douluo mind attack of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler formidable mind Soul Ring?

In the stuffy pshaw, these two nine levels of Soul Engineer simultaneously the seven orifices hemorrhage, the body is swaying, can only not make itself get down reluctantly but actually.

Looks color with amazement in them, but also wants to counterattack, suddenly, in the air shook once more, once again approached with formerly the terrorist attack of similar intensity, this time, although does not have first time to be so fierce, but also similar terror.

“Bang and Bang.”Two, formerly that two did not have mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device Soul Engineer, almost explodes to perish immediately, immediately the blood and brain fluid, splash everywhere is.

However, at this time, other people could not take care of oneself similarly, did not have the time to care about them.

Mermaid Double Chant, enabling the Spiritual System attack of Huo Yuhao to start continuously twice, this is divine skill general existence! In Huo Yuhao all auxiliary abilities, Mermaid Double Chant Spiritual System, can be among the best absolutely, is next to Three Eyed Golden Lion takes to Huo Yuhao that several destiny Soul Ability.

Second round Soul Shaking Burst erupts time, presents almost all Soul Engineer to be simultaneously stuffy snort|hum makes noise, bodies fall to draw back, going all out wants to resist with own mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device. But, their mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device already to shatter.

Only then Xu Tianran the body, his body has 11 nine levels of Defensive Soul Guidance Device immediately, defends the mind attack has four. Moreover, his Defensive Soul Guidance Device, by the quality, absolutely is now existence of Sun-Moon Empire most top, therefore, although he seems very distressed, but, two rounds Soul Shaking Burst, made him ruin Defensive Soul Guidance Device.

Body Yang Dao, the front jumps backward projects a glare, promoting the body of Xu Tianran to fly upside down suddenly.

In any place of this temporary palace, Xu Tianran gave itself to prepare the escape route. He can feel that at present and subordinates were fell certainly into front in the formidable domain class ability of this person, in this case, wanted to find a way out, can only look for the opportunity by own memory, in him behind not the far ground, the tunnel, inside also had the transport unit, so long as can rush to there, he had the opportunity to be separated, but once the tunnel opened, outside naturally also knows that he received to attack here. Again does not have anything to be fearful.

Since what a pity, Huo Yuhao arrived here, has calculated own combat capability.

Two rounds Soul Shaking Burst start at the same time, other attacks of Huo Yuhao also opened.

“Bang, bang, bang and bang......”low and deep bellow, in the Soul Shaking Burst remaining prestige still, follows to erupt, but this time, the attack is actually not comes by outside, but from inside to outside.

ice-cold in within the body, sudden burst. The bloodlines of freeze, have had the fierce explosion unexpectedly. This is explodes in within the body!

Including Xu Tianran, the people on the scene, seven people have drunk the beforehand ice liquor.

In that liquor naturally is not the violent poisonousness, but came from Huo Yuhao Absolute Ice Soul Power.

If changes individual, is absolutely impossible to send in match within the body own Soul Power for instance, on the scene is the Titled Douluo level powerhouses, the sensation of everyone is extremely high, feels the Soul Power fluctuation and mind to fluctuate, or a wee bit evil intentions, they will have a vigilance. Reason that anything had not discovered that is not because their sensations were weaken, but is Huo Yuhao conceals was really good.

Relies on own formidable strength, Huo Yuhao is hiding own aura, including the Soul Power fluctuation, the side that all conceals is good. Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus produces, but whirlpool Soul Power, has the completely reserved special effect, in addition he desirably controls. Before these people drink the flash, Huo Yuhao selects seven fingers void, seven rolls own Absolute Ice Soul Power, integration of being quietly to their liquor fluids, lets they drink wine at the same time, has drunk this Soul Power.

Reserved of Absolute Ice, erupts to their within the body, therefore they will feel that is not right. But these Absolute Ice Soul Power itself also contain this Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power, this makes him be able to maintain the control to these strengths.

The bloodlines freeze, that is ice, but Huo Yuhao another divine skill, is Ice Explosion Technique!

Ice Explosion Technique that erupts in within the body, even if the Titled Douluo rank powerhouse cannot withstand. On Xu Tianran puts on many Defensive Soul Guidance Device, is impossible to defend in own body.

Therefore, in situation that at this time Ice Explosion Technique assumes an awe-inspiring pose suddenly, besides formerly two already by Soul Engineer that Soul Shaking Burst was killed by shock, another five people, sent out a sad and shrill pitiful yell all, within the body thunder, immediately made them lose the revolt ability instantaneously.

The body of Titled Douluo without doubt is extremely tenacious, Huo Yuhao will not have the means too many Soul Power to integrate their within the body, making them drink. Therefore, the explosive force limits to a certain extent, but also is not enough to be fatal to them, but that fierce pain, is actually not casual can endure.

Huo Yuhao starts at the same time, Tang Wutong also moved.

Teleportation, making her flicker below presents behind Xu Tianran that two Men in Black behind. The radiant Purple gold colored light glow glistens suddenly, simply does not have any gaudiness, the double fist is uneven.

These Xu Tianran shadow bodyguards have the greatly strengthened strength, but, what this strength must look to face is. When their matches are Limit Douluo, what means can they have?

Dazzling golden light sticks out suddenly. Two wear on the Humanoid Soul Guidance Device shadow guard to burst out a series of glares, but, these glares all in that is sending out in front of the powerful fist of dragon roar one by one to shatter. When the fist of Tang Wutong falls in their Humanoid Soul Guidance Device surface finally, their results have been doomed.

Tang Wutong double fist bang flies two people, the tender body jumped, from the sky collides with happen to Huo Yuhao that moves sideways to come together.

This time they, look like two groups of energies are common, in the instance of collision, each other fuses unexpectedly, and burst out the unequalled formidable aura. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-608-part-3





Volume 13

#609 - The Rulers Fall


This time, even if were the Spiritual Disturbance domain that Huo Yuhao formerly arranged does not have the means to cover their aura, the terrifying mind fluctuation, erupted instantaneously outward, letting everyone in temporary palace the clear feeling.

Huge vertical eye emerges out of thin air, this only vertical eye is in itself the strange golden color, around the golden color, is actually sending out the noble Purple gold colored light mark. The terrifying halo in the next quarter expansion, a handle handle strange small hammer, shortly will flood in the entire hall.

Mantra Amidst the Void, Spiritual Tempest! Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong one of the four big Martial Soul Fusion techniques.

This is also in their Martial Soul Fusion techniques, the most formidable mind attack method, in order to achieves completes this line of tasks in a short time the goal, they any had not kept the hand.

At this time, even if Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui ressurection, in the face of the attacks of their this level, can only take shelter from wind temporarily auspicious, does not dare to touch with them directly hardly. Only if that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler has not died, can contend in the mind level reluctantly.

Naturally, perhaps these two characters most times do not have any practical significance.

Entire dining room, instantaneously ripped smashing, that clearly is the attack of mind level, has actually achieved the destructive power of entity degree. That several received heavy wound in Ice Explosion Technique, after formerly nine levels of Soul Engineer of Soul Shaking Burst baptism, body bunch of rays unceasingly blasted out, finally blasts out, naturally is their heads.

Incessantly is they, that several shadow guards so, under the mind level attack of so high intensity, on them absolutely do not have the strength that any can contend with directly similarly.

This mind storm comes was really too fearful, on defense capability strongest Xu Tianran, has blasted out two mind nine levels of Defensive Soul Guidance Device one after another, reluctantly resisted the Spiritual Tempest prestige energy.

However, this time Xu Tianran, the moral nature deep place was actually angry a despair. Within the body severe pain, making him support to run away now becomes extremely difficult.

In the Tang Wutong hand has gripped Golden Dragon Spear, but in the Huo Yuhao hand is grasping a handle short blade edge.

The short blade edge sweeps away, ices the blue ray to appear together, around the Xu Tianran body, the space within diameter ten meters range was frozen completely. That drops to the close Absolute Zero terrifying ultra-low temperature instantaneously, making him support Defensive Soul Guidance Device Soul Power to drop. What about fearing, Huo Yuhao such does, to let him unexpectedly is unable to move temporarily.

The dining room by the Spiritual Tempest scrap, everywhere dust flew upwards, when Xu Tianran can see clearly the surrounding all, two people who he sees changed.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong vanished, reappears, only then that familiar old face.

Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao.

“You and you......”Xu Tianran even could not clarify now, in oneself front outcome is Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao, was Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

If makes him choose, he rather believes is the former, because the former two people after all are Limit Douluo! But Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong actually that young.

Even if this time can survive by luck, if comes to attack these two to have the person of Limit Douluo strength, unexpectedly is the Shrek Academy powerhouses, how he also rules the Continent Ah? Limit Douluo terror, he already looks on Dragon Emperor Douluo and Grim Reaper Douluo was clear. So long as is slightly intelligent, does not fall into a trap, Limit Douluo on this world, as before is invincible existence.

Thought that what a pity, he wants to fortunately survive how long cannot maintain eventually, because he saw vertical eye, appears in “Long Xiaoyao”vertical eye on forehead.

In vertical eye, the ray glitters, the Purple gold color ray hit together instantaneously in his head.

Last nine levels of mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device finally to shatter. Xu Tianran plants immediately ** bare presents in all person front feelings.

Ended, he knows that he ended!

Xu Tianran pain has closed eyes, he understands that since oneself tople days fear is right, before the genuine powerhouse, his strength was too tiny. The strength of Limit Douluo level, can let on this world eventually any authority death.

If can come one time again, he does not hesitate at all costs, must obtain the understanding of Ye Xishui, which Grim Reaper Douluo if there is, at present these two people possibly kill oneself?

To finally, him has become completely clearly aware, at present these two, possibly are not Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao, that Absolute Ice ability, the ability of concealment, is that two Limit Douluo did not have. Therefore, they can only be Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, although does not know why they become so formidable, but, he can affirm. Naturally, all these present becomes is unimportant.

Merpeople second level plays, appeared in this crucial time. The second Purple gold colored light glow almost flickers below, fell on Xu Tianran.

“Pū”gigantic head of Xu Tianran, instantaneous to shatter. The brain fluid scatters, one generation of kings, left this world eventually, even even/including Quanshi have not stayed behind.

Finally to get rid of Xu Tianran, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong relaxed.

Although a moment ago entire process all during their grasps, moreover suppressed completely has presented all people, but, they have done actually also utmost.

Before beginning, they have determined the tactic, is primarily mind to attack. Therefore, the number of times that Tang Wutong begins are few, takes Huo Yuhao as the main attack.

Facts showed that their procedures are absolutely correct. Xu Tianran dies eventually, in Huo Yuhao merpeople second level has played under Soul Assault.

In the sky, rays glitter, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp responded that the soul leads to defend the guard shield to open, under all will cover completely.

In the Huo Yuhao mouth sends out a long and loud cry, huge Black Dragon, soars suddenly, changes into light shadow, has attacked toward above light barrier. But Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong personal appearance dodges, was hidden in the air.

The time that they present although is very short, but Huo Yuhao believes that by Sun-Moon Empire the Surveying Soul Guidance Device ability, certain saw clearly their appearance now, this was enough. They have created enough opportunity to Ju Zi(orange).

Linkage defense guard shield, regarding, even if the top powerhouse, is very troublesome issues. Especially is displayed by Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, is so.

What a pity, this time, what they face is two Limit Douluo.

Initially, Xu Tianran wanted to surround Ye Xishui time, use, but High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, was because he knows, general linkage defense guard shield, even if were Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp displays, was impossible to resist the destruction of Limit Douluo.

Now is also so.

Butter of Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife in Huo Yuhao hand just like cutting into is ordinary, has cut open a slit front linkage defense guard shield, the Tang Wutong double fist is uneven, is big slit bang, their personal appearance dodges, under the stealth condition that in Imitation Soul Ability maintains escapes instantaneously.

Ju Zi(orange) has been waiting for in own room anxiously, that when Spiritual Tempest has thunders fiercely resounds, her whole body cannot help but shivered, in that fierce shivering simultaneously, in her heart also had two entirely different mood.

One type is stimulated, if Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong have succeeded, all issues that then, she faces can be easily solved.

Another type is frightened, her present very has mixed feelings. She despaired to Huo Yuhao now, she knows, oneself in any event impossible and he in together, without any opportunity. But Huo Yuhao currently has becomes more and more formidable, is not she can control completely, even might threaten her rule to the empire in the future very much. Even but if is this, when she thinks of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong when is defeated the aspect that must face, in her heart as before subconscious production intense fear. This fear from the innermost soul, is a mother suddenly thought when own child's father may have an accident that feeling, this is not in the reason can control.

“Ju Zi(orange)!”In this time, a sudden sound, is awakening from these two clearly opposite mood Ju Zi(orange). She almost does not have any concealing, completely subconscious calls out in alarm makes noise, “Yuhao.”

Must know, at this time in her room, but also has existences of numerous maidservant.

The maidservants had a scare by the Ju Zi(orange) this sudden shout, Ju Zi(orange) look one cold, must begin to eliminate a potential informant.

In the ear actually once more broadcasts the Huo Yuhao sound, “Ju Zi(orange) that I know, is always not a person of bloodthirsty.”

Ju Zi(orange) takes a deep breath, returns to normal the mood that reluctantly are surging, at this time, truly was not the good opportunity of silencing a witness of crime. His sinking sound shouted to clear the way: “Exits to me, if who dares to speak at a venture outside, after do not blame this, heavy hand being heartless.”

“Yes, empress empress.”The maidservants keep silent has drawn back. Ju Zi(orange) is almost somewhat impatient summoned in a low voice: “Yuhao? You and are you all right?”

In this time, outside is thundering intermittently resounds suddenly, just started, but also is similar to the bolt from the blue, but is quick, that intermittent thunderous changed into the big piece thunderstorm, resounds through sky over entire Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City.

Ju Zi(orange) said that the upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device chain explosion, finally started. That looks like the comprehensive survey that the eye of God has generally, finally temporarily lost the effect.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong personal appearance has also appeared in the next quarter, did not have existences of these Surveying Soul Guidance Device, they no longer need to worry that was discovered.

Sees Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong is well, Ju Zi(orange) as if relaxed, but also somewhat has mixed feelings.

“You......”Ju Zi(orange) subconscious saying, want to ask that also somewhat asked does not export.

Huo Yuhao has selected, said: “We have succeeded, Xu Tianran died, the forehead was been broken by my Soul Assault direct bang, with him in together ten powerhouses, all died. Now, we can retire after meritorious service, with your commitment, we have achieved, then, looked your.”

In the Ju Zi(orange) eye flashes through to wipe the wild with joy, tender body even shivers, “died, did he die really?”Although she is not willing to acknowledge that may in fact, Xu Tianran truly constrain in her heart mountain!

Huo Yuhao looks at Ju Zi(orange), in look were also many several points of other things.

“Ju Zi(orange), after this distinction, if you can keep the promise, perhaps, we later will not meet. You, take care.”Huo Yuhao sighed one to say lightly.

How regardless to say that at present this woman is also the female who first opens oneself heart, not long, in oneself heart had also fantasized she will change the mind. But, is predestined friends eventually unqualified.

The regret of Ju Zi(orange), won't Huo Yuhao be able to feel? However, he was impossible to turn head again, sometimes, opportunity, once has missed, is impossible to come. He had Tang Wutong, in heart could not accommodate other people again. Let alone, in his heart also understands that Ju Zi(orange) is impossible to give up having all now, not only for her, for the authority in her son and hand, even also has the hatred.

Ten years, this is can be the final time that Douluo Continent wins, ten years later will be what kind, Huo Yuhao is not clear.

Such that just like he said that this very possible is he and Ju Zi(orange) last time meets, because, then he must attack Limit Douluo, then, another world, is his goal. If his success, then, the matter on Douluo Continent, is not he can meddle really again. Let alone, his in this body and mind also has filled now confusedly, because he is not clear, actually another world is any appearance.

Ju Zi(orange) listened to his words, the complexion instantaneously becomes a paleness, “why? What do you want to make?”

Huo Yuhao sighed, said: “I had told you before, I and Wutong must find the place to close up, our strength promotion are too quick, now the body had not the small problem, how long this time closes up meets, finally how, we do not know, but at least several years will not appear again. Ju Zi(orange), keeps your commitment, otherwise, I did not mind that ruins you personally. We walked.”

Spoke these words, Huo Yuhao once more deep looked at her one eyes, is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, turns around to go, simultaneously is hidden in the air.

The tears, uncontrolled flow instantaneously, Ju Zi(orange) stands there, the whole person whole body shivers unusual fierce.

He walked, he such walked, a moment ago that flash, she feels really that perhaps she forever lost him, like such that he said that perhaps, this was last time meets. Real? Really is this?

“Ju Zi(orange), why? Why initially did you want such choice? If you had initially chosen him, puts aside the hatred, perhaps, will be more joyful than the present many. Is the hatred, so really important? Authority, really important? Ha Ha, ha ha ha ha!”

Laughing of Ju Zi(orange) hysteria makes noise, outside maidservants body shivering that cannot help but listens, also at this time, one group of people from distant place running over of hurriedly.

“Report! Seeks an interview War-God Empress.”

......

It is reported that everybody two good news, our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire tour to have the big movement.

The apple escape edition has gotten online officially, if the player has the machine of escape, can hurry first downloading to play, ices the fire the legal copy also to submit the apple to verify, believes that will be also quick and everybody meets \;

At my strong request, for the back coupling book friends, will be preparing a mysterious big activity with the gizmondo in the near future, any content keeps secret specifically temporarily, soon will get recently also online, this is one has never engaged in the big activity. And, has is the presents that under line can attain, total value over 1 million! Concrete is anything, pays attention continually our ** the platform, will inform everybody, is, must enter us to play to practice the level, the rank can be closely linked with the prize.

The downloading way joins our prestige as before first - platform, then clicks on the right bottom hand tour to download, downloads according to the operation explanation.

Joins the prestigious platform method to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication was our families. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-609





Volume 13

#610 - Seizes The Shed


Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, flies in the midair, in them behind not far away, entire Bright Capital City at this time is a confusion.

Not only because of the Xu Tianran death, because explosion of massive upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device.

The Xu Tianran death, limits in the small range at present knows that but in the sky that many upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device explode, is actually in entire Bright Capital City all people can see that this cannot cover.

Bright Capital City was chaotic, this chaotic, does not know how long wants to stabilize. But Huo Yuhao is very confident to Ju Zi(orange), Ju Zi(orange) had the wrist|skill, almost most situations, during her control, she, since prepared for must cope with Xu Tianran, certainly had early has prepared the good foreshadowing, the present is 11 takes.

Such leaves, even anything did not confess, has not gotten the Ju Zi(orange) affirmative answer, Huo Yuhao brought to be somewhat anxious, he who Tang Wutong was walking also knows. He wants to remain actually very much, looks at Ju Zi(orange) the Sun-Moon Empire internal integration, then keeps the promise. Within ten years not to Douluo Continent that side Star Luo and Dou Ling Empire resort to violence. This is the best choice. So long as there is him and Tang Wutong deterrent, he believes that in any event, Ju Zi(orange) does not dare to act rashly.

But, he actually has to walk, if not walk, he is Tang Wutong, might forever unable to get away very much.

That war, they Xu Tianran were not fake by Myriad Great Thunder method to get rid of a moment ago, but, their bodies, erupted the huge issue.

Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui kept the barrier of their within the body to present the obvious fissure, had the possibility of collapse anytime. Once this barrier collapsed, then, they the danger that may face overstates.

Especially Huo Yuhao, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler that Spiritual Power in his spiritual sea at crazy rebellion. Daydream Ice Silkworm must unable to suppress shortly, at this time, he Tang Wutong was even feeding in the Shrek Academy time not to have the news, they must find the place to dive to cultivate immediately, otherwise, faced was life and death Great Tribulation!

Therefore, he in a hurry had confessed several, brought Tang Wutong to leave Bright Capital City rapidly, flew in the Sky Soul Empire direction.

“Yuhao, are you what kind of?”Tang Wutong can feel clearly that this time Huo Yuhao, a palm icy coldness, but within the body Soul Power fluctuation is actually incomparable fierce, the body even is not sends out the strange brilliance, that is within the body Soul Power approached the performance of out-of-control!

Huo Yuhao complexion ugly: “Perhaps I must support do not live, we must find the place to practice immediately, otherwise troubled.”

Tang Wutong nodded, said: “Here, cannot wait again.”Under is piece of valley, because they the body have very major problem, leaves Bright Capital City time, even cannot attend to taking one's bearings, does not know where this is. Now anything could not attend, they approach the whereabouts to go immediately.

A Tang Wutong fist opened cutting a cavern to come out on the mountain wall directly, holds Huo Yuhao to worm one's way into. At this time, they even continually concealed without enough time do.

“You feel relieved the practice, we give you protector.”Snow Emperor and Ice Emperor simultaneously come out from Huo Yuhao within the body. Their complexions are very intense. Huo Yuhao at this time Soul Power and Spiritual Power in within the body were really too huge, at their experiences and eyesight, never has seen so huge fluctuation of energy, this as if has gone beyond the limit of this world, might occur from anytime exploding. If is really such, the beforehand all efforts wasted all previous efforts!

Huo Yuhao could not say including thanks words, can support is flying here, is his formidable automatic control ability is maintaining.

Sits falls to the ground, he with rapt attention, completely immerses Spiritual Power in immediately to his Soul Power control during.

Tang Wutong holds him to sit cross-legged to sit, oneself sit in him opposite. At this time they have not been able to carry on to practice through Hao Dong Power again . Moreover, they now Soul Power of respective within the body is extremely huge, now she cannot help Huo Yuhao. One face the issue is very big, in observing Huo Yuhao a while, had determined after he does not have the danger temporarily, Tang Wutong then also enters the meditate condition. She must first do, first maintains that barrier of oneself within the body, then said other.

But the barrier of Huo Yuhao within the body, actually irreversible little to shatter, has been similar to ocean waves general Soul Power, surges the reciprocation in his within the body.

mind Soul Nucleus, already came from Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler formidable Spiritual Power to fill, but Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus, came from the Long Xiaoyao Soul Power puffiness similarly, his body looks like a big balloon, has gasified the limit, actually as in unceasing increase effort.

The Huo Yuhao body surface even therefore started somewhat to inflate, the blue vein revealed completely, the whole body was sending out the unhealthy red, gold sun blue moon, behind unceasingly was glittering in him, each twinkle, air slight distortion several points.

Luckily, sits Tang Wutong in his opposite, behind Tang Wutong, the gold sun purple moon similar ray twinkle, echoes with the aura that on Huo Yuhao lends mutually, during this echoes, perhaps Yin-Yang Supplement has produced certain results, reluctantly lets the huge energy burst of Huo Yuhao within the body will not be fierce.

Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor protection in cavern entrance, looks at Snow Emperor that a Ice Emperor face worries saying: “His situation now is not very good, can he insist?”

Snow Emperor sinking sound track: “Certain energy, in recent years, regardless of goes through what kind of difficulty, we together didn't walk? This is final is in front of the goal a foot, succeeds, he can reach the sky in a single bound, our dreams really must be realized, if were defeated......”

Here, Snow Emperor smiled, “what failed also had? If not he, perhaps we also already died, if he were defeated, we together accompany him.”

Ice Emperor one startled, “Snow Emperor, have you thought?”

Snow Emperor shows a faint smile, said: “Did you also ask me? Hadn't you already thought? agree did not say. Although you daily to the Daydream hasty words and stern countenance, but I actually could see that you looked his look became more and more gentle, it seems like, my small Bing'er had found the object of liking. In your heart had already decided that must fused the source and Yuhao, is right? Is because Daydream he already to help Yuhao, has completed the fusion. But we miss, was only this final Spiritual Consciousness source, this was also we finally can help the Yuhao strength, but after such fusion, we again also made no distinctions with him, even if were his success arrived at that world, we impossible and he has separated, that was true suffering if either one suffers, a Rong Jurong. I do not give up with you similarly separate! Why can't I think?”

Ice Emperor holds on the hand of Snow Emperor, the elegant face blushes saying: “Xue'er, I and I not with that fellow......”

Snow Emperor “pū”smiles, said: “We knew that several hundred thousand years, your thoughts, I hadn't known? Do not think that I have not moved raise your meaning. I am the sincerity is happy for you! Now this, is not good?”

“Um. We in any event, must help Yuhao go through this time difficulty. Xue'er, I first. The Yuhao present situation is not very wonderful, must stabilize to be good first.”

“Good. You go first, here has me.”Snow Emperor earnest looks at Ice Emperor, hugged her gently, then looks the smile loosens her.

Ice Emperor gathers in front of Snow Emperor, has kissed one on her cheek, was tender runs with a smile.

The Huo Yuhao present situation is is not very truly good, even can say that is he in history not best condition.

The energy in within the body was really too huge, the matter that he most wants to handle now, divulged within the body these huge energies. But, he cannot achieve.

Spiritual Power could not control Soul Power, because Spiritual Power was in itself chaotic. Although Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Spiritual Power underwent the filtration, but itself as before that manic, seems like containing formidable Wraith Soul, unceasing is wreaking havoc, wants to wrest away Huo Yuhao spiritual sea.

Has practiced over 700,000 years of formidable Soul Beast worthily! In the situation of even if in itself died, must initiate as before counter-attacks at the point of death. No wonder, after he dies, oneself had not felt that has the soul to fluctuate to appear, he hid the strength of soul in Soul Ring unexpectedly directly, and also compressed the massive Spiritual Power belts to come.

Clearly, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler before has calculated at the point of death, oneself are must absorbs his Soul Nucleus, but his present goal, must seize the shed! Seizes own body.

If no Long Xiaoyao to pour into these Soul Power of Huo Yuhao within the body, Huo Yuhao has not feared Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, he has Daydream Ice Silkworm and Mermaid Princess help, itself Spiritual Power is also formidable. In addition the control of Power of Emotion, only remaining Soul Source Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler radically not with the qualifications that he competes.

But, the present issue is very big, within the body Soul Power also at rebellion! Let him not have the means to focus on coping with Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, this is most troublesome.

The spiritual sea snafu, Mermaid Princess and Daydream Ice Silkworm could not withstand, he is also so, in brain already somewhat ignorant. Luckily, the great strength of mind Soul Nucleus, making the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler soul not have the means to complete to seize the shed.

But, this way, the result as before will not actually change.

Starting today, our peerless Tang Sect cartoon in our prestige - platform starts to continue to serialize, every day two, everybody can find in the platform micro station.

Joins our platform to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is the brother! 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-610-part-1





Volume 13

#610 - Seizes In The Shed


Evil Tyrant is very intelligent, he feels the condition that Huo Yuhao has now faced very much clearly, otherwise he will not start at this time, he needs to do now, waits for the opportunity, waited for that a Huo Yuhao body have the problem the opportunity.

Once Soul Power in his body not to have cannot control, wreaks havoc completely lets loose, his Soul Nucleus is not stabilizing then, at that time, seizes the best opportunity in shed.

Can seize a body of shed humanity Limit Douluo, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is very satisfied. He was struck by Huo Yuhao kills, had the opportunity the soul to flee, even chooses a descendant body rebirth, has him of that formidable soul level, wants to kill thoroughly is not an easy matter.

But it does not have yo does, the reason is, he had a liking for the body of Huo Yuhao.

If comes ressurection with oneself descendant's body, will have the tremendous influence to his strength, needs for a long time to restore very much in peak condition. If before, this is not good, nothing but time for a long time, but at least insures.

However, now this time actually cannot like this, because, he will face the arrival of next Great Tribulation quickly, Great Tribulation may, no matter he has received heavy wound, seizes the shed rebirth. Will only recognize its soul. Even if were complete condition Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler has not grasped passed this Great Tribulation, he may not have the Beast God Di Tian that huge vitality, say nothing of experiences personally him after heavy wound. Once Great Tribulation approaches, he may really be doomed.

Therefore, he after short thinking decided that risks danger wrestles. Seizes the goal of shed, fell on Huo Yuhao.

Such that just like Huo Yuhao judges now, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler concluded that he is impossible to give up that formidable Soul Ring, if he gave up, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler seizes own descendants not to be late again.

But once after Huo Yuhao has absorbed his Soul Ring, the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler goal must find an opportunity to seize to abandon his body.

The body of Soul Beast could not cover his aura, but the body of humanity can actually cover most! Let alone, Huo Yuhao oneself cultivates for so is strong with Spiritual Power, once seizes the shed to be successful, completes third Soul Nucleus, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler had the absolute confidence to pass this Great Tribulation, even used this human body to attack the level of god. Under the intense greedy trend, he chooses to risk danger wrestles, now looks like, the opportunity arrived, succeeds as if at present.

Therefore, Evil Tyrant does not worry now, he is waiting for Huo Yuhao to have problems. Then fully strikes. He does not hope to ruin this body, what significance otherwise does he seize the shed also to have? He wants, when Huo Yuhao is on the verge of the brink of collapse, wins the body domination, then fused formidable Spiritual Power after Huo Yuhao to control these storms to walk Soul Power by oneself, suppressed it, slowly absorption.

exceed thinks that Evil Tyrant to the present condition is satisfied, during all imagine the situation to be better than him. The perfect body and perfect attribute, can the load bearing his Spiritual Power formidable spiritual sea, these not have absorption but actually extremely pure Soul Power, in addition the third Soul Nucleus embryonic form, this is the heaven grants itself simply the best gift!

not to have

[ hundred degree celsius peerless Tang Sect writing first round] at this time, the aquamarine form light emergence in Huo Yuhao behind, she was not extremely beautiful, but that ice-cold but the noble makings, the perfect moving stature, that emerald aquamarine tender body, gave people all a special aesthetic sense.

Sits is good in the Huo Yuhao opposite Tang Wutong situation, gold sun purple moon ray is glittering intermittently, although is unstable, but fluctuates not is extremely fierce.

But Huo Yuhao the situation was very bad, in gold sun blue moon, gold sun is extremely powerful, the blue moon not in part of ones duty gloomy, rich mist unceasingly the transpiration from Huo Yuhao, his clothes already had actually soaked, the beads of sweat of big drop and big drop, fall from his forehead unceasingly.

Ice Emperor takes a deep breath, immediately, her body looks like her scorpion tail is common, shone the radiant deep green ray, that was not vital deep green, but was as cold as deep green of Absolute, the mist that immediately, Huo Yuhao ascended, will shortly change into the innumerable ice powders to fall gently, in rock cave also for a it Qing.

In the Ice Emperor eye, the none remaining glitters, as if two groups of ice flame ignitions are ordinary. She sits cross-legged behind Huo Yuhao sits down, a hand according to the Huo Yuhao vest place, the body draws close, another hand presses above the Huo Yuhao dantian. The strong aquamarine brilliance starts to burn not to have to burn the ascension from her double pupil place, shone upon the aquamarine the entire rock cave.

Did not have least bit ice-cold to bloom again outward, burns not to have to burn Spiritual Consciousness Ice Emperor to close the double pupil slowly, on the elegant face revealed a light smile. In the heart is recalling own sound.

Daydream, your this fool, my bad words, I will not say anything, all that but, these years you do for me, I clear remembering. Although I am cold, but you actually melt me, this is I can do, to you best being in love. Burnt not to have to burn Spiritual Consciousness, we will not separate.

The cold air current wells up not to have to enter in body not to have, in the Huo Yuhao dantian suddenly Maodong Soul Power almost flickered below peacefully, was not they stops revolving, but was they are frozen by that strange cold current.

Comes from is no doubt formidable Long Xiaoyao Soul Power, but Ice Emperor burns Spiritual Consciousness that not to have burns, is absolutely is not inferior in the spirit Soul Power quantity of Limit Douluo level! That is strength of the purest freezing, Spiritual Power or Soul Power, can be frozen immediately.

Soul Power in dantian was frozen, the expression on Huo Yuhao face was calm immediately, slowly takes a deep breath, the aura was dignified, with this breath, in the air had the sound of dragon roar tiger's roar faintly.

Before Ice Emperor burns the Spiritual Consciousness source not to have burns, Huo Yuhao is in the most painful condition, he knows certainly one were swindled. The result of this being swindled, without doubt was because was extremely eager for quick success and immediate gain. However, recalls that in then that situation, if not make such choice is also impossible. The guarantees of some Brother Daydream, in addition that 700,000 years of Soul Ring great not to have greatly tempts the not to have being puzzled strength, keeping him from resisting.

But also luckily has Daydream Ice Silkworm, Daydream Ice Silkworm itself has absorbed in Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Soul Ring most Spiritual Power, has a small part by Huo Yuhao own spiritual sea absorption. Present Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler wants to cope with Huo Yuhao, can only transfer his own part of Spiritual Power, attempts to swallow Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power to expand itself. After expanding to the certain extent, has the possibility to swallow that side Daydream Ice Silkworm again in turn.

In other words, existence of Daydream Ice Silkworm, however Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler this seized the process of shed becomes difficult and complex.

May so, because in body not to have Soul Power suddenly Maodong extremely fierce, is too big to Huo Yuhao own impact, keeping him from resisting swallowing of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler. That fierce pain, was in the degree that was unable to resist.

The Ice Emperor Spiritual Consciousness burning not to have fever, was no different at this time gives opportune help, in body not to have Soul Power stabilized instantaneously, Huo Yuhao big relaxing, with this deep breath, was also relying on own formidable mind controlling force, he disorder Soul Power in body not to have inducted the stock rail immediately, the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus again stable revolution, massive whirlpool Soul Power restored to produce. In scattered in disorder Soul Power and Spiritual Power the meridians collect respectively.

The great not to have sweeping change of Huo Yuhao, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler naturally immediately felt, had a big shock. It has exposed himself, naturally understands, if made Huo Yuhao restore the superiority, greeted his is the total destruction!

It did not have the main body after all, although has taken to bring in own soul and essence, but with has achieved Limit Douluo to cultivate is, and is compared with Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus Huo Yuhao, has not the small disparity eventually. If Huo Yuhao can the total involvement copes with him, he will not have an opportunity.

This not to have time, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler did not have any escape route, the time of radically pondering does not have, it started immediately.

Cannot make Huo Yuhao get strength back, the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler ambush erupts in the Huo Yuhao spiritual sea energy suddenly. Round powerful evil light has shone sky over spiritual sea suddenly.

Sits cross-legged behind Huo Yuhao that sits, blood red Evil Eye appears, the evil glittering, red that the entire cavern shines.

This time Tang Wutong entered the sitting in meditation condition, although her situation is much better than Huo Yuhao, but wants to absorb huge Soul Power that Ye Xishui keeps completely, definitely wants the total involvement to invest, enters the depth meditate condition to achieve. Therefore, she does not know that on Huo Yuhao had such big problem unexpectedly.

The Huo Yuhao whole body shakes suddenly, on forehead, vertical eye opens slowly, but this time, the vertical eye surroundings appear actually no longer is golden-rose color sun mark, but is the dark red strange traces, these traces look like the dark red small snakes are ordinary, crawls outward from his vertical eye place, then spreads toward his entire forehead, as if must swallow his entire head.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, started motionless, is whole-heartedly. Stands in Huo Yuhao behind Ice Emperor, in the eye reveals a panic-stricken color obviously, she has not thought that the strength of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler ambush in Huo Yuhao body not to have so will be unexpectedly formidable, formidable to letting Huo Yuhao nearly degree irresistibly.

However, has the help of Ice Emperor, Huo Yuhao lived in Soul Power in oneself body not to have finally stably, the fierce pain as if must tear his spiritual sea completely general. The sea water in spiritual sea coagulated completely, and started to present slits, the dark red rock magma common liquid, braved from these slits, fast spread in entire spiritual sea, the goal was very simple, must swallow this entire spiritual sea!

-----------------------------------------------

Sorry that renewed a moment ago has made a mistake the content, now changed, everybody can look.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-610-part-2





Volume 13

#610 - Seizes The Shed


Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler that float Evil Eye in Huo Yuhao spiritual sea started becomes more and more clear, because it while is starting fully, must swallow Huo Yuhao spiritual sea, once completes swallowing of spiritual sea, it will start to swallow Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus, to that time, he can grasp the whole body of Huo Yuhao close. As for the control of Soul Power, has it of 700,000 years of practice experience, thinks that is not difficult.

Huo Yuhao this time situation was too passive, simply does not have the ability of least bit revolt, the spiritual sea big piece region, was being swallowed by Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler unceasingly, his own Soul Power stabilizes, is mixing Soul Power and Spiritual Power whirlpool energy unceasing attacks to the spiritual sea aspect, is always actually blocked by Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler formidable Soul Source, does not make him play the role of rescue.

The Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler goal is extremely clear, must not hesitate at all costs first invaded Huo Yuhao spiritual sea to say again. When the time comes, surrounds Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus, making his controlling force reduce Absolute, is easier to do.

Huo Yuhao after attempting to have attacked by the hindrance several times, suddenly stopped, but is adjusting Soul Power in within the body silently, controls two big Soul Nucleus to revolve, seems, temporarily gave up own spiritual sea unexpectedly likely, this lets Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is also extremely surprised. Didn't this boy want spiritual sea?

In spiritual sea, big piece and big piece region unceasing was covered by that dark red, on the Huo Yuhao face, that dark red trace also occupied more and more places, looks from the semblance, exceptionally fierce.

Stood behind the Ice Emperor form gradually became in him more and more illusory, the Spiritual Consciousness combustion produced froze the ability formidable, at least can guarantee Soul Power in Huo Yuhao dantian not to give the Huo Yuhao start trouble in a short time.

The entire process is very slow, outside, daytime and dark night unceasing taking turn, but in this cavern, Huo Yuhao at all times is actually facing the threat of birth and death.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is getting more and more stimulated, he can feel clearly that the resistance strength in Huo Yuhao spiritual sea became getting smaller, soon, he can control entire spiritual sea, to that time, Huo Yuhao again did not have the possibility of least bit make a comeback.

But regarding this, Huo Yuhao actually likely completely does not know, but is revolving silently own Soul Power, these days, he has collected within the body these scattered in disorder Soul Power completely, integrates in his Dual Soul Nucleus whirlpool Soul Power, even also absorbed to melt part from that some Soul Power of Ice Emperor freeze, integrated own Soul Nucleus. Meanwhile using the practice, making Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus Soul Power unceasing moistens oneself, strengthens the body. To the feeling of person, looks like to attack Limit Douluo third Soul Nucleus prepares, but has neglected Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler completely exists.

Regarding this, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is also somewhat disturbed, unknown is most fearful. Any biology, willingly will not always give up the domination of oneself body, Huo Yuhao does not interfere itself to the control of his spiritual sea, these have certainly the issue. But he cannot ask Huo Yuhao! Asked Huo Yuhao is impossible to reply him. Therefore, he in occupying the Huo Yuhao spiritual sea process, becomes exceptionally careful, but this careful, made the speed that it occupied reduce speed.

......

Sun-Moon Empire, Bright Capital City.

The martial law untied finally.

Entire one month! Bright Capital City has declared martial law for one month, over 200,000 armies, guard in the Bright Capital City surrounding each important highway. In the sky, has covered entirely various Surveying Soul Guidance Device. Entire one month of being frightened by the slightest sound.

Since one month, in Bright Capital City, various shops have closed door to go out of business all, entire Bright Capital City makes all people shiver in an intense grief and indignation aura.

Because, that has ruled shortly after Sun-Moon Empire, made the Sun-Moon Empire domain expand over one-third one generation of king Xu Tianran dead, inexplicable death.

The Sun-Moon Empire official has not announced the Xu Tianran cause of death, but announced to the outside that your majesty passed away. But following one month, the Bright Capital City internal chaos, particularly Imperial Family ancestor and relative, is chaotic in a complete mess.

Xu Tianran died, in the Imperial Family ancestor and relative, the direct line juniors are numerous. But according to the legal principle theory of law, should inherit the throne truly is actually the male offspring who Xu Tianran leaves behind only, is Sun-Moon Empire Crown Prince Your Highness Xu Yunhan. But the Xu Yunhan age was really too small. In Imperial Family ancestors and relatives heart can therefore not have other thoughts?

Suddenly, Bright Capital City internal chaos. All influence engages in factional strife mutually, particularly Imperial Family ancestor and relative, is so.

This confusion has continued half a month time, outside Bright Capital City, the massive private armed forces transfer, in the deliberation hall, is the mighty waves is more turbulent.

But was Ju Zi(orange) of empress actually remains silent, bringing Xu Yunhan to be Xu Tianran cannot mourn by the side of the coffin in the temporary palace. Consecrate Hall has also chosen silent. As if all people have tacitly approved, making in these Imperial Family ancestors and relatives decide final outcome depending on the skill.

Thereupon, strength strong Imperial Family start to engage in factional strife mutually, wins over all influence. But what made their surprised was, in process that they won over, many people chose maintained the neutralities, seemed is waiting and seeing anything.

Until half a month later, when Ju Zi(orange) brings Xu Yunhan to appear above the deliberation hall, places that moment in throne Xu Yunhan, in the deliberation hall, seethed with excitement immediately.

The process of this ebullition, has not continued to be too long.

The Consecrate Hall palace Lord Kong Deming to announce that Consecrate Hall only supports Imperial Family legitimate Crown Prince Your Highness, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp announces gives loyalty to the crown prince, Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp and Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp announced gives loyalty to the crown prince.

Is stationed carries on the army of recuperation and supplement to announce in the Sun-Moon Empire border that supports Crown Prince Your Highness.

Early in previous time Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp has been unable to do it alone by Huo Yuhao hits remnantly. In the deliberation hall, Ju Zi(orange) almost reversed the universe in the flash. But before noisy most ominous, these Imperial Family ancestors and relatives who particularly uses the private soldier, directly had all put on the hat of plotting a rebellion by her. Seizes its title, lifelong detains.

Then, Ju Zi(orange) fully showed the War-God Empress elegant demeanor, she has only used half a month time, has controlled the Sun-Moon Empire entire aspect, assisted Xu Yunhan to ascend the throne proclaims oneself emperor, but oneself by the empress dowagers and three services commander status, attended to state affairs.

Xu Tianran in many Sun-Moon Empire person eyes is one generation of clear(ly), but Ju Zi(orange), after is one generation of virtues? Is empire war-god.

The support that in many years of armed forces the profession, Xu Tianran nearly is outspoken in addition, the function completely appeared. All sounds of opposition are tranquil in the shortest time.

Once had the Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family ancestor and relative to find Old Kong, expressed that to the Ju Zi(orange) disaffection, Old Kong was only asked his one lightly: If the empire gives you, you can lead the empire to unify Continent? Do you have the empress dowager in the status of military?

Not only Ju Zi(orange) empress, in the meantime, she also already became the military big shots. Dynasty change time, when regardless of the support of army is most important.

The Sun-Moon Empire new imperial palace completes also requires period of not short time. Ju Zi(orange) throughout in temporary palace work. Crown prince Xu Yunhan is young, but has actually done obeisance the Consecrate Hall palace to advocate Kong Deming for the master, since childhood starts to contact Soul Guidance Device, in the meantime, starts to make the Soul Power practice of most foundation. Under the assistance of top Soul Engineer, his future can be imagined. But Ju Zi(orange) also believes that own son, will certainly have the extremely high talent in the future.

Stands before the window silently, the goose yellow dragging place long skirt is serving as contrast her noble makings, on the forehead, brought to inlay the royal crowns of various types of gems, the front has revealed completely wipes the fair, white shiny smooth.

Both hands intersection, the palm inward, hangs in the lower abdomen position. The pupil light penetrates front window, looks into that pure nighttime sky.

She stood had the entire half double-hour here, throughout was maintaining this posture, not having the half minute to move. On the long eyelash, is bringing some water drops, looks like above the embellishment crystal.

“Why must tell me!”Her muttering in a soft voice.

“Why must tell me, your this walks is several years doesn't turn over to?”

“You may know, if there are you in side pressure, hatred in my heart will also be suppressed.”

“But, you are not, you throughout not side me.”

“Why do you want to believe me? Why?”

The tears, fall following the arc of face, drops following the fine lower jaw quietly, in her eye pupil, as if there is endless distress.

Long time, she has as if made a difficult decision. Closes the double pupil, the tears stops.

“Sorry, Yuhao.”

......

In the dark red, entire cavern, had been supported by dark red completely fully. Only then sits cross-legged to sit on there Tang Wutong is sending out light golden light, these dark red isolates with own body. Sits there, her tender body is ordinary just like the sculpture, back gold sun purple moon, the ray is partly visible, is incomplete. In depth meditate, to all of outside, already did not have any sensation.

The entire face of Huo Yuhao turned into dark red, dark red just like the tentacle terrifying trace, follow his face to hang into his neck, has extended to the chest place.

That has packed dark red in entire rock cave, is on him sends out, behind him, that huge dark red eye pupil, changed into the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler appearance completely, said accurately that reduced 1st Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler.

The Huo Yuhao whole person as if completely lost the consciousness, the breath becomes slight, several inaudible. Ice Emperor light shadow completely vanished. Only then chest following position, partly visible green jade light twinkle.

In spiritual sea, completely is piece of dark red sea, in dark red spiritual sea, only then some tiny golden traces are partly visible.

Our peerless Tang Sect entity book 25 th volume went on the market, everybody can dazzle the world Tang Sect shop to purchase in us, a series of peripheral products that we develop one after another will also go on the market, hopes that everybody likes. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-610-part-3





Volume 13

#611 - Recrimination


spiritual sea sky, huge vertical eye float there, looks like a dark red Sun, its tentacle, is disturbing around mind Soul Nucleus, has not oppressed inward, has actually completed surrounding. The terrifying mind fluctuation, making this spiritual sea increase at least over one time compared with before. But this no longer belongs to the Huo Yuhao strength obviously.

The Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler aura, had already filled here, the tyrannical mind fluctuation is similar to the essence is common.

The final time already approached, in this time Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler heart, full is the stimulated mood.

Such long, so was long, until he occupied entire spiritual sea, does not have the bitter experience to the Huo Yuhao any powerful revolt, to the present at this time, he wanted to revolt again, became the impossible matter. Occupied his entire spiritual sea, why does he also revolt? His mind Soul Nucleus cannot even condense any Spiritual Power. Once mind Soul Nucleus were also controlled by oneself, was entered by own Soul Source, this seizes the shed, has come to the end.

To this body, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is very satisfied, at least in he has seen in humanity, but also never some people can compared at present this body.

Perfect body and spirit and perfect attribute. What is more important, young!

Once had 700,000 years to cultivate regarding one is, actually gradually old Soul Beast, even compares young formidable is more important! Insufficiently formidable, can practice by the experience, is, if not very young, all do not have the significance. Regarding be only over 20 years old, cultivate to actually be the Limit Douluo level, but must attack the Huo Yuhao body of that unprecedented third Soul Nucleus, what it can have not satisfied?

“Starts! Huo Yuhao, later the body was my.”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler in laughing wildly the sound launched the final attack.

In spiritual sea, the dark red ocean waves swarm, raises the dreadful wave, the terrifying mind thought has spread over each corner in entire spiritual sea instantaneously.

Survives not many golden traces, at an exceptional pace is vanishing, only time that needs several times to breathe, here will not be having a Huo Yuhao trace to stay behind.

All mind tentacles, tighten completely inward, has twined toward Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus, mind Soul Nucleus the velocity of whirl under their functions is dropping is revolving rapidly immediately, gradually changes slow.

Terrifying Spiritual Power simultaneously outward relief pressure, is suppressing Huo Yuhao Soul Power, does not make him have any opportunity of make a comeback, on the Huo Yuhao neck that are similar to the meridians general dark red trace also starts the downward spread, spreads toward his whole body.

vertical eye on Huo Yuhao forehead, turned into the Evil Eye appearance at this time completely, has filled evil different and ferocious.

Seizes the last step of shed, occupies!

Huo Yuhao own aura, to this time, already several inaudible, as if did not have any strength to change all these again.

But what is strange, sits well in Huo Yuhao opposite Tang Wutong, the corners of the mouth place outlines a gentle arc quietly.

The projection of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler in Huo Yuhao behind, that giant eye has been observing Huo Yuhao opposite Tang Wutong. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler pays attention to Tang Wutong must, although Tang Wutong is impossible to prevent in all that Huo Yuhao within the body has, but she can actually do a matter, that has killed Huo Yuhao.

In was seized in the process of shed, the body of Huo Yuhao is very frail, if at this time, Tang Wutong has killed Huo Yuhao, all that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler made before, will be not studious.

This why Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler does not hesitate to project and consume own Spiritual Power outward, must continuously the surveillant Tang Wutong important reason.

From beginning to end, Tang Wutong had not had any change, as if entered in the depth meditate condition really completely. In this state, naturally cannot the matter that prevents then to have. However, when this is most essential, why? Why did she smile?

A sense of fear beyond description appears instantaneously during Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler consciousness, it worthily is one generation of fierce and ambitiouses, at this time, why absolutely did not have to ponder that but spelled to try, promoted own Spiritual Power to the ultimate working capacity suddenly, has engaged in factional strife toward Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus. Only then occupies this Soul Nucleus, then, all can develop in the advantageous direction.

But also at this time, was maintaining tranquil Huo Yuhao, the body trembled suddenly. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler felt a happy thought unexpectedly.

That likes, looks like the wedding festivities night, when or passes the palace examination, that is the joy of the heart, like this joyful, has been full of the power beyond description. But also this joyful existence, lets in Huo Yuhao spiritual sea, all dark red quietly have stopped. During that likes, these belong to Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Spiritual Power to be stimulated in the tremor, are jumping for joy. Suddenly, broke away from the control of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler to be ordinary unexpectedly.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler has a big shock, but in its heart is still actually flooding that intense happy thought that this? Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler does not understand what completely had, why at this time, will have this feeling?

In this time, that happy atmosphere suddenly changed, the anger has substituted for liking, making the dark red sea water in entire spiritual sea seethe with excitement suddenly.

Huge dark red water columns shoot up to the sky, as if went crazy, scatters in all directions the impact, including part, has fired into airborne Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler source Spiritual Consciousness unexpectedly. Also the part has fired into Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler was really terrified, while being panic-stricken, his oneself has also been full of the anger, why? Why can like this? Wasn't he completely gave up his spiritual sea? Why at this time, he actually likely suddenly can control own spiritual sea? Why? Why all these are Ah?

Nobody can reply that his issue, at this time, he can feel, is consciousness that anger.

After the anger, was sad, crazy seems melted in the next quarter, dark red spiritual sea was tranquil, but has actually been full of endless sad intent.

Under that sad thought that long mind tentacles fall from mind Soul Nucleus slowly, weak dangling, slight is twitching, looks like sobbed to sob the child.

In spiritual sea, all in this moment as if tranquil, but in that dark red, started flood point golden light.

After sad, is joyful, yes, that is the unequalled joy. However, this joyful does not belong to Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, but is Huo Yuhao.

That is the joy of the heart, has filled the joy of power, during this is joyful, Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus, circles suddenly at the unequalled speed. The strong mind fluctuation, made on this mind Soul Nucleus send out radiant golden light immediately, has illuminated spiritual sea, making here gloomy the non- light dark red, shortly will turn into the brilliant golden red.

Frightened, in the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler heart, at this time only then endless fear. Unknown is most fearful. But all that at this time it faces, take it 700,000 years of cultivating of as, as before unknown.

The light ray glitters in the air, halos in airborne are reverberating unceasingly. Two light shadow, reappearing of being quietly by mind Soul Nucleus. They similarly are also releasing the joyful mood.

Daydream Ice Silkworm and Mermaid Princess.

The gentle mind fluctuation releases from them outward, they look in the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler look, filled disdained and despised.

But also at this time, a fierce cold current, did not have the omen suddenly emerges in Huo Yuhao spiritual sea, this cold current everywhere one visit, has almost frozen the entire dark red sea, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Spiritual Consciousness source, was frozen.

Appearance that the pretty form is quietly together in Huo Yuhao spiritual sea, the Bai Se (White Color) streamers, have surrounded the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler fountainhead. On the moving tender face is revealing the light smile, is ascending Bing Wu (ice mist) here all freezes.

Snow Emperor!

Bore patiently was so long, Snow Emperor began finally.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler does not even know that Snow Emperor not in Huo Yuhao within the body, looks like in him, Huo Yuhao all spirits were already suppressed with his spiritual sea. Only then Ice Emperor escapes outside, at crucial moments has rescued his life.

Snow Emperor? Snow Emperor outside, silently has been waiting, is waiting for oncoming of opportunity. Just, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler cannot see her. She beside cavern, under the Tang Wutong aura conceals, simply has not revealed least bit own aura. But at this time, she came back!

“Evil Tyrant, the matter developed here, you should see the result. I should, fuse in my spiritual sea all my thank you thank you. If not so, I want to expand spiritual sea to so the degree, supports the following three Soul Nucleus fusions. Perhaps also takes at least ten years can complete. Therefore, I must thank you.”

Huo Yuhao sound, after quiet was so long, finally appeared, his sound is gentle and tranquil, any mood fluctuation has not appeared.

“You! Are all these you plan?”Saying that the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler startled anger occurred simultaneously.

The Magic Chef of Ice and Fire game back coupling big ritual, 1. new area opens announced that Magic Chef of Ice and Fire 17 areas: Oscar formally opened the area, had wants to obtain the award player to go, everybody do not fall behind, our 1 million back coupling activities must start quickly \; 2. the escape edition has gotten online officially, to celebrate new area opening and escape version gets online, I will extract 5 lucky fellows in the players in 17 areas, they can obtain 4 rewards that I bestow, if the player, will obtain the isometric the diamond, the player who therefore hopes to win an award, hurries to pass ** replies me in the role names of 17 areas, the closing date will be 12 : 00 pm.

Joins the game way to be very simple, please first join our prestige - platform, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our families. Then clicks on the following hand tour to download, can carry on the game. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-611-part-1





Volume 13

#611 - Recrimination


Huo Yuhao light [say / way]: “At the beginning of you start, truly is I most difficult time. At that time, not only there is your Spiritual Power in my mind, there is huge Soul Power that the Long Xiaoyao senior left behind, because I used Soul Power to produce the rebellion excessively. That time I, truly was beset with difficulties both at home and abroad. Has the possibility of collapse anytime. By my strength, even was very difficult to change the course of events. But at this time, you appeared.”

“You biggest mistake lies, extremely treasured my body. Therefore, you do not have to attack my mind Soul Nucleus immediately, positive governing I. But influencing subtly assimilates my spiritual sea. Because you feared that you feared attacks my mind Soul Nucleus to make Soul Power of my within the body lose control completely, to that time, you only has been able to follow me together from exploding.”

“However in fact is also so. If you had attacked my mind Soul Nucleus at that time, our final results can only perish together. Luckily, you do not have to do, in this regard, I must thank you. You do not hate dead, I am also, I must accompany my lover, until forever. Thank you have given my this opportunity.”

“With the aid of the Ice Emperor strength, my temporary seal lived in Long Xiaoyao senior these manic Soul Power, simultaneously starts to adjust own physical condition. At that time, I radically not with the strength of your battle. But at that time, actually was also you had the biggest opportunity the time. If you have attacked my mind Soul Nucleus, then controls my body with the formidable controlling force as soon as possible, perhaps really has to seize the shed successful possibility. You were too oversuspicious, because my does not revolt, you under the inertia thought that only want to seize my spiritual sea stably. This generally, does not have any issue, what a pity, I and average person have some differences. My spiritual sea, early is not human category spiritual sea, because in him, has one, is another world aura. Therefore, from beginning to end, I did not fear that you occupy spiritual sea, because you are impossible become here actual master, you are impossible to write off my consciousness.”

“Therefore, I defer to such that you hope, after has struggled simply several next, no longer resists, but all changed own Soul Power mind, controls Soul Power.”

“After these days effort, I collects within the body scattered in disorder Soul Power finally completely, Soul Power that Senior Long leaves behind also controlled part. My situation has stabilized completely, but you have also given me a pleasant surprise. You fused in your Spiritual Source my spiritual sea thoroughly. I think, only then my good partner spirits such to do, originally you can also. Therefore, I must thank you. I can be absorb now ninth Soul Ring that you bring completely, my mind level, has surmounted at present on Continent completely all exists, even if Beast God Di Tian, cannot compare favorably with me in this level. I think, even if in your peak, is mediocre. Therefore, I must thank you.”

“I know that you want to ask very much, how I achieve. Now should also tell you, otherwise, you will die with injustice unredressed. You felt a moment ago, is happy, anger, sorrow and happiness. Is the mood, the mood strength. But in my spiritual sea, has one type not to belong to this world strength, that is the seed of Gods. My talent, was indebted God of Emotion to settle on, has given my this opportunity. Has existence of Gods seed, how my was spiritual sea possibly also occupied by you?”

“You......”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler because of the excessive anger, huge Evil Eye in airborne has spilled over the intermittent black air current. But, wanted from burn similarly oneself Spiritual Consciousness, dissolved with Huo Yuhao as one Snow Emperor contends is also easier said than done? Do not forget, Snow Emperor is also Ten Great Ferocious Beasts ranks third existence, even if the Evil Eye Tyrant heyday, wants to defeat her is not an easy matter, say nothing was this situation gets down at present.

A handle is sending out the short blade edge of light weapon float in the midair, knife edge downward, ices the blue blade glow to point to that projection in airborne huge Evil Eye.

This time this only Evil Eye, completely lost nimble and resourceful, eye pupil deep place, were many piece of dead grey colored, that is desperate!

Falling that suddenly the ice-cold light blade edge is relentless, maliciously pricks in that Evil Eye. Since Huo Yuhao these many days, within the body has been bearing patiently Soul Power erupted finally.

That bunch is mixing Spiritual Power and Soul Power whirlpool energy rises suddenly, given mind Soul Nucleus, breaks in own spiritual sea rapidly.

Whirlpools present in dark red spiritual sea, selects point golden light to proliferate, happy, anger, sorrow and happiness, four different mood transform, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler own Spiritual Power that represses unceasingly are unable to achieve the active control. In this case, it can only look helplessly that golden ray integrates unceasingly. But the Morning Dew Knife ice-cold point actually and disintegrates its Spiritual Consciousness in the little freezing.

Sits cross-legged to sit in the Huo Yuhao opposite Tang Wutong opening eyes pupil, when she looks at the dark red trace on Huo Yuhao face to remove gradually, looks that his back Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler projection is defeated and dispersed quietly, this long air vent, again closed both eyes. This time, she true felt relieved that enters to depth meditate.

......

Three years later.

Star Lou Empire capital, Star Luo City.

The sky is grey colored, is flooding the gunsmoke flavor everywhere. The sky is cloudy, Wu Yun (black clouds) will momentarily bring heavy rain.

Star Luo City north city wall only remaining less than one-third, but actually as before can see that everywhere is the defense battlelines that Soul Guidance Device composes, other three city walls all so, this urban protection just likes a steel and iron forest.

But, beside this steel and iron forest, is densely covered broader big piece steel and iron forest.

The Star Luo City West, inside and outside 100, north Star Luo City inside and outside 100, has been everywhere full of the dense murderous intention, in the sky, is various dense and numerous Surveying Soul Guidance Device, the goal refers, is the Star Luo City direction.

In the ground, Soul Guidance Device of big piece composes the huge Soul Guidance Array places, like giant pliers, anytime may clamp to Star Luo City.

Star Luo City, belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries final defense lines. Yes, this is the final defense line.

Before more than three years, Sky Soul Empire destruction.

Shortly, Emperor Sun-Moon Empire Xu Tianran dies a violent death suddenly, crown prince Xu Yunhan succeeds to the throne, War-God Empress attended to state affairs with the name of empress dowager.

At that time, Continent welcomed less than one year of tranquil time. Believes when all people that the Sun-Moon Empire internal chaos, at least will make the war delay for several years to arrive. Two years ago, the Sun-Moon Empire army did not have launch of omen suddenly.

Sun-Moon Empire dispatches eight Soul Engineer Corp, being quietly is extending north original Sky Soul Empire continuously to east, penetrates from Dou Ling Empire, quickly, surprise attack Dou Ling Empire.

Has only used 18 days, this able to move unhindered invincible Soul Engineer Corp, has projected on Dou Ling Empire capital Spirit Dou City.

Before the Shrek City reinforcements arrive, Spirit Dou City was broken, Xue Lingxun leads the remnants of defeated troops to flee, convergence Shrek City Soul Engineer Corp, retreats in defeat again and again.

Meanwhile, War-God Empress Ju Zi(orange), leads personally another seven Soul Engineer Corp as well as the Sun-Moon Empire 400,000 armies, the soldier presses Star Lou Empire west border Bright Struggle Mountain Range, launches has been ten days of Soul Guidance Device wanton bombing, suppressed the Star Lou Empire main force to the westbound defense, is unable to extend the aid to Dou Ling Empire.

In order to destroy the potential of Sun-Moon Empire thing converging attack, Duke White Tiger Dai Hao leads personally three Soul Master legion, belongs to Sky Soul Empire from the Star Lou Empire northern border sneak attack, but actually encountered dealing a head-on blow. The soul of Sun-Moon Empire first batch of High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device support leads the defensive system in the Sky Soul Empire border area big show invincible might, has repelled the surprise attack of Duke White Tiger stiffly.

The Dou Ling Empire aspect, with the help of Shrek Academy, stabilized south Dou Ling Empire finally lived in the aspect, confronted with Sun-Moon Empire. The Sun-Moon Empire following 300,000 armies one month later, enter Dou Ling Empire from original Sky Soul Empire, the consolidated occupied area, occupies Spirit Dou City as well as Dou Ling Empire thoroughly surpasses 50% lands.

Hence, the Sun-Moon Empire aggressive war comprehensively launches. War-God Empress empress dowager Ju Zi(orange), assumes the post of three services commander.

One month later, Star Lou Empire west border Bright Struggle Mountain Range blasted out three gaps, the Sun-Moon Empire army enters outrageously, with the full support of Soul Engineer Corp, the breaking defense line stiffly, attacks and captures Bright Struggle Mountain Range, seizes it.

The Star Lou Empire army retreats in defeat again and again, the loss is serious. Five Soul Engineer Corp that just formed nearly were hit remnantly. The backwardness of Soul Guidance Technology, has become the principal factor of failure.

Another side, Dou Ling Empire with the support of Shrek Academy, although holds one's ground, but faces Sun-Moon Empire powerful Soul Guidance Array to be actually incapable of counter-attacking.

The Shrek Academy head and tail is difficult to attend, is unable simultaneously to support both countries, can only choose the Dou Ling Empire achievement of crisis to support the object.

During the Continent aspect fell into has been at a stalemate, but Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire actually do not know that the Ju Zi(orange) true goal did not accomplish the whole task at one stroke at this time. After occupying the Dou Ling Empire northern border, Sun-Moon Empire sends the massive artisans, under the protections of two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, starts the rare metal mining area that mined that piece initially to discover in Sky Soul and Dou Ling two countries north region quietly.

The massive rare metals were shipped back Sun-Moon Empire, processes various Soul Guidance Device.

Sun-Moon Empire reduced to has installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely the research and development expense, many research and development funds and resources all incline to High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device. Unceasing reduces the High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device volume, in the meantime, as far as possible maintains its might.

Six months later, in the Sun-Moon Empire Consecrate Hall palace Lord under the management of Kong Deming, Sun-Moon Empire Soul Guidance Technology has made the breakthrough progress, mastered the energy of light storage technology, sunlight absorption and storage, as the High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device persistent effect power. Although the storage time is very long, equipment is also very unwieldy, but this was actually Soul Guidance Technology opened one leaf temporarily the new front door. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-611-part-2





Volume 13

#611 - Recrimination


Regarding this, Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire actually completely ignorant, can only with the support of Shrek Academy, vigorously develop Soul Guidance Device, will try to carry on with Sun-Moon Empire in the near future life-and-death wrestles.

One year ago.

Without any indication, Sun-Moon Empire initiated fiercely attacking from Bright Struggle Mountain Range to Star Lou Empire suddenly, invested 12 Soul Engineer Corp, as well as over 500,000 military strength. That side Dou Ling Empire, only retained four Soul Engineer Corp and 200,000 armies, depends on defends in High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device.

Star Lou Empire retreats in defeat again and again, although Duke White Tiger is one generation of famous commanders-in-chief, but under the absolute inferiority of overall strength, the resistance feels weak. Sun-Moon Empire has only used for one month, seized the Star Lou Empire West big lands, Star Lou Empire has surpassed one-fifth land areas to fall into the rival.

The crisis time, Shrek City three Soul Engineer Corp as well as a Shrek Academy powerhouse rushes, and brings high new Soul Guidance Device that massive Tang Sect have developed, resisted fiercely attacking of Sun-Moon Empire finally reluctantly.

However, no one has thought that at this time, population several hundred people of armies, looked like breaks the space to be ordinary, emerges out of thin air in Dou Ling Empire.

Said accurately that is 300 people, but these 300 people, have name in a legend, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp! The thumb in Sun-Moon Empire Hand of the National Protector, on Douluo Continent, only king level Soul Engineer Corp. Fully has equipped Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, cultivates to individually be eight levels of Soul Engineer levels. Under leadership of four nine levels of Soul Engineer, they have given the Dou Ling Empire garrison troops most serious attack.

The tactic of this using diversionary tactics not is extremely wise, but, in the overall strength occupies in the superior situation absolutely, is this kind of tactic, has actually made the huge progress.

The Ju Zi(orange) use, is the inertia thought of Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire. It looks like in all people, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, is the deterrent great power. They most vital duty, surrounds and protects Bright Capital City. But. No one has thought that in Continent under such aspect, Bright Capital City has not needed to defend at present. Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp under such background, quietly took away by Ju Zi(orange), put in the Dou Ling Empire battlefield.

A meritorious military service becomes, under the leadership of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, Sun-Moon Empire is stationed with several Soul Engineer Corp coordination of Dou Ling Empire, adds on engaging in factional strife of 200,000 armies again. Immediately made the Dou Ling Empire army flowing. It is not able to block the step that the Sun-Moon Empire army goes forward again.

But since Sun-Moon Empire most has had superiority, reconnoiters the control as before, is relying on the absolute suppression of superaltitude Surveying Soul Guidance Device, when Star Lou Empire and Shrek Academy obtain this news, is one month later. Dou Ling Empire remnant armed forces under the leadership of Xue Lingxun, only then evacuated Dou Ling Empire less than 100,000 people, has entered to the Shrek City range, the Sun-Moon Empire army stopped the pursuit.

Initially Ju Zi(orange) has kept a promise to commitment that Huo Yuhao made, selected ten that campaigns as if to give all people to make the extremely profound impression. Regardless of the war develops any degree, the Shrek students always do not have to be attacked again. These time is no exception. Expels in the Dou Ling Empire remnant armed forces Dou Ling Empire, after occupying entire Dou Ling Empire thoroughly, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp repulses the enemy immediately. Returns to Dou Ling Empire, simultaneously garrisons in the border, constructs the Soul Guidance Array place, hence, belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries, the Dou Ling Empire destruction, degenerates into the Sun-Moon Empire halfway thoroughly.

Knew that this sad news, Star Lou Empire whole nation with sad, everyone knows. Dou Ling Empire extinguishes richly, means. Sun-Moon Empire is going to assemble the compensation to cope with Star Lou Empire. By the Star Lou Empire present national strength, how possible to contend with Sun-Moon Empire! Extinguishes the country is only sooner or later matter.

Then has really confirmed this point. After Sun-Moon Empire occupies Dou Ling Empire, the war has slowed down once again, clearly, they in the savings strength, simultaneously completely control Dou Ling Empire.

Sun-Moon Empire aspect, starts to change tactic, no longer directly fiercely attacks, but disperses the army, separately from the Sun-Moon Empire native place, Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire three encirclements, suppresses to Star Lou Empire unceasingly. Does not plan to accomplish the whole task at one stroke, but actually unceasingly nibbles the Star Lou Empire land.

The Star Lou Empire overall strength truly belongs to in the Douluo Continent three countries strongest one, is, in such a case, how many can their strengths show?

Shrek Academy has used fully is supporting them, but the Academy strength is eventually limited, defends a city, but for the entire country defends, actually was really too difficult.

The war carries on now, is missing to start from Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, already entire three years passed, the Star Lou Empire southern big lands, already fell into the rival. Other places are also so. Now is controlled by Star Lou Empire only, only then Star Luo City is a core region, the entire national territory, over 80%, fall into the hand of Sun-Moon Empire.

To this time, everyone knows that Sun-Moon Empire unifies the potential of Continent to be irreversible, but Star Lou Empire is supporting as before by strenuous efforts, even if some last hopes, they have not been willing to easily speak to give up.

Half a month ago, the Sun-Moon Empire army completes the potential of present half surrounding finally, initiated three times to fiercely attack successively.

After these many years wars, Soul Guidance Device completely became the mainstream in the battlefield, the Sun-Moon Empire research direction, has achieved has not needed Soul Power, can use the Soul Guidance Device situation, in the near future, the ordinary soldiers might provide Soul Guidance Device. This is High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device and derivative of energy of light use.

Soul Guidance Device war, what spells is the consumption, what spells is the both sides' consumption in Soul Guidance Device aspect, the consumption of reserve. Although Star Lou Empire temporarily resisted, but the present situation, is actually they by strength of the city, resisted entire Continent!

The armies threaten the border, making in Star Luo City 1 million soldiers and civilians immerse in the depressing air every day. Star Lou Empire army only remaining less than 400,000, surplus either was annihilated, either goes, becomes Sun-Moon Empire part. But Sun-Moon Empire sieges the Star Luo City army to have 1 million fully, including Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp, Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp and Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp this Hand of the National Protector five big Soul Engineer Corp, altogether 18 Soul Engineer Corp is the main force of this campaign.

Massive Soul Guidance Array already arranged readily, includes eight small High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, for half a month has been stockpiling the energy of light, completed at any time has given the plan that Star Luo City was heaviest strikes.

Star Luo City. Imperial palace.

In the main hall, dies general silence.

The position of Star Lou Empire Emperor tall Ju ruler, at this time is actually a complexion paleness. Double pupil absent-minded, can see from he somewhat split lip and pitch-dark eye socket. He bore how huge pressure.

The head under him, some people are sit unexpectedly, came from Shrek Academy Old Xuan.

Although the Old Xuan complexion is tranquil, but the look is actually very gloomy, from him, is the Shrek Academy people, Sea God Pavilion Ancient Elder. Has a seat.

A Tang Sect powerhouse stands in numerous position Ancient Elder behind, is headed by Beibei, Tang Ya, Xu Sanshi, He Caitou, Jiang Nannan, Xiao Xiao, Ye Guyi, Ji Juechen, Nan Qiuqiu and Jing Ziyan, even including Xuan Ziwen and Gao Dalu and other Soul Guidance Hall people. It can be said that entire Shrek City powerhouses almost all got together here.

Another side is the Star Lou Empire civil and military hundred officers, the civil and military hundred officer's heads, are Duke White Tiger. Under Duke White Tiger the first side, is Princess Jiujiu of military garb.

The Princess Jiujiu complexion is similarly pale, and has filled exhaustedly, the war has continued for nearly two years. Saw that the national territory of country was nibbled by the enemy unceasingly, the pressure that only the innermost feelings bear can be imagined.

Duke White Tiger appeared old, two temples were graying. Must know. He this year over 50 years old, moreover is cultivating of Titled Douluo is, according to the normalcy, should be in full flower is right!

“Yeah......”Emperor Star Lou Empire heaved a deep sigh, stood up from own throne slowly.

“Your majesty!”The civil and military hundred officers also bow, in sound are many for several points to shiver.

Emperor Star Lou Empire Xu Jiawei beckoned with the hand, said: “We did not need to deceive oneself and others, Star Luo City broken, was only the time issue. The numerous positions love the minister. These years assist me, perform high service through hard work. The failure of this war. Is the time change takes to us. I self-examine assiduously, but for several thousand years are conservative and complacent the disparity of causing. Although we had discovered that is actually incapable of changing the aspect. I am Monarch of the country, these wrong, makes me undertake. The numerous positions love the minister, straightens up after bowing or performing the kowtow. You perform the portable family, leaves Star Luo City, goes to that Sun-Moon Empire, I do not blame you.”

“Your majesty!”White hair old minister sad Hu, knocks down, has tears streaming down the face, “your majesty, feudal official oath and empire altogether life or death!”

Numerous officials many people knock down immediately, but actually and excluding Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, the person who some have not knelt down, some look twinkles.

The Dai Hao look sinks to congeal, “your majesty, the morale of troops may the drum not be possible to release. Even if puts together completely the soldier, feudal official must protect your majesty to be complete.”

Xu Jiawei shook the head, said: “I said that we do not need to deceive oneself and others again, the situation that now we face is how dangerous, I am very clear, you are also clear. Dai Hao, passes on me to order, to open the east gate and south city door, puts the common people to depart, wishing falling not to stop.”

The words spoke of here, this Emperor Star Lou Empire gave up the final hope without doubt.

Tang Sect touring party! The award of mysterious activity before saying, today gives everybody to disclose again, the content of award was the Tang Sect touring party that was led by me personally, each played the Magic Chef of Ice and Fire friends to participate to draw, and there is an opportunity to win the award, I continued to keep secret as for the concrete place, but will make known with everybody for these days! So long as plays our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire also to reach certain rank, can participate to draw, has the opportunity and I travels together. Also waits for anything, comes quickly.

The downloading game welcome to our prestigious platforms, join the method to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang few three. Has the authentication.

I arrived in Chongqing, tomorrow and day after tomorrow, two days of bamboo slip sells. On December 6 15 points, Chongqing purchasing books center Large open area Time Shop. Address: Chongqing Yuzhong District large open area time Tian Street hall level.

On December 7, 13.30, Chongqing purchasing books center Jiangbei District Maoye Shop, address: Chongqing Jiangbei District Guanyinqiao Maoye general merchandise defeated/carrying. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-611-part-3





Volume 13

#612 - Forcing


Old Xuan is silent, anything had not said that in the heart of hearts, he even somewhat admires this Emperor Star Lou Empire. He is very sober, he said right, now this situation, even if this Limit Douluo, has been powerless. The final result was already doomed. All, is irreversible.

Duke White Tiger Dai Hao one generation are outstanding, but actually goes through life without a good opportunity, under the absolute suppression of Soul Guidance Technology, his commander ability is unable to display completely, can only see that Sun-Moon Empire is relying on overwhelming superiority Soul Guidance Technology to the empire crush.

Although Shrek City has Tang Sect, has Xuan Ziwen, but, Xuan Ziwen after is only a person! By a person of strength, is possible and compared with national several thousand years of science and technology background? Xuan Ziwen these years were also older, although he already achievement Titled Douluo, but the daily consumption actually was really too big.

Tang Sect Soul Guidance Technology has the great strides, even must pursue most mainstream really the Soul Guidance Technology standard, but the resources or the productivity, as well as the scale and research and development range, actually and Sun-Moon Empire has the disparity of essence as before. These are irreversible.

Can make Sun-Moon Empire unify Continent really? Old Xuan somewhat painful closing eyes.

Although Sun-Moon Empire has not launched the attack to Shrek City throughout, but, in the Old Xuan heart as before the looks like is actually pressing a big stone.

“Your majesty, the feudal official asks to be excused, next life will serve your majesty again.”A minister turns around suddenly walks, has tears streaming down the face.

A person, can be unafraid of death, but, can stand the official here, is impossible to have a person! For oneself, they do not consider for own family.

Had first, has second.

The free time of a while, the entire deliberation hall emptied the larger part.

Smiling that Xu Jiawei self-ridicules, arrives in front of Old Xuan gradually.

“Old Xuan!”He stooped, bows to salute to Old Xuan.

Old Xuan both hands inflate, gentle Soul Power picks up him, Old Xuan also has stood simultaneously, this is not a respect to king, but to an admiration of respect life king.

“Your majesty!”

Xu Jiawei sighed, said: “I represent Star Lou Empire, thanked Shrek Academy, thanked the support of Tang Sect. Without you, Star Lou Empire already did not exist. Thank you. However, things have gotten to this point, is powerless to save the situation. Old Xuan, you and Shrek Academy as well as Tang Sect, sooner leaves. Shrek Academy is independent, does not belong to any country, you for our Star Lou Empire achieves so the situation, showed extreme tolerance. Cannot continue again, to guard that Sun-Moon Empire to vent anger Academy. Star Lou Empire can perish, but Shrek Academy cannot extinguish, in Shrek, has our Douluo empire true inheritance to be.”

Old Xuan brow tight wrinkle, heaved a deep sigh, he knows Xu Jiawei said was very right. Is same just as the minister who these leave, Old Xuan can not be concerned for personal gains and losses, but he is actually Sea God Pavilion Pavilion Master, he must be the Shrek City 1 million people considers! Let alone, in Shrek City, enlistment of Dou Ling Empire, Sky Soul Empire final Imperial Family bloodlines, in Shrek City.

“Your majesty, Shrek, although is not enough to protect Star Luo, but if your majesty wants, we are also capable of leading Imperial Family to return to Shrek, later waits for the opportunity again, looks for an opportunity to turn round, how?”

Xu Jiawei smiled, shakes the head, said: “Is impossible. Sun-Moon Empire seizes trim Continent, Shrek is only strength of the city, Sun-Moon Empire only needs to repress by the army eventually, even does not need to attack, so long as cuts off various types of supplies, sufficiently makes Shrek City be incapable of contending. Old Xuan, I urged your one, after going back, let Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family and Sky Soul Empire Imperial Family, dispersed the soldiers respectively, such, lived on dishonorably in Shi the possibility. Otherwise, Shrek City is impossible to protect them to be complete.”

Here, Xu Jiawei knelt down suddenly in front of Old Xuan.

“Your majesty, is your this does do?”Old Xuan makes way half step, surprised looks at this Emperor Star Lou Empire. From him that words, Old Xuan can see a moment ago, this Emperor Star Lou Empire, truly must above Sky Soul and Dou Ling two countries emperors. This estimate was also Star Lou Empire is last extinguishes the most important reason of country's.

“Old Xuan, I have the incident to request.”At this time, Xu Jiawei has no longer said as me.

When said these words, his look was not only earnest, was flooding a firmness beyond description.

“Your majesty please says.”Old Xuan similarly earnest replied.

Xu Jiawei sinking sound track: “After Sun-Moon Empire unifies Continent, if they must change the name to our Douluo Continent are Sun-Moon Continent. Then, please belongs to the seed that for us the Douluo Continent three countries leave behind a retaliation, in the future, will happen one day, our descendants, must change the Continent name.”

Such remarks, presented the complexions of all people changes.

Douluo Continent, this had several thousand years of name, can change really?

Several just quietly went out of the ministers in main hall to stop the footsteps, their fists, unconscious gripping is tight.

The Old Xuan body shakes, in the pale yellow eye pupil, jumped suddenly projects the unequalled none remaining.

“If Sun-Moon Empire dares to change the Continent name, then, the old man takes an oath with the name of Gluttonous Douluo, must let the Sun-Moon Empire non- Imperial Family inheritance surely, even if the worldwide chaos, refuses to balk!”

Douluo Continent this name, inherits for several thousand years, was the load bearing earnestly hoping of all Soul Master innermost feelings. Can the name of Douluo, be deceived?

The country can break, but the name of Douluo, cannot change.

Suddenly, in entire main hall, popular feeling running high, all people as if by prior agreement has done obeisance toward Old Xuan.

In this time, outside is transmitting Boundless suddenly, but great sound.

“Passes on the War-God Empress command, in three day hands over Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, Star Lou Empire may fall, does not kill the soldier, does not grab, not broken city, Star Luo City all as before. Otherwise, chicken dog does not remain!”

Speaks of the chicken dog does not keep four characters time, entire Star Luo City of giant voice vibration is shivering.

Hands over Duke White Tiger to fall?

Why can be such condition? Even if Duke White Tiger in these years, has battled with Sun-Moon Empire, Japanese empire actually also will dread him in the situation of overwhelming superiority?

“Report”

The messengers ran from outside in a hurry, “opens reports your majesty, Star Lou Empire started to encircle, the south city gate and east gate also sealed off. Before planned to go to the Star Luo official and family, even the common people, all hurried back to by Star Lou Empire continually, did not make the surrender, not let go out of town.”

Listened to messenger these words, people on the scene look at each other to change colors, doesn't let the surrender?

Duke White Tiger has nearly bitten a steel tooth, the double fist grips tightly, “bastard!”

The face muscle of Xu Jiawei is also twitching, how regardless of he cannot think that he one day will reduce to wanting to surrender may not the situation unexpectedly.

The billowing voice transmits once more, is just the same as the beforehand words. Through amplifying Soul Guidance Device of upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device supplementary, entire Star Luo City can hear this sound.

“Your majesty!”Duke White Tiger Dai Hao on one knee knees down, “please permit the feudal official one person alone combat, the feudal official did not fall, before hoping dead in battle.”

“Nonsense!”Xu Jiawei drinks fierce greatly, “you are the empire hero, if no you, Star Luo already did not exist, I can hand over myself, will not hand over you.”

“Actually, we not necessarily do not have the opportunity.”In this time, a low and deep somewhat hoarse sound is suddenly resounding.

“Um?”Xu Jiawei subconscious turning head looks, a person, from Old Xuan behind crowd.

Sees him to walk, Xu Jiawei is also good, or Duke White Tiger, has gawked staring.

If that words said from others mouth a moment ago, they will certainly think little, but said from this population, made them look like catches the straw to grasp to be ordinary.

“Porch Hall Master, what good means do you have?”Xu Jiawei asked anxiously.

Right, this person who walks from the crowd, is Tang Sect Soul Guidance Hall Hall Master Xuan Ziwen.

Xuan Ziwen seemed before was older, since for these years, he has been studying diligently, actually little participated in the manufacture of Soul Guidance Device, particularly was recent for more than one year, he was almost in the research condition every time. Until this Star Lou Empire crisis increases, this talent and Tang Sect people come out together, has brought the Tang Sect Soul Guidance Hall elite, but his research had not actually stopped. But actually radically nobody knows what he continuously research is anything.

On the Xuan Ziwen face has not normal blood flushes, but in his look has actually been full of the stimulated color, sinking sound track \; “Leaves asks them to leave, the official who cannot share hardships, does not want. Your majesty, my research success, Sun-Moon Empire wanted to accomplish the whole task at one stroke, is not that easy.”

“Um?”Duke White Tiger has stood at this time, in tiger wonderful puts brilliantly, looks at Xuan Ziwen, in the eye has been full of the hope, he knows that this perhaps was the Star Lou Empire last straw to grasp.

Sun-Moon Empire army camp.

Ju Zi(orange) wears lust red war armor, standing silently in the commander tent front, is looking into the Star Luo City top of distant place.

Three years pass by, the years have not left too many traces on her, she as before is that beautiful, suffocating of beautiful.

The ultimatum has sent out, now waited for that side response, from currently the Star Luo City situation, they absolutely does not have other choice. Duke White Tiger is proud Zhongliang, such one compels after oneself, definitely will go out of Star Luo City. As the matter stands, the Star Luo City surrender, oneself also good little to make to kill the evil, if......

Thinks of here, the body of Ju Zi(orange) trembled suddenly trembling, a fear of difficult word spreads in the heart, secretly heaved a deep sigh: Three years, he had not really come back, had not appeared. But, when attack a city seizes territory, in the heart constantly because of his form is not afraid.

Afternoon bamboo slip sells to come, Shuai Shuai who I can put on, gives everybody to sign sells the drop, the little friends, in the afternoon sees. On December 6 15 points, Chongqing purchasing books center Large open area Time Shop. Address: Chongqing Yuzhong District large open area time Tian Street hall level. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-612-part-1





Volume 13

#612 - Forcing


Will be shortly soon of great success. So long as the Star Luo City surrender, this belongs to the Douluo Continent last country also falls into oneself hand, for sometime, a Star Luo series, the Continent reunification has completed again. To that time, even if he came back, nothing but is compensates this life to him.

Thinks of here, in the Ju Zi(orange) eye reveals color of the chilly fan, Yuhao, you may know, I not only fear you to come back, and hopes you to come back. Three years do not see, you fortunately?

Three days later.

Sun-Moon Empire, commander tent.

“Hadn't the Star Luo City aspect, responded throughout?”The Ju Zi(orange) sitting well position, phoenix contains the prestige.

“Yes.”The military officer who below kneels down replied respectfully.

With these three years war, the Ju Zi(orange) authoritative date was abundant, has great power, entire Sun-Moon Empire, regardless of the people civil and military hundred officers, all respected to this female war-god queen mother. Under her rule, Sun-Moon Empire domestic calm and steady, all in good order, resort to arms like the god, integrates Sun-Moon Dou Ling Empire as well as the Star Lou Empire majority of domains, this merit, will pass on the eternity sufficiently.

Ju Zi(orange) stands up slowly, in the eye the cold brightness twinkle, “good and good Duke White Tiger, I to misread you. Passes on me to order, starts the general attack from the Star Luo City north gate, I must have a look but actually, why this Star Luo City resists my army to engage in factional strife.”

“Yes!”The audiences will drink with one voice greatly, in entire commander tent is filling the strong stimulated mood. Some that they and other this day waited are impatient, golden opportunity that this is making a name for oneself! Star Luo City in these Sun-Moon Empire military officers eyes, radically is the meat of block, whatever butchers.

“And”Bugle sound gets up, low and deep buzz the whining noise, resounds through outside entire Star Luo City. Sun-Moon Empire several Soul Engineer Corp almost also start, is headed by Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp. Hand of the National Protector five big Soul Engineer Corp lift off successively, from the sky arranges the neat square formation, coldly remote to Star Luo City. In the ground, various Soul Engineer Corp have also prepared all-out attack. Various linkage Soul Guidance Device started to transfer Soul Power, prepares the linkage.

After these years evolutions, war to this time, has not needed the ordinary soldier to break through enemy lines. The broken city in front of formidable Soul Guidance Device at is not anything, even if one of big cities Star Luo City such entire Continent have several is also same. Hard possibly can resist the bombardment of linkage Soul Guidance Device?

In the Star Luo City top, Soul Guidance Device also presented piece by piece has been able sufficiently picture, under the city, city, was densely covered various Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery as well as Soul Guidance Device.

Shrek City three big Soul Engineer Corp have all completed the combat readiness. The fort Soul Engineer Corp process strengthens. Now had over 500 Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery, they have also resisted the Sun-Moon Empire main force. If not close right up against the formidable fire support, they already could not support.

The Star Luo City linkage defense guard shield has also prepared opening. In the Soul Guidance Technology aspect, Star Lou Empire must fall behind Sun-Moon Empire many without doubt, but must say that in the Soul Master quantity, Star Lou Empire even also has the superiority, moreover is the considerably large superiority.

Star Lou Empire at this time centralized may Soul Master that not only Star Lou Empire have, belongs to Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire some Soul Master.

In Soul Master of these two countries, truly the part has hired oneself Sun-Moon Empire, but more actually ran up to Star Lou Empire. This belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries final pure lands.

Therefore, the Star Lou Empire city garrison linkage defense guard shield has enough strength to support. This is also why Star Luo City can support to the present important reason.

Naturally, this also similarly is because the High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device also need more time of Sun-Moon Empire army carry on the sufficient energy. Although the energy of light is inexhaustible, but absorbs, transforms, filters and compresses, actually needs the quite long process. Especially this science and technology just applied.

Various Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp combats were very already skilled, approaches directly step by step, bunch of glares start from the sky to congeal.

But at this time, Star Luo City actually appeared somewhat quiet, looked like in the Sun-Moon Empire army, this was their final struggling, was puts up a last-ditch struggle.

Hand of the National Protector five big Soul Engineer Corp all rise into the upper air. Disperses in five regions, remote to Star Luo City. First round of attacks always do not need them to get rid, their functions are mainly the monitoring entire battlefields. As well as appropriates lost articles to fill a vacancy.

Ju Zi(orange) in commander tent, commander tent one side, is various souls leads the screen, these souls lead the screen to connect upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device, all projects the situation of entire battlefield to here comes, makes her be able according to the battlefield situation to make the judgment, about one step deploys troops.

“Strange, to this distance, the Star Luo City aspect, how to have installed the attack of Soul Guidance Cannon ball to appear surely?”Thinking aloud of some Ju Zi(orange) doubts.

Before Star Luo City, when is lower than the Sun-Moon Empire army to attack, Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery is the most important sharp weapon, is primarily launching installs Soul Guidance Cannon to shoot surely, decides to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball biggest superiority is the striking distance, is relying on this superiority, can control between Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp and Star Luo City as far as possible is away from, although the linkage attack is strong, but the striking distance and installs compared with the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, there is not a small disparity. Even if High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device is also so, after all, these science and technology are these years study gradually, but also is inperfect.

At this time, various Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp advanced to being away from Star Luo City about five li (0.5km) being away from, this distance surely installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to play the maximum might, simultaneously the range of linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device striking distance limit, forwards again, linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device can assume an awe-inspiring pose.

In this time, in the battlefield the aspect suddenly changed.

The Star Luo City direction, bunch of rays lift off from the city suddenly. These rays are dark green, after rising into airborne, actually blooms the deep green brilliance.

The light group are not many, has several, but each volume is very gigantic. The direction that flies to shoot is also scattered, can with scattering in all directions to flutter about simply to describe. The Soul Power fluctuation that but sends out is actually not too strong.

The strong and weak of Soul Power fluctuation, the nature is reconnoitered by fluctuation Surveying Soul Guidance Device. Even if the Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp strength is strong, facing nine levels of Soul Guidance Device is also very dangerous. Therefore, what once fluctuation Surveying Soul Guidance Device judges the opposite party to start is nine levels installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, then, various Soul Engineer Corp by the linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device long-range interception, can limit its prestige in the most mild degree surely immediately. Folds in the beforehand campaign, has fully manifested its superiority.

However, these time became some is not quite as if same. The Soul Power fluctuations of these green groups are not quite only strong, most is also seven levels surely installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball the might, but the attack of this level, even if most common Soul Engineer Corp can also resist by the linkage defense guard shield.

The linkage attacked can finish sufficiently, what waiting was strikes to Star Luo City heavily, after making judgment, various Soul Engineer Corp regimental head quarters naturally issued have not intercepted the order, but opened the linkage defense guard shield. This was for them enough.

However, was in Ju Zi(orange) in commander tent actually likely is induces anything to resemble, suddenly shouted to clear the way: “Quick, issues the order, the order interception......”

She spoke of here, looks that the look of screen actually suddenly became swift and fierce, because, this issuance of order already late.

When that bunch of deep green colored light groups fly to shoot various distance Soul Engineer Corp, has not continued to shell again, but in airborne voluntarily blasted out.

Green halos from the sky proliferate, then Ju Zi(orange) surprised saw, in front of oneself dozens souls led on the screen to present the fierce distortion ripple, all pictures became are not clear, was chaotic snowflakes.

What's the matter? Ju Zi(orange) has a big shock, in commander tent other military officers were also startled. Since such situation in Sun-Moon Empire has launched war, is first meeting.

Is more surprised than them, was Sun-Moon Empire at this time is in various Soul Engineer Corp in battlefield.

From the sky blooms with that aquamarine halos, the linkage defense guard shield that Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp just released, disintegrated unexpectedly rapidly. The linkage attack that before saved also instantaneously was becoming the disorder, ray lift-offs, were quite scattered in disorder.

At this time, they have not been enough striking distance, even if 12 attacks shoot in the Star Luo City direction, does not have any threat.

After these linkage attack disorder disperse, Sun-Moon Empire several Soul Engineer Corp shocking discoveries, the linkage attack, the linkage defense, at this time was unable to continue.

Suddenly, always able to move unhindered invincible Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp, fell into a confusion.

In the Star Luo City city wall, Xuan Ziwen stands proudly, the corners of the mouth place reveals to wipe to sneer.

“Linkage Soul Guidance Device, the most major characteristics above the linkage two characters, depend upon each other same level fluctuation Soul Guidance Device, focuses on after the special guidance, is used to attack and defense. But if, did I destroy your fluctuation? Make all chaotic, I must have a look but actually, why you display the linkage attack and defense again. This is you biggest superiority, now lost.”

Yes, this is the Xuan Ziwen latest research, changes the research of war sufficiently.

Is Tang Sect Soul Guidance Hall Hall Master, belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries, most formidable nine levels of Soul Engineer. In the Xuan Ziwen heart has been very clear, by own research force, is regardless of how compared with impossible and entire Sun-Moon Empire. In this case, actually how to turn around situation?

Direction that he found, is this at present.

The Sun-Moon Empire biggest superiority, is linkage Soul Guidance Device. Once forms the linkage, in having enough formidable Soul Engineer Corp situation, even if not fear facing Limit Douluo.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket ( to be continued ) 752



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-612-part-2





Volume 13

#612 - Forcing


But if, doesn't have the linkage? Can't the concentrations of efforts of these Soul Engineer in the same place? Then, their battle efficiencies enormous degree weaken. Sole Soul Engineer, only if nine levels of Soul Engineer, otherwise at all impossible to contend with Titled Douluo.

The Sun-Moon Empire nine levels of Soul Engineer quantities are quite many, but, with belonging to compared with Titled Douluo of Douluo Continent three countries', actually must be short a lot.

Moreover, did not have the linkage attack and defense, Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp no longer is the invincible symbol.

In this case. The Xuan Ziwen investment research, how destroys linkage Soul Guidance Device.

In some time ago, him finally has succeeded, and own research place in operation during. All Tang Sect Soul Guidance Hall high level Soul Engineer, all invest now to the manufacture of this special Soul Guidance Device during.

This Soul Guidance Device, is called, Stationary Obstructing Bullet.

The has installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball long-distance special effect surely, in the meantime, can cover the enormous range, and maintains long time.

The disturbance of Stationary Obstructing Bullet is all-around, intense disorder fluctuation that has, sufficiently disturbance now upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device of Sun-Moon Empire almost all models, what is most important, all linkage Soul Guidance Device under its fluctuation disturbance, temporarily will lose the linkage special effect.

Xuan Ziwen felt only regret is, oneself this studied some late. If when initially Sun-Moon Empire just launched the war, he had this research results. Then, Sun-Moon Empire at all impossible destruction Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire. In order to belong to the strong Soul Grandmaster legion strengths of Douluo Continent three countries', coordinates Obstructing Bullet, can Soul Engineer is the suppression in the minimum degree.

This truly can reverse the research of war! Linkage Soul Guidance Device, in front of Stationary Obstructing Bullet, becomes incomparably frail. Naturally, if gives Sun-Moon Empire enough time. They can certainly study the anti-jamming device in the future, but that is not in one single day can complete.

The disturbance is easy, the anti-jamming may be much more difficult.

“Launch!”Duke White Tiger already very long not such stimulated. When he saw that linkage attack chaotic scattering in all directions launches, distant place Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp have the disorder time. The mood can be imagined.

Since Star Lou Empire by suppression firmly, has been one generation of famous commanders-in-chief, his some are only the dilutedness. But today, is relying on the function of Obstructing Bullet, he has to plant to wield finally the fist, meeting the tough head-on with toughness and enemy went all out a feeling.

Rays raise from the Star Luo City direction suddenly, has several [say / way] fully. The goal refers, is that several Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp.

Each glare, is having incomparably Xuan imposing manner. Almost every Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp, must face an attack of glare at this time.

All upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device now are disorder, therefore, is unable to evaluate the attack might of these glares. The counter-attack of Star Lou Empire, finally started.

These several glares, are Shrek City, Star Lou Empire and nine levels of Dou Ling Empire accumulation install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball finally surely!

Duke White Tiger resolutely in this first wave of attack, turned this biggest card in a hand.

He also has to so. The Stationary Obstructing Bullet at the beginning effect is best, at this time. Also is entire Sun-Moon Empire army most disorder time. Nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball not to have the linkage to defend the resistance of guard shield surely, can play the maximum might. If can succeed really comprehensively, that. Really must change the entire battlefield aspect.

Ju Zi(orange) flushed from commander tent at this time, in help of guard and under high level Soul Engineer, rapid lift-off. Just saw that several glares toward the picture that the Soul Engineer Corp direction launches.

Now wants to prevent completely, was impossible. She does not even have the means through subpoenaing Soul Guidance Device issues the order to all Soul Engineer Corp.

At this time, even if always calm she, the mind is also some confusions, she cannot think absolutely that Star Lou Empire can actually put out to disturb all linkage and Surveying Soul Guidance Device formidable Soul Guidance Device sufficiently. In her heart somewhat was also flurried. At this time, the Sun-Moon Empire aspect can rely on. Only then various Soul Engineer Corp own responses.

Sun-Moon Empire background is deep, fineness of Soul Guidance Device. As well as various Commander Soul Engineer Corp directions, in appeared the effect most in a short time.

First starts. Is the aerial flight five Hand of the National Protector Soul Engineer Corp. Glares, suddenly from Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp aspect suddenly to launch.

Although these glares have not undergone linkage attack, but actually as before from the sky collects the same place, changes into one is not the linkage attack, actually also nearly folds the glare that puts together, directly soars to conceive own that nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to welcome surely.

Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp worthily is the present age strongest military force. Each Soul Engineer, is relying on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device amplification, at least is eight levels of Soul Engineer cultivates is. The group attacks, although has 300 people. However, that powerful attack installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball from the sky to lighten that nine levels surely directly. Meanwhile, these Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp members, the body all shone the Soul Guidance Protective Cover ray, to complementary waves impact, but stood one's ground steadfastly.

Other four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp have almost adopted the similar means that they separately in four directions, faces one nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely.

Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp shoots down nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball successfully surely. But their overall strengths have after all inferior, under the intense complementary waves function of explosion, some Soul Engineer Corp people was blown off. Also there are probably about hundred people to fall from the day. These people stand in the Soul Engineer Corp front line.

The Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp situation and Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp is similar, they always to defend to be famous. About 50-60 people from airborne were rumbled.

But Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp and Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp situation was quite dreary.

What Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp most excels is speed . Moreover, they by Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong hit remnantly several years ago, although has carried on the personnel replacement rapidly. But these supplemented the personnel, cannot after all with original compares!

The Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp situation and Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp is also similar, they subordinate the Imperial Family ancestor and relative, Ju Zi(orange) after being in power, has carried on the suppression of considerable degree to the Imperial Family ancestor and relative, in addition in the past Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp lost seriously, died including the regimental commanders.

Therefore, these two Soul Engineer Corp in the unexpected situation, are the loss is serious. Numerous Soul Engineer from airborne drop shortly, finally can survive, has about one-third.

The situation in ground compares in sky is more frigid.

The ordinary Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer quality, compared with Hand of the National Protector, was much worse. In them, although some people are resisting furiously, but under the function of Stationary Obstructing Bullet, even if wants to aim is very difficult.

The bunch glare, in airborne blasts out unceasingly. Terrifying energy storm, wreaks havoc in the entire space instantaneously crazily.

However, in this large explosion approaches beforehand flickers, eight glares, from distant place suddenly to launch, from the sky bloom successively light barrier, includes in which some Soul Engineer Corp finally.

Stationary Obstructing Bullet can disturb linkage Soul Guidance Device, is actually not able to disturb the attack and defense of sole Soul Guidance Device.

These eight light barrier origins, are Sun-Moon Empire army bring eight High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device.

High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, is controlled by Sun-Moon Empire Worship Hall Hall Master Kong Deming Old Kong personally. A discovery decided the terrifying effect that makeup Obstructing Bullet brought, Old Kong has made immediately the response.

Although does not have the upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device of means by sky to carry on the positioning accuracy, but he is actually leaning on his experience and remembers that started High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device with the quickest speed.

High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device may attack to guard, he starts, is the defense strength. Because attacks now, cannot suffice that side Star Luo City. To intercept nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, does not have the means to take through upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device locking. Therefore, chose the defense at this time, was best.

Facts showed that prompt launch of Kong Deming, to Sun-Moon Empire, is the day falls the gospel simply.

The terrifying large explosion as if wreaks havoc in the entire space, crazy twinkle of various color rays outside Star Luo City, the terrifying explosive sound, making the soldiers in distant place temporarily lose the hearing. In this moment, as if became including the sky colored, the sunlight became gloomy.

This large explosion, continued to exceed the quarter the time gradually to end.

Since this war starts, this can be said as craziest one time, several nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball simultaneous firing surely! How terrifying aspect is this? Even if Sun-Moon Empire, absolutely does not have such luxurious forms of combat.

Passed the time of quarter, the entire battlefield becomes is clear gradually.

The High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device defense capability is truly good, but faces so numerous nine levels surely the effect that installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to explode, although cannot say superimposes completely, but cannot also definitely have enormous amplification.

Finally also the well-preserved guard shield has four, another four complete to shatter. In the ground, 12 Soul Engineer Corp, five forever vanished, another seven, many have certain loss.

Is this round attack, entire Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp, lost one-third battle efficiencies! This is the war in history, Sun-Moon Empire biggest loss.

Ju Zi(orange) float in midair, the double fist grips tightly, even if when the energy storm fluctuates fiercely, she has not descended to evade temporarily. She has not thought that unexpectedly will have such situation. ( to be continued ) 752



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-612-part-3





Volume 13

#613 - Suppression


Star Lou Empire is almost relying on sole Soul Guidance Device, turned around the situation unexpectedly, takes to itself the so massive loss.

Not only Soul Engineer Corp lost over one-third battle efficiencies, since long time has saved can sufficiently the energies in eight High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device consume completely, this avoid as much as possible loss.

Not only Ju Zi(orange), flies upwards to his Sun-Moon Empire military officers at this time, is the complexion is all pale.

“Repulses the enemy!”Ju Zi(orange) almost clenching jaws said these two characters. Although she clearly knows that similar attack Star Luo City is impossible to duplicate one again time, but at this time, she did not have other choice.

Although the time is very short, but Ju Zi(orange) can also make the explicit judgment, the jamming effect of that green shell is impossible to continue, after this energy storm, weakened. Will vanish after a period of time.

What is more important, after the attack, to the morale influence was really too big. Now at this time, was not absolutely suitable to continue to launch the war to get down again. If Star Luo City also has any subsequent party, was very formidabe.

The signal flare of withdrawing troops in airborne shines, but, simultaneously shines, is Shrek City direction Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery.

Before Ju Zi(orange) had anticipated installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, was similar to rains drops from the clouds generally. Crowded shell just like raining general, wide scope covers.

Five Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, had the huge function at this time particularly.

Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp 300 Soul Engineer under the order function that Ju Zi(orange) issues, is in full bloom to disperse general rapidly just like the fresh flower, changes into rays, descends in the battlefield direction. On everyone, is dozens glares jumps to shoot, with the strength of individual is intercepting airborne installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely.

In the sky, bunch of brilliant fireworks bloom unceasingly, glare twinkle, ray during jumping shoots, each eruption, will give people a dazzling and intoxicating feeling.

Other Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp also successively responded that could not attend to is sad for the companion of dying, put into during the fight in abundance, intercepted these to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely.

The war carried on was so long, the reserve of Star Luo City eventually was also limited, after this round attack. Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp withdrew from the attack range finally, but, has left behind over 400 Soul Engineer corpses.

Saw Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp dingy retreated, the entire Star Luo City top, a piece cheers.

Regarding Sun-Moon Empire, this is an unprecedented heavy loss, in turn regarding Star Lou Empire, that naturally was unprecedented win.

During oncoming of victory, making the mood of everyone be is extremely stimulated. Xuan Ziwen is the complexion blood flushes, his Stationary Obstructing Bullet, after the test of actual combat, truly can turn around the situation exists formidable!

Duke White Tiger similarly in stimulated, this time, takes to loss such big of Sun-Moon Empire, has surpassed his estimate. If no these High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device guard shields that would be nice! In that case, ground that several Soul Engineer Corp, will certainly be annihilated.

However, this was good enough. Although Star Luo City were not many in the reserve material in Soul Guidance Device aspect. However, do not forget, here, the formidable Soul Master quantity are many! So long as there is existence of Stationary Obstructing Bullet, all these, become very meaningful.

The terrifying explosion from the sky glitters, each glare from the sky transforms enchanting brilliance. The war entered the quiet condition temporarily.

In the battlefield, is actually one piece in confusion.

These in Soul Engineer that in energy storm falls from the sky, is impossible to have the corpse remaining. This is the brutality of Soul Guidance Device war.

Sun-Moon Empire commander tent.

The Ju Zi(orange) complexion was pale silent enough the time of quarter, started to issue orders.

All nine levels of Soul Engineer, all gather in commander tent, includes Kong Deming Old Kong.

“This time, we do not prepare, the similar situation cannot occur again. The numerous positions consecrate, tomorrow will make war again, asking everybody to be responsible for these Obstructing Bullet intercepts, must unable to make them have today such influence.”Ju Zi(orange) said to numerous position nine levels of Soul Engineer.

Kong Deming brow micro wrinkle, sinking sound track: “Has not thought really that Star Lou Empire can study such Soul Guidance Device unexpectedly. Has existence of this Obstructing Bullet, truly is to our enormous weakening. I have examined carefully. The time that the disturbance fluctuation continues, surpasses the thirty minutes, although the production cost is not low. But is also equal to seven levels installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely the standard. By the Star Lou Empire ability, can carry on the volume production. But this Obstructing Bullet jamming coverage is very big. Therefore has created the effect in today's battlefield. To avoid disturbing completely, at least currently speaking is impossible. Our linkage Soul Guidance Device, will be affected. Now the best means that cope with Stationary Soul Guidance Device on the contrary.”

Ju Zi(orange) shook the head, said: “It is not good, without enough time. We for these years regarding the research and production of Stationary Soul Guidance Device reduced, wants to assemble enough installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, in the time insufficient. Therefore, we can do now, only then uses on hand on strength. Star Luo City, good Duke White Tiger. I must have a look but actually, is relying on the function of this Obstructing Bullet, can he resist the attack of my Sun-Moon Empire army? Old Kong, tomorrow, troubles you to direct Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp personally, how?”

Kong Deming nodded silently.

Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp is truly formidable, but, in this formidable behind also has the hidden danger. Humanoid Soul Guidance Device needs greatly strengthened Spiritual Power to control. To the Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp member, was not be initially impossible to achieve. Why can have the present strength? Is because Kong Deming studied a mystique, took consuming the vitality as the price, promoted Spiritual Power to the enough formidable degree.

Therefore, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp these Soul Engineer, the individual strength actually is also five rings and six rings. Is relying on formidable Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, can promote about cultivating to eight rings to be. But the hidden danger is, their lives be much shorter than ordinary Soul Master, cannot surpass 50 years old dead absolutely. Meanwhile, because of the excessive promotion of Spiritual Power, in addition the great strength of own strength, has fostered their haughty dispositions. It is not the absolute powerhouse, is very difficult to control them. Is controlled by Kong Deming personally, can display the Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp true battle efficiency. Especially in losing the linkage Soul Guidance Device situation is so.

Without existence of linkage Soul Guidance Device, must spell by the absolute strength hardly. Ju Zi(orange) does not believe that after having that Obstructing Bullet, Star Luo City can contend with the Sun-Moon Empire army.

After all, since for these years, the Sun-Moon Empire overall strength has inflated was too fierce, vigorously develops the military force, now the total military strength surpasses 3 million, invests this war has 1 million, at least is Emperor Star Luo ** over two times of team . Moreover, the Soul Engineer Corp quantity is numerous, even if loses seriously, but massive Soul Guidance Device and Soul Guidance Array also. Spells hardly, Star Luo City does not have the opportunity similarly. Only if they can also have the massive nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, but that is impossible. Nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely are not the cabbages.

The night is quiet and silent. Star Luo City excited been quietly vanished, in the city all appear very busy.

Since today a war, Star Lou Empire it can be said that obtained for three years the unprecedented big successful battle, but all people also understand that such successful battle means that death enmity between Star Lou Empire and Sun-Moon Empire has had, once the war ended, perhaps is very difficult some people able to escape by luck.

Crosses the rubicon, in this case, the Star Lou Empire person unites as one all, only has contends at risk of life, in addition the function of Obstructing Bullet, may find a way out.

This was the only opportunity.

That night, Emperor Sun-Moon Empire Xu Jiawei is sleepless, Duke White Tiger Dai Hao is sleepless, Old Xuan, sleepless......

In the morning, when first wipes sunlight to raise from the distant place, shines on grand Star Luo City, Star Luo City has as if covered light golden color. But Sun-Moon Empire army, the low and deep toot actually started to resound.

After yesterday afternoon and a rest all night, the entire Sun-Moon Empire big camp looked like awoke the lion is ordinary, that toot, looked like roaring of lion, indicates that the sharp lackey will soon reach Star Luo City.

Before Sun-Moon Empire sieges the Star Lou Empire army not immediately clashes, but four directions big camp actually all going into action aggressively.

Through looking at far Soul Guidance Device can see from the Star Luo City direction indistinctly, these Sun-Moon Empire armies, are disassembling their Soul Guidance Array.

Disassembles the Soul Guidance Array place, can only two situations, retreat, alternatively, marches!

Stands in the city, Duke White Tiger the Dai Hao complexion is very ugly, Sun-Moon Empire must accomplish the whole task at one stroke very much obviously, they are impossible to retreat. Disassembles the Soul Guidance Array place, for moves ahead Soul Guidance Array, the direct attack Star Luo City itself, simultaneously shields their Soul Engineer Corp.

Procedure that this does not leave a way out without doubt, if all Soul Guidance Array were routed, the Sun-Moon Empire army in any will not have based on, but, that really possible?

Over a million armies and military baggage simultaneously revolve, at this time outside Star Luo City, looks like a giant grinding pan starts slow revolving, moreover in unceasing acceleration. Must engage in factional strife Star Luo City, grinds the powder dust.

To this time, the soldiers and civilians in Star Luo City did not have other choice, they can only be ready that fights at risk of life. This war has won, they may live, if lost, then, surely is Star Luo City forever the destruction.

Sought the monthly ticket and recommendation vote support for our peerless Tang Sect last month. Here also thanked the enthusiasm of Chongqing book friends, you made me be moved, let me, because you liked the mountain city. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-613-part-1





Volume 13

#613 - Suppression


Shrek Academy and Tang Sect powerhouses also early arrived in the top. They are all centralized the north city gate, here is the genuine main battlefield, Sun-Moon Empire Hand of the National Protector five Soul Engineer Corp all here.

Does not rout these five Soul Engineer Corp, their opportunity does not have. Did not have the opportunity, but after Stationary Obstructing Bullet appears, the opportunity, as if came.

The low and deep toot gradually becomes sonorous, the skylight is greatly bright, late in the morning. The Sun-Moon Empire army leaves behind the ancient covered wagon with large army, starts slowly actually firm has oppressed in the Star Luo City direction slowly.

Emperor Star Lou Empire Xu Jiawei dresses up personally, arrived above the top. Stands in Duke White Tiger side Dai Hao, they stand shoulder to shoulder.

Xu Jiawei shows a faint smile, said: “Dai Hao, do you know? I once very much dreaded in you.”

Duke White Tiger gives a calm smile, “I know certainly. Otherwise, why can I keep west border? At my merit, already should be actually three services commander, not?”

Xu Jiawei sighed, said: “Yes! Is jealous of capable people, I do not match am Monarch of the country.”

Duke White Tiger shakes the head, said: “Cannot say that the king plan, each king, runs into my such official, can perhaps so.”

This Star Luo Emperor said with a smile: “Perhaps. Has not thought really that I really have with the opportunity that you fight side-by-side together, you know that what I am feel now? I am honored very much.”

Duke White Tiger also laughs, “I am also.”

In the Star Luo Emperor eye the ray puts greatly, “comes, makes these Sun-Moon Empire fellows come, I must have a look but actually, is my Star Luo City drops down first, good deed Emperor Sun-Moon ** the blood stream of team completely.”

The frontage, Hand of the National Protector, five Soul Engineer Corp separate slowly, in the sky, various Surveying Soul Guidance Device also slowly forward suppress. In the ground, after surplus Soul Engineer Corp carry on reorganizes, full Bian six Soul Engineer Corp follow the advance. Naturally, this is only north strength, in other three, has Soul Engineer Corp to coordinate the soldier vanguard similarly, prepares to construct the Soul Guidance Array place.

The Sun-Moon Empire tactic is very simple, must in the range, construct the Soul Guidance Array place. But such simple tactic, actually at this time was most fatal. Once because Soul Guidance Array constructs, relies on the Soul Guidance Array formidable destructive power, Star Luo City can disturb the opposite party to launch the linkage defense and attack, cannot certainly withstand.

Only is worth rejoicing is, yesterday these High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device consumed enormously, at least in a short time could not display the complete prestige to be able.

“Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery, preparation. Obstructing Bullet, preparation.”

“Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery, launch!”With Duke White Tiger low and deep roaring, Star Luo City looks like a big hedgehog is ordinary, own sharp thorn completely outward ** however leaves. Suddenly, the Sun-Moon Empire army of Soul Guidance Cannon ball that is hard to count toward distant place projects.

This time, Duke White Tiger has not made Obstructing Bullet release immediately. The Obstructing Bullet quantity is limited, after the enemy knows Obstructing Bullet has smiled, if directly uses again, without doubt will be intercepted heartlessly. Dai Hao is very clear, perhaps in these Soul Engineer Corp, nine levels of Soul Engineer already had prepared, specifically is responsible for intercepting Obstructing Bullet. Therefore, he must immediately, the investment attack.

The Soul Engineer Corp linkage defense guard shield first haunches, without existence of Obstructing Bullet, these linkage defense guard shields in the battlefield simply is invincible existence.

The time that what a pity, they have is only the flash.

Green halos, being quietly spreads in the battlefield, rapid the entire frontal battlefield completely will have covered.

On the Kong Deming old face of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp front line reveals a surprised color, “good sly fellow.”Is the fathers of nine levels of Soul Engineer, he one understands that was swindled.

The previous time, Obstructing Bullet in launch, is all sending out the aquamarine ray, in battlefield that obvious, looks like the fireworks that puts is simply ordinary. But this time, Obstructing Bullet is actually the release of being quietly.

Very obviously, this type installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball not to need that aquamarine ray surely, reason that the previous time has that ray, inevitably is the Star Luo City aspect intentionally. But this time, under the function of this erroneous zone, Star Luo City aspect extremely good has used the interception thoughts in Sun-Moon Empire army. Is installing in these Obstructing Bullet mixtures the Soul Guidance Cannon ball directly surely, launches with the aid of Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery. Immediately played the unexpected effect, lets airborne upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device, as well as all linkage Soul Guidance Device, lost the effect once more.

Ju Zi(orange) or Kong Deming, have to raise up the thumb, commended one.

Tang Sect, Beibei, He Caitou and Xu Sanshi three people are gathering, dark smiling. This idea not from Duke White Tiger, but came from this brother three. Because Obstructing Bullet, although is Xuan Ziwen studies, but is responsible for manufacturing and using truly, He Caitou that actually Tang Sect Soul Guidance Hall vice- Hall Master, in new generation Shrek Seven Devils is listed second.

Duke White Tiger is with smile on the face, turns around to give the thumbs-up to He Caitou.

The Obstructing Bullet display function, is all premises that Star Luo City resists the Sun-Moon Empire army. Cannot block linkage Soul Guidance Device, said that anything is useless.

“First, second, third, fourth, Soul Master legion, attack!”Duke White Tiger explodes drinks one, pulls out the waist long sword suddenly, the sharp sword glow, points to the Sun-Moon Empire army direction.

Forms leap instantaneously, changes into the flowing light, directly soars the Sun-Moon Empire army direction to fly to shoot to go.

Gives play to advantage, is in the war one of the most important essential factors. The Star Lou Empire aspect, the only superiority, possibly was the Soul Master quantity and quality.

After these light shadow fly to shoot, in the sky, suddenly resounds low and deep roaring, the roaring voice is giant, just like thunderous general.

Huge yellow light shadow appears.

This yellow light shadow is the kilometer, build is quite huge, is ordinary just like the great cow. Gluttonous Douluo Old Xuan Martial Soul avatar, Gluttonous Divine Bull.

That form, all stable falling on Gluttonous Divine Bull, reaches several thousand people. The Gluttonous Divine Bull personal appearance in airborne dodges, overran toward distant place airborne Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp outrageously.

Fights to win or die, no one had the escape route, Shrek Academy also similarly so. To achieve the success of this war, not only need put together the strength, meanwhile must put together the tactic, tactic that Duke White Tiger arranged last night, almost is the surprise-attack forces.

This did not conform to his forms of combat, he is always primarily the open and aboveboard open intrigue, when the strength is inferior to the match, overall strength disparity big time, he actually has to use the surprise-attack forces. Is one generation of famous commanders-in-chief, even if uses the surprise-attack forces, he similarly is extremely formidable.

Obstructing Bullet is the first wave of surprise-attack forces, then, at present these four Soul Master legion 4000 people, are the second wave of surprise-attack forces.

These four Soul Master legion, directly from Shrek Academy as well as Tang Sect powerhouse commander, their goals, must rout that total quantity also less than 2000 people of Hand of the National Protector five Soul Engineer Corp. Only then routs this most formidable five Soul Engineer Corp, they can win the opportunity.

Ju Zi(orange) at this time already not in commander tent, although she arranged has prevented the Obstructing Bullet measure, but she actually already judged, the Star Luo City aspect will not certainly hesitate at all costs made Obstructing Bullet play the role, otherwise this war they did not need to continue.

However, Ju Zi(orange) has not thought obviously, unexpectedly such easy * was harassed. However, now these were unimportant, more importantly at present this fight of meeting the tough head-on with toughness.

Huge Gluttonous Divine Bull must rush to the Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp near shortly, suddenly, one group of intense silver light bloom suddenly.

Towering that very this group of silver light present, looks like originally on there, was waiting for Gluttonous Divine Bull hits.

The silver light launches instantaneously, changes into huge light barrier, unexpectedly stiffly has covered Gluttonous Divine Bull.

Must know that the Gluttonous Divine Bull volume is huge, above also sits several thousand Soul Master! Unexpectedly one had been only installed by that silver. Even if linkage Soul Guidance Device, as if no this grade of prestige to be able existence, Old Xuan, but the powerhouse of Limit Douluo level!

Round silver moon, rises suddenly into airborne, in an instant, the sunlight in sky vanished unexpectedly. silver moon in the sky, that light barrier and silver moon complement each other fresh splendor. Actually stiffly lived in Old Xuan that fierce brunting containment.

Stood loses one's voice to call out in Xuan Ziwen of Star Luo City top: “silver moon Douluo, is Old Kong. Old Kong!”

Said him of Old Kong these two characters from the mouth, the complexion changed instantaneously, in the look was flooding fear beyond description unexpectedly. Yes, is frightened, Xuan Ziwen that is always fearless, has had the frightened mood unexpectedly.

In an instant, in the sky the innumerable rays go toward the Gluttonous Divine Bull concentrated fire, although does not have the ability of linkage attack, but, the prestige of over a thousand Soul Engineer all-out attacks can be able be imagined.

But is Limit Douluo Old Xuan, on pair of buffalo and cow horns Huang Guang da puts, wants to clash from that silver light barrier, but that silver illumination is similar to the sticky candy is ordinary, will be supported by him in a big way, is actually not able to run out.

In light barrier, all Soul Master are also various show its energies, is attacking silver light barrier whole-heartedly. However, their attacks, do not have one to be separated from the light barrier range.

Star Luo City head.

Xuan Ziwen dull looks at this, “has succeeded, his unexpectedly really success. Old Kong, Old Kong is existences of ten levels of Soul Engineer levels, is equal to Soul Master of Limit Douluo level! By the Transcendent Douluo strength, integrates in own Soul Guidance Device completely. This and this were initially Old Kong had proposed, only then in the idea existed the assigned Soul Guidance Device? By own Martial Soul, with the aid of the strength of world, dissolves with most formidable Soul Guidance Device as one. Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover, in front of this Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover, initially Grim Reaper Douluo Grim Reaper Tower, simply was a joke!”1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-613-part-2





Volume 13

#613 - Suppression


Only can the passive defensive, actually unable to attack, Gluttonous Divine Bull and several thousand Soul Master from Star Luo City, completely have become the target.

Is headed by Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, Hand of the National Protector five Soul Engineer Corp encircle rapidly, has launched attack whole-heartedly, in the ground, before Soul Engineer that clashes, constructs the Soul Guidance Array place rapidly, starts to airborne Gluttonous Divine Bull by the Soul Guidance Array formidable attack.

But Gluttonous Divine Bull Soul Master, can only by the respective ability goes passively resist the external attack, is actually not able to counterattack, suddenly, has been at the extremely disadvantageous position.

This is because of the situation that in linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device was contained unable to use, otherwise, these Soul Engineer Corp use the linkage attack, perhaps has taken to their giant casualties.

Duke White Tiger the complexion is quite ugly at this time, this silver light barrier never appears in the battlefield. Not only the card in a hand Star Lou Empire has, Sun-Moon Empire also has similarly. Several thousand years of Soul Guidance Technology background! At this time, burst out completely.

Old Xuan by strength of the, is impossible to protect the residence to have the person, cultivates for low Soul Master, started to fall from the sky.

Such aspect, Old Xuan is also first facing, in the roaring sound, the whole body yellow color ray started becomes more and more powerful.

In others opinion that is only silver light barrier, but is Limit Douluo he actually understands that in this silver light barrier was not has replied on the strength of moon radically, but has drawn support from Space Power. One as well as Soul Master attack, overwhelming majorities were unloaded into the space. Otherwise, these many people attack, let alone is ten levels of Soul Guidance Device, even if 12 levels of Soul Guidance Device, is impossible to resist.

Space Power?

Old Xuan roared, pair of buffalo and cow horns gradually turned into the silver, sky over his top of the head, one group of silver glares reappeared gradually, around this group of silver glares, but also has a black halo faintly, that clearly torn space.

Kong Deming sees this, in heart sighs one darkly, he discovers eventually early, was really has been a pity, if this time, did not have to grasp Space Power Limit Douluo, by own Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover, can make these Soul Master continuously by the concentrated fire lethal.

The Old Kong big hand wields, the airborne indistinct ray puts greatly, silver light barrier before Old Xuan launches the attack, quietly dispersing. However, the external attack had not actually stopped.

Old Kong has not thought must surround the people by own Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover, his only needing made the potential of formation present besieging enough.

Glares burst out from Gluttonous Divine Bull suddenly.

In the long dragon roar sound, a golden big dragon shoots up to the sky, the innumerable tears, like the prison, bloom densely suddenly, making a recent piece of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp member have to haunch the safety mask one by one, attacked one slow.

Light Sacred Dragon avatar, this is, Beibei!

The innumerable carapaces open, from the sky changes into the giant shield, has blocked the frontage big piece attack, the innumerable rays were rebounded to return. In the carapace surface, golden light sparkles, above a big snake circles, the blood red eye pupil is looking steadily at front enemy, as if must select the person to bite.

Eternal Defense Black Tortoise Shield, this is, Xu Sanshi!

The bunch ray welcomed air burst opens, accurate incomparable attacked various within diameter hundred meters range intercepts completely, that was a whole body is hidden the man in heavy armor, the body all was various Soul Guidance Cannon and Soul Guidance Ray muzzle, destruction beams crazy fell in torrents outward, prevented the massive attacks.

Source of Destruction, He Caitou!

A pink big snake from the sky launches the personal appearance, the pale golden halo haunches outward, cultivates one piece for weak Soul Master protection.

Paragon Golden Body, displays by soft muscle python, this is Madness Soft Rabbit, Jiang Nannan!

Low and deep flute sound from the sky reverberates, nine phoenixes soar, on them is glittering the different colors, any attack will fall on them crossing over naturally, but their place visited, various attacks deviated path originally naturally.

flute cauldron outstanding in both fields, Flute-Cauldron Douluo, Nine Phoenix Dancing Flute, Xiao Xiao!

12 wings launch, the big angel arrives, layer upon layer Saint light drops from the clouds, falls on each Soul Master, has brought strength of the golden protection to them.

Angel Douluo, Ye Guyi!

The pink big dragon from the sky launches the personal appearance, a layer upon layer pink halo spreads from it, any attack contacts with this pink halo, naturally disappears.

Rouge Dragon avatar, Rouge Douluo, Nan Qiuqiu!

The startled Sky Sword light curls up together, hundred meters great blade edge appears, first Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer, perishes in the sword light.

Sword Mad Douluo, Sword of Trial, Ji Juechen!

Yes, they, from, Tang Sect!

Eight Titled Douluo that Tang Sect currently has. Three years, were relying on the initial miracle cure as well as their assiduous effort, they are the Titled Douluo level powerhouses. Everyone is having the formidable strength.

This time they, have haunched Tang Sect completely, has haunched the Shrek younger generation. What a pity, in Tang Sect, most formidable two are not, otherwise, ten big Douluo get together, that is the Tang Sect true ultimate strength!

Besides Tang Sect eight Titled Douluo, came from Shrek Academy as well as Star Lou Empire, Dou Ling Empire and Sky Soul Empire Titled Douluo, is various show its energies, releases the formidable ability respectively, carries on the back from Gluttonous Divine Bull, flies to shoot just like Heavenly Woman Scattering Flower generally outward. Forms from the sky transform the enchanting brilliance, not only blocks the massive attacks, threw toward these Soul Engineer.

The Soul Engineer biggest superiority is linkage Soul Guidance Device, is, distance! So long as pulls closer the distance, the true Soul Master powerhouse, does not fear Soul Engineer absolutely.

However, the distance is not good to pull closer, even if there is powerhouse of Titled Douluo rank to front, Soul Master, actually as before some unceasing people die.

Follows these 4000 people that Old Xuan goes to battle with, is elite in Soul Master is, most at least is also above five rings cultivates is. Below seven rings, all relies on Flight Soul Guidance Device to fly, above seven rings part is also so, only then these are good at flying, relies on own ability float in airborne.

In this case, so long as from airborne falls from the sky, that also means to perish.

Fight in sky, the flash entered the superheating condition.

The Star Luo City direction, Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery was crying out crazily, glares jumped to shoot unceasingly, in the meantime, the Star Luo City aspect, the frontage three city gates also opened, in the city wall, huge forms also appeared, they used the quickest speed to rely on an only long foot outward to climb up.

Shrek City fort Soul Engineer Corp.

After these years enhancements, the fort Soul Engineer Corp battle efficiency compared before had the qualitative leap, any All Terrain Self Walking Artillery battle efficiency can compare favorably with seven levels of Soul Guidance Device. In addition internal three Soul Engineer control. Now entire fort Soul Engineer Corp altogether has 500 All Terrain Self Walking Artillery. Is coordinating the fire on top, their horsepower full, directly soars the opposite to flush away in construction Soul Guidance Array. Their duties, tear into shreds these Soul Guidance Array places, must unable to make them take shape.

Otherwise, once Soul Guidance Array completes, Soul Master that then, regarding sky in fought, is as for Star Luo City, will be the ruinous disaster.

Not only fort Soul Engineer Corp sent out, Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp also along with it touching.

300 forms, soar from the top, reason that they do not have to begin immediately, because they are in all teams the battle efficiency are strongest at present.

Three years of polish, Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp individual battle efficiency, had the enormous promotion, Tang Sect all most outstanding Soul Guidance Device, all assembles on them. It can be said that the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp single body battle efficiency, is Star Lou Empire, can compare favorably with Sun-Moon Empire Hand of the National Protector five big Soul Engineer Corp only.

Naturally, what this finger is Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, compared with Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, has the enormous disparity as before.

The ordinary soldier was unable to play anything to affect in the battlefield, Sun-Moon Empire, they assist the Soul Guidance Array place. But Star Luo City, is responsible for shipping the commodity.

Everyone knows that fight between this Soul Engineer and Soul Master, decided the entire war trend is most important. Other all, are unimportant.

Duke White Tiger continuously is carrying on direction, in the top, various Soul Guidance Device already in the maximum degree is falling in torrents the fire outward.

The fights of other Star Luo City three directions also started, but at this time, Duke White Tiger could not attend to the direction of that three direction.

The frontal battlefield is most important, that three direction equipment, only then certain Stationary Obstructing Bullet, as well as linkage defense guard shield.

Frontal battlefield, to guarantee to make enemy unable to use linkage Soul Guidance Device, the Obstructing Bullet investment quantity is extremely numerous, therefore, Star Luo City, oneself cannot use linkage Soul Guidance Device similarly. Other three directions, linkage attack not enough manpower, but starts the linkage defense, temporarily can stabilize stays in a brothel overnight the surface.

Duke White Tiger in the gambling, he also has to bet, the card in a hand on hand were too few, only then chooses all gambling stakes presses in the frontal battlefield, has the possibility of obtaining wins finally.

The aspect in battlefield is very frigid, Ju Zi(orange) in the rear area looks. She knows certainly that which people from Shrek Academy and Tang Sect, in her heart are also intertwining.

Only then she knows that two people have not appeared in the battlefield, but they, under existence of Obstructing Bullet, had the change war possibility! 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-613-part-3





Volume 13

#614 - You Dare!


She does not believe that that two people who three years have not presented will appear at this time. However, she feared very much that feared in the future that two people will appear!

If during Tang Sect and Shrek Academy powerhouses die in this fight at present, the dead enmity will have, again did not have other possibilities.

In the heart of Ju Zi(orange) is intertwining, in the pain, always resolute she, unexpectedly somewhat could not set firm resolve at this time.

“Marshal, orders.”Military officer somewhat anxious saying.

Ju Zi(orange) sighed, urged several in a low voice.

In the battlefield, entered the deadlock now, because fought just started, now both sides Soul Master and Soul Engineer Soul Power was in top form, the ability hardly spells, after only then consumes the certain extent, the casualties speed will increase suddenly.

What is most intrepid is Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, they under suddenly contact, several people die, but under the direction of Kong Deming, withdraws immediately, spreads out, simultaneously striking power full. On Kong Deming shines the bunch of powerful silver light unceasingly, suppressed Old Xuan is unable unexpectedly the near.

At this time, the great strength of Shrek Academy Soul Master individual strength has appeared, Ancient Elder from Sea God Pavilion, the Shrek Academy Inner Court powerhouse as well as Tang Sect powerhouses, rushes to the Soul Engineer near first. In the entire battlefield, had been covered by various enchanting wedding rays completely.

In this time, suddenly, the strange ray is raising from the Sun-Moon Empire army together suddenly, this ray comes very towering, without any omen. The ray place visited, regardless of the enemy and ourselves, Soul Master and Soul Engineer in big piece of battlefield was swept immediately.

Moreover, this ray main goal, unexpectedly is Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp.

Resists Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, is Star Lou Empire here Soul Master most powerhouse, therefore, they immediately were also covered by this ray.

The intense weak feeling, spreads over the whole body instantaneously, Soul Power has not received anything to affect, but the vitality actually suddenly becomes feeble. Airborne is fighting Soul Master, stagnate.

Originally violently offensive, in this case, attenuated several points immediately.

Phoenix Douluo Ma Xiaotao is releasing Phoenix Meteor Shower, after this beam, body in airborne in a flash, the intense fatigue made her fighting intent one reduce unexpectedly, Phoenix Meteor Shower also broke along in.

Another side, Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer, although also same that ray, but actually raises a light light membrane, that matter ray isolation outside, had not been affected obviously.

Weakening Ray? So wide scope? This at least is also nine levels of Soul Guidance Device . Moreover, is not ordinary nine levels of Soul Guidance Device is right.

The card in a hand everyone has, Sun-Moon Empire card in a hand, to be how less than Star Lou Empire. But they do not have the Obstructing Bullet this rarely seen immediate influence war card in a hand.

This Weakening Ray, truly is nine levels of Soul Guidance Device, reason that can one cover that huge range, because, it is disposable Soul Guidance Device.

A little looks like installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, but with installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely some differences. Controllable. The striking power was inferior, but control is much stronger. But such Weakening Ray, not only but together!

Weakening Ray from the sky have swept, Soul Master in more than 4000 Star Lou Empire aspects, had the majority immediately the move. In this case, the Soul Master battle efficiency weakens immediately large scale.

This has not calculated that is also another color beam appears, this time, then shines Soul Engineer completely on Sun-Moon Empire aspect.

Immediately, Soul Engineer shapes have hit chicken blood, not only Soul Power strengthens, becomes the imposing manner is different. This is, Stimulating Ray effect. Promotes Soul Power 10%, strengthens the mind concentration degree, has certain bloodthirsty effect. Similarly is also disposable nine levels of Soul Guidance Device.

Weakens the match, amplification. These two nine levels of Soul Guidance Ray, changed the aspect in entire battlefield immediately. Originally also some rubber situation, had the reversal immediately.

The situation in ground is also so, Sun-Moon Empire comes prepared after all, was started to construct by Soul Guidance Array, with the Shrek City two big Soul Engineer Corp mutual correlations, although is also inferior, but has also stabilized. In process that many Soul Guidance Array are in construct. Under is in inverse proportion, in less than too for a long time, Sun-Moon Empire will certainly have the absolute superiority.

The airborne war retreats in defeat again and again, in the ground gradually was also changed the inferiority by the opposite party. In top, Duke White Tiger a pair of tiger claw according to above embattlement, painful has closed eyes.

In the face of the absolute strength, surprise attack no longer had the effect. In his heart heaved a deep sigh, was the good fortune makes the person really! If can be earlier to study Stationary Obstructing Bullet, the result of war is not this will be certainly right. Even if were extinguished later to study in Dou Ling Empire, with enough time. At least that time Star Lou Empire most flourishing condition.

But now, only remaining was headed by Star Luo City this territory, Star Lou Empire enough strength has not contended with formidable Sun-Moon Empire finally. Has not supported, not following. If not the support of Shrek Academy, even the present situation is impossible to have.

Late, all late. Ended, all ended.

In this time, a powerful big hand is falling on Duke White Tiger the shoulder. Duke White Tiger opening eyes pupil, turns head to look to Star Luo Emperor Xu Jiawei.

On the Xu Jiawei face, he saw the light smile unexpectedly.

“Your majesty, sorry, the feudal official and feudal official cannot maintain the Star Luo final hope.”Duke White Tiger tiger is red.

Xu Jiawei actually shook the head, sighs, said: “This result I already had guessed actually correctly, can make me the one day of hope, I actually already very satisfied. Evidently, this Sun-Moon Empire will not let off in any event your. Perhaps same will not let off me. This is also good. Ordered to withdraw troops. In any event, Shrek Academy and Tang Sect elite cannot damage. They are the hopes of future Continent. Still remembers I had spoken yesterday words?”

Duke White Tiger nodded silently, Xu Jiawei said right, at this time, is the preserved effective strength that can do. At least so far, Sun-Moon Empire has never attacked Shrek City, had not attacked to the Shrek Academy person whole-heartedly. So long as Shrek Academy and Shrek City as well as Tang Sect still, belong to the Douluo Continent three countries have the opportunity.

“Withdraws troops!”Duke White Tiger clenches the teeth, roars to make noise suddenly.

The signal of withdrawing troops raises in the Star Luo City direction, when that strong signal ray from the sky sparkles, Soul Master of front combat, are the Star Lou Empire soldiers and military officers in city, all heart big change.

Everyone understands, the order that this withdraws troops means anything, perhaps this war, really must end, forever finished. This was also announcing, unified the Continent empire, finally must appear.

Old Xuan heaved a deep sigh, the huge personal appearance in airborne changed the human form, vision brilliant looks at not far away silver moon Douluo Kong Deming, “your my outcome has not divided, if for Academy, which abilities today surely do not try your ten levels of Soul Engineer also to have.”

Kong Deming said indifferently: “In the future some are the time, certainly will consult. Let your people stop.”

Old Xuan nod of silently.

The battlefield stopped in minutes, Sun-Moon Empire has not continued to attack again, Shrek Academy and Tang Sect, as well as Star Luo, Dou Ling and Sky Soul Empire Soul Master, has not continued to display Soul Ability again.

The war carries on at present this degree, all became irreversible. Had finished, all finished. Then can do, to all people, is waiting for the arrival of result.

Old Xuan has not persisted in battling, similarly also to grasp Shrek City and Academy strength! Put together already not any opportunity hardly. Shrek Academy after is independent existence. Sun-Moon Empire do not die the meaning of Shrek Academy putting together.

Even if were they have seized entire Continent, must care about the Shrek Academy strength. Does not consider that missing Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, must consider that numerous powerhouses who graduates from Shrek Academy. In these powerhouses who Sun-Moon Empire surrenders, does not know that has many people to graduate from Shrek Academy, Shrek Academy is the Soul Master sacred place, if Sun-Moon Empire dares to brave public opinion attacks Shrek City, massacres Shrek Academy all high levels, will directly vacillate then them to rule the Continent basis.

But at present such situation, Sun-Moon Empire does not need to do, such will not have any significance, they only need to control Continent completely in their hand, Shrek City is then independent, at is not anything, could not affect the general situation. Has Shrek City to exist, but can also make these powerhouses who graduates from Shrek Academy not continue to revolt.

Must leave behind a ray of hope belonging to the Douluo Continent three countries'. This is Sun-Moon Empire all high-level mutual recognition.

Therefore, after Old Xuan ordered to call a halt, Kong Deming also immediately orders, making Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp completely call a halt, to Shrek Academy and Tang Sect, as well as Soul Master in Star Luo City aspect retreated slowly.

Ju Zi(orange) under the protection of guards, flies the front, arrives at side Kong Deming. During her expression is somewhat strange, is excited, not normal blood flushes, anticipate this moment, her waited for a long time was too too long, to not rule Continent, but to bury that bitter hatred in heart!

Ju Zi(orange) takes a deep breath, looks to opposite, sinking sound track: “Passes on me to order, making Star Luo City hand over Duke White Tiger, may make Star Luo surrender.”

Kong Deming looked at Ju Zi(orange) one, on the old face reveals a smile, nodded.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-614-part-1





Volume 13

#614 - You Dare!


Also had the military officer to question that the order of Ju Zi(orange), various Soul Engineer Corp regimental commanders, after all, in this time war, Soul Engineer Corp lose particularly seriously, many Soul Engineer died during yesterday's fight.

But after, they saw the Old Kong nod has approved the Ju Zi(orange) words, again also nobody dares to raise the objection.

Has the Old Kong support, War-God Empress does not have anybody to dare to defy in Sun-Moon Empire eventually. Also because has the support of Kong Deming, Ju Zi(orange) can be so smooth regarding the rule of entire Sun-Moon Empire.

“Passes on the War-God Empress command, my Sun-Moon Empire, thinks of gratefully the friendliness of world, is not willing to make to slaughter, so long as Star Lou Empire hands over Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, allowing Star Lou Empire to surrender. If there is revolt again, massacres city!”

The huge sound through amplifying Soul Guidance Device passes on to the Star Luo City direction, quick has covered entire Star Luo City.

In the top, Star Luo Emperor Xu Jiawei lowered the head silently, the double fist grips tight, said in a low voice: “Dai brother, the hell, must have me to accompany.”

At this time, did not have other to choose, for the Star Luo City 1 million soldiers and civilians, even if he, cannot prevent Dai Hao to walk again. This truth, everyone understands.

The Star Luo City top, dies general silence, all people silently are waiting.

The generals kneel down one by one, is the soldiers, again, is the common people. From top to city, dense has knelt a piece.

Duke White Tiger has turned around slowly, on the somewhat old face, has revealed a light smile, the sinking sound track: “My Dai Hao, goes on an expedition the life for the country, self-examines to do one's best. Today, for my Star Luo City 1 million soldiers and civilians, why Dai Hao wants stingy this excellent head. The numerous positions, Duoduo takes care, Dai Hao, goes!”

At the same time was saying, he turns around to soar.

At this moment, the form threw together fiercely, effort holds in the arms the waist of Dai Hao, “the father, you cannot go, you cannot go!”

This throws, is Dai Hao personal guard, is his youngest son, Dai Louli.

Because Dai Louli the combat is fierce, military exploit, now is also a general, is Duke White Tiger Dai Hao personal guard commands. At this time throws, already had tears streaming down the face.

Dai Hao sighed one lightly, touches his head, “Chi'er Chi'er, does not need so, not to want weakly my Dai Clan power and prestige. Yueheng, pulls open him.”

Nearby Dai Yueheng stride walks, on pulls open Dai Louli obeying the father by oneself, another side Dai Huabin also walked. With the Dai Yueheng same place, supports the younger brother.

“Lets loose me, you let loose me. You must look helplessly the father does die?”Dai Louli both eyes are red, struggling of going all out, but how his cultivating for two phase differences to be too far with Dai Yueheng and Brother Dai Louli, how regardless to struggle, is unable to work loose.

A Dai Yueheng palm of the hand pulls out suddenly on the face of Dai Louli, similarly is tiger is red, “fool, I am willing to look that the father does die? magnificence Bin, you favors him, later, you must inherit my Dai Clan bloodlines, this bitter hatred, always does not forget.”

Then he changes Duke White Tiger suddenly Dai Hao, “father, I am my eldest son, please permit me, accompanies your together achievement loyalty.”

At the same time was saying, he moved suddenly like lightning, the double palm is uneven, when Dai Huabin and Dai Louli are surprised, pair of tiger palm has cut successively on their nape of the neck. Knocks down his two brothers in place.

Then Dai Yueheng changes Old Xuan, respectful bows a ritual, has not said anything, the stride arrives at side Dai Hao.

This is holding finally the lofty one.

The Dai Hao eye puts strange light, “good, worthily is my White Tiger lineage/vein man. Good child!”At the same time was saying, he lifts hand, holds in the arms the shoulder of Dai Yueheng, in the eye full is the proud color.

However, his hand actually suddenly pressed above the Dai Yueheng pate artery, Dai Yueheng one dull, then the body slipped slowly in the place, he cannot think obviously that the similar method, such will quickly fall on oneself.

Dai Hao changes Old Xuan, “Old Xuan, my these three good-for-nothing sons, asked to you.”

Old Xuan sighed, “Duke White Tiger felt relieved that Shrek existed for day, decided will not make the person injure them.”

“Good!”Some guarantee of Shrek Academy, Duke White Tiger in the eye the ray won, the tip of the toe on the embattlement, face upwards to bellow, “Duke White Tiger came, who takes my life! Ha Ha!”

He tears armor suddenly, even the coat also together tears continually, has revealed the upper body stark naked muscle. The majestic body, to the person the feeling of a strength and beautiful, that strong firm aura, seems infecting entire Star Luo City.

Knees down the officers, lowered the head all, cried. Nobody dares to look how this generation of war-gods die.

On the contrary is Emperor Star Lou Empire Xu Jiawei appears very tranquil, he searches the hand to enter the bosom, has gripped in the bosom silently a handle short blade edge. For Monarch, cannot protect the official, cannot protect the country. In his heart early has dead will. Dai Hao gives life for one's country, cannot be contemporaneous, but asked with dying. Moment that Duke White Tiger falls from the sky, will be he moment of the empire dying.

The sky is cloudy, were many several points of cloudy and cold, ice-cold, is in Star Luo City the hearts of all people. The clouds looked like constrain above the people heart big stone. Shrek Academy and Tang Sect powerhouses, the fist grip tightly all.

Everyone knows that the present situation does not have the leeway of choice, is, in their hearts, how can also be resigned?

Only can look helplessly Duke White Tiger brings death, this is the what kind shame! But this shame, has the possibility life unable to report.

Duke White Tiger against the wind rapid flight, majestic body, stiff wainscot, look proudly. This time he, looks like Dominating the World is common, where has the appearance of half minute loser?

Ju Zi(orange) under surrounding and protecting of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, flies the front slowly, her look similarly has also filled stimulated, because of the excitement of mood, body even in slightly is shivering.

Old Kong Kong Deming side her, this Sun-Moon Empire first ten levels of Soul Engineer mood similarly is not tranquil at this time. Can witness national unification entire Continent, is his wish?

He is willing to help Ju Zi(orange), actually more reasons are because this War-God Empress compared in initial Xu Tianran is better to control. Moreover, to his present strength and status, the authority is not anything, he desired, is Sun-Moon Empire unifies Continent, then carries forward Soul Guidance Technology of research his entire life, in this regard, Ju Zi(orange) definitely whole-heartedly will also support him.

Both sides are away from were not far, quick, Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, arrived at the Sun-Moon Empire army front.

The silver electro-optic shoots together, covers on Duke White Tiger, Dai Hao has not resisted, whatever that silver light will fetter, pulls in front of the opposite party.

Near at hand, this in fact is also his first time so short distance sees the Sun-Moon Empire this War-God Empress appearance. Stayed, Dai Hao has not thought that can defeat own, unexpectedly is such an age such light female.

“Are you Sun-Moon Empire War-God Empress?”Asking of Dai Hao coldly .

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, said: “Good, I am. Duke White Tiger, Dai Hao?”

Dai Hao cold [say / way]: “Line does not change the name to sit does not change surname!”

Ju Zi(orange) takes a deep breath, “you may still remember, 20 years ago, in the Sun-Moon Empire border, you leads the army, breaks my city, kills my subjects?”

Dai Hao light [say / way]: “Old man goes on an expedition the life, kills the enemy innumerably, who still remembers how many people had killed? The war, where has the non- deceased person.”

Two lines of tears flow following the face of Ju Zi(orange) slowly, “but, that time, you have actually killed my father. My father is only common people, a chef. Our family, originally live joy. I most like eating the father to make the meal. But, after on that day, he again has not actually come back. The mother is also sad shortly after dies excessively. I, have become the orphan.”

Duke White Tiger Dai Hao has gawked staring, “originally you to revenge to come?”

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, hates the sound track: “Good, this bitter hatred, hid for 20 years in my heart, entire 20 years. In the twenty years, I constantly do not want to cramp to skin you, to console my parents soul in heaven. Also because of this hatred, supports me to live.”

“Kills you directly, that was too cheap you. I must ruin all that you are proud. Aren't you being proud war-god? I defeat your army, invades your country. Today, you lost all, I must use your blood and soul, holds a memorial service my parents.”

Hears the Ju Zi(orange) angry sound, Duke White Tiger actually to laugh.

“War, has the non- deceased person? This duke did not remember the past matter. However, have your Sun-Moon Empire these years attack a city to seize territory, how many people also killed? You are one of them that wants to ask me to revenge, but in the future, does not know that has many people to ask you to revenge. Do not revenge? What do you also wait for? This duke excellent head here, although takes away and that's the end.”

Even if hostile both sides, Duke White Tiger but who, facing goes to generously, Sun-Moon Empire military officers, reveals the color of admiration. Good blood and iron marshal. Even if under such aspect, pride in his heart, has not been broken at present as before.

Looks at his appearance, why does not know, in the Ju Zi(orange) heart is very uncomfortable. She suddenly thought that she as if has not defeated Duke White Tiger, had not seen in imagination appearance that he is in deep sorrow.

Ju Zi(orange) cloudy narrow [say / way]: “Does Duke White Tiger, you believe that I order to attack now, clean that your Star Luo City all people slaughter?”

“You dare!”Duke White Tiger the discoloration, a tian eye of anger exclaimed finally: “You dare to brave this great misdeed, did not fear that has the retribution?”

Ju Zi(orange) coldly visits him, “my this life, only lives for the hatred, so long as can revenge, the retribution is anything, I have not considered.”1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-614-part-2





Volume 13

#614 - You Dare!


“Marshal, please three think.”Old Kong said in side in a low voice.

Ju Zi(orange) looked out a Star Luo City direction, if Star Luo City does not have Shrek Academy and Tang Sect person, perhaps she will do. But now, just frightens Duke White Tiger.

Ju Zi(orange) pulls out a oneself waist handle long sword, the sword points to Duke White Tiger sharp, “Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, I must dig Heart Blood to offer a sacrifice to my parents you today.”

“Come!”Dai Hao roars.

In the Ju Zi(orange) eye the cold brightness puts greatly, she truly does not dare to massacre city, but, kills Dai Hao actually to. Has killed this Duke White Tiger, the also big enmity must report, even if a little slight defect, was not anything. Has killed him, can death ends all troubles. In the future, the enemy comes back, how regardless of he treats oneself this time being perfidious, to him and that's the end.

Before the long sword refers, remote to Duke White Tiger chest, sword glow twinkle, little chest approached the past toward Duke White Tiger. She hopes to see, under the pressure of death, the appearance that Duke White Tiger mind collapsed, that was she most desired situation.

What a pity, she was doomed to be disappointed. In the look of Duke White Tiger filled was rigid and proud, absolutely did not have the least bit timidly with dreading.

Ok! Has killed him, death ends all troubles.

In the Ju Zi(orange) look, kills intent suddenly greatly Sheng. Must in long sword the hand promote shortly, understands this hatred thoroughly.

In this time, suddenly, in the sky is resounding one just like thunder general roaring.

“You dare!”

Simple two characters, only then two characters, made the entire space fiercely tremble. The terrifying voice is mixing the unequalled mind pressure, has been covering a surrounding area hundred li (0.5km) range unexpectedly instantaneously.

The ordinary soldier listens in the ear, what feels is only an incomparably loud and clear sound, but listens in Soul Master and Soul Engineer ear, such as the great awl is common, cultivates to be higher, the influence that comes under is also bigger, Ju Zi(orange) only thought that in the brain transmits intense dizziness, this sword has not punctured unexpectedly actually.

The cloudy sky had shone suddenly, a bright golden Sun, that sparkles in the sky. The intense ray appears, glare each twinkle, the air as if fiercely is twisting.

The unequalled mind pressure, making the Ju Zi(orange) side mood be similar to the Old Kong face of widow who does not remarry also changed the color, lost the sound track: “Limit Douluo. How to have so formidable Limit Douluo?”

By one voice control hundred li (0.5km), even if in legend, has never had formidable picture! But at present this battlefield, actually suddenly appears.

Although that sound is angry, but also clear, does not come from Shrek Academy Sea God Pavilion Pavilion Master Old Xuan. Besides Old Xuan, presented Limit Douluo?

Must know, in war, if were not Kong Deming blocks by own ten levels of Soul Engineer strengths is Limit Douluo Old Xuan, who won who defeated/carrying was very difficult to say. Under the Stationary Obstructing Bullet function, the individual battle efficiency appeared the huge function in the battlefield again. In this case, if the Star Luo City aspect are many Limit Douluo. Even if then, they are unable to gain the victory of this war as before, definitely will lose finally also seriously! Old Kong facing so situation, can on the non- face change color?

Moreover, he is ten levels of Soul Engineer, Sun-Moon Empire most powerhouse, through, comes person of strength this sound can listen, but also above Old Xuan, is not ordinary Limit Douluo. Such the powerhouse of level, even if he, an assurance of achievement does not have.

complexion changed is bigger, is his War-God Empress.

After Ju Zi(orange) hears this calls out, after the short dizzy past, the complexion became a paleness, her body uncontrolled shivers once more, these time no longer because of excited, because, frightened!

Yes! Frightened. Who because she listened to that sound master is, because of so, her will be having the frightened mood, at this time, she most feared to bump into, was this person!

Intense gold sun ray the sparkle of earth photo, but the air actually suddenly becomes cold, the snowflake falls gently from the sky piece by piece, is covering the entire battlefield.

Must know that now is just the early fall. But the temperature at an exceptional pace is actually dropping, but the snowflake that these from the sky dance in the air, actually does not fall to the ground.

The silver light has as if glittered in the distant place, the first twinkle time, as if also in horizon. But when this twinkle, actually arrived at the near.

Two forms, simultaneously appear in the midair, appears in the Sun-Moon Empire army front.

Is he, is really he?

The Ju Zi(orange) body shook shaking, in eye is one piece with amazement.

Kong Deming subconscious lifts the hand, draws Duke White Tiger entrains before own, by Soul Guidance Device it controls.

At this moment, that arrived suddenly, drinks to stop Ju Zi(orange) two, was a man and a woman.

The man, a pale blue long gown, a long hair flutters after the brain, the look is handsome, what stranger is, his body has to plant the dust the makings. Around his body, the snowflake continuously presents the bunch spiral-shaped to circle quietly. Each snowflakes hidden reveal swiftly swiftly, when they vanish, snowflake surface adhesion a pale silver brilliance, carefully is not looking unable to distinguish.

But in that female of his side, appeared brilliant. The pink-blue color big wave long hair from behind has hung the under foot, beautiful tender Yan made the world change colors. Similarly is in the eye pupil of pink-blue color, is lingering the light halo. Around her body, the gentle golden ray is glittering unceasingly, each twinkle, has the slight dragon roar sound to appear.

Side Ju Zi(orange), some people have called out in alarm make noise.

“This is, Huo Yuhao? That once selected ten Huo Yuhao, Ice Spirit Douluo Huo Yuhao. In his side should be Dragon-Butterfly Douluo Tang Wutong.”

Yes, this presents the person in battlefield suddenly, is Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong!

After three years of self-torture, they before, went out soon finally.

Three years, in the depth meditate process, as if were only the flash. Huo Yuhao has absorbed Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler complete Spiritual Power finally successfully, is relying on already the far ultra Limit Douluo level, formidable Spiritual Power of close half god level, controlled within the body Soul Power to complete the practice of third Soul Nucleus, fused within the body all Soul Power thoroughly. Meanwhile, has controlled space strength. His third Soul Nucleus, is space Soul Nucleus.

Originally six months ago, the practice of Huo Yuhao has been completed. But Tang Wutong because actually does not have he that formidable Spiritual Power, encountered the bottleneck in the practice process, Huo Yuhao takes both sides intimate Soul Power and Spiritual Power of own formidable strengths as well as the hauling, for her protector. Finally one day ago, helping her also complete the final breakthrough, achievement third Soul Nucleus.

They under the human unprecedented Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus premise, achievement third Soul Nucleus, has created the miracle of humanity once more.

Although they as before are the Limit Douluo this level powerhouse, but actually absolutely is in the Douluo Continent history, most formidable Limit Douluo.

After going out, because Huo Yuhao has been a more profound level to the sensibility of destiny, immediately felt some are not wonderful. They fly nearby city slightly to inquire that has a big shock.

They only know that Ju Zi(orange) has not kept the initial commitment unexpectedly, started the war outrageously. And extinguished Dou Ling Empire in the war.

Knew that this news, Huo Yuhao flies into a rage. In this time, he suddenly was feeling that heart one tight, during is dark, felt one fear beyond description. Under the internal combustion engine hauling, bringing Tang Wutong to break the space, catches up with the quickest speed.

Used the sword that to flicker in a moment ago Ju Zi(orange), Huo Yuhao returns 500 miles away actually, he felt that frightened Absolute, this first broke the space by the sound, broadcast the sound, drank to stop Ju Zi(orange) outrageously. Then short is counting breaths in the time, through the control of space deep meaning, bringing Tang Wutong to stretch across hundred li (0.5km), arrived here.

Looks in front of Ju Zi(orange), ** Duke White Tiger of upper body. Huo Yuhao at this time in the heart incessantly is angry, has mixed emotions.

Ju Zi(orange) visits him, is the mood so? Four items of relative, the eye socket of Ju Zi(orange) was red immediately.

“Why? Why do you want to come back at the present this time? Why?”In the Ju Zi(orange) hand the long sword lifts, suddenly thorn to nearby Duke White Tiger.

She knows, if oneself do not get rid, the opportunity of perhaps again not having gotten rid. This time, she whole-heartedly, own Soul Power has promoted Absolute. She must kill him, so long as has killed him, can report that intense and deep-seated hatred.

“Biting”in crisp whining noise, the long sword stabs, but is actually not able to penetrate.

Ju Zi(orange) dumbfounded seeing, Duke White Tiger, changed into that long-awaited person unexpectedly.

Black Tortoise Replacement, Huo Yuhao most likes Engraving Soul Ability, in this moment, has saved father's life.

He is relying on own formidable Spiritual Power and Soul Power, has broken Kong Deming Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover stiffly, has completed Black Tortoise Replacement.

Duke White Tiger appeared in his position originally, side Tang Wutong.

The long sword stabs the Huo Yuhao chest, after expressing that crisp cry, rapid cuns (2.5cm) disruption.

Kong Deming is surprised, controls own Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover to contract subconsciously inward, wants suppressed Huo Yuhao stiffly.

“Go away!”Huo Yuhao shouted angrily, in an instant, the body of his whole person turned into the scarlet golden color instantaneously. Intense golden light erupts outward. The terrifying mind storm fills the air in the flash in body surrounding one foot range.

That once including Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover that Old Xuan temporarily controlled, in front of this dazzling golden light, one was torn the fragment unexpectedly. golden light of Huo Yuhao release turned into the silver instantaneously, the next quarter, before that Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover returned to the Kong Deming body, covers in which his body.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-614-part-3





Volume 13

#615 - Invincible!


Kong Deming this time mood was unable to describe with surprised, he is shocked looks at Huo Yuhao, is almost the earliest possible time backward draws back, has pulled open the distance with him.

Were this person and this person's control to the Space Power in this degree unexpectedly? He had sealed up periphery all spaces in the flash a moment ago unexpectedly.

The Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover biggest deep meaning, with the aid of Space Power, regardless of the bitter experience how formidable attack, can induct in the space it.

But this person stiffly has actually sealed up the surrounding all spaces, making Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover not have to hide, then relies on unequalled formidable Spiritual Power, stiffly must tear into shreds this Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover.

If not Kong Deming according to the circumstances quick, this life coincides the assigns Soul Guidance Device, must be destroyed thoroughly. If so, not only he will drop from ten levels of Soul Engineer instantaneously, itself also will suffer heavy wound.

Huo Yuhao looked radically continually has not gone to look at Kong Deming one, his vision, but falls on Ju Zi(orange).

“Why this, should be I asked that you are right. Why? Ju Zi(orange), why did you tell me? I believe you, you are perfidious unexpectedly. When I close up, launches war!”

The Huo Yuhao sound is very low and deep, but each character puts out from his mouth, from the sky has a strange mind fluctuation.

At this time, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp has encircled rapidly, him and Tang Wutong, sieges in which with Tang Wutong Dai Hao.

The Star Luo City aspect, sees sudden Huo Yuhao, Shrek Academy powerhouses Tang Sect people, all in being surprised back of the body wild with joy.

Perhaps others could not feel that Huo Yuhao this time condition, Old Xuan can actually the clear feeling, present Huo Yuhao, surmount itself in the strength, this means that he already achievement Limit Douluo! Moreover, certainly has third Soul Nucleus. Because does not have third Soul Nucleus, he cannot achieve Limit Douluo that level. Although does not know how he achieves, but this time Old Xuan, truly saw the hope.

“Xuan Ziwen, launches Obstructing Bullet. The Shrek subordinate and Tang Sect are respective, welcomed Yuhao and Wutong to come back with me.”Old Xuan issues an order, already since the impatient Tang Sect people, immediately first flew from the Star Luo City top, directly soars not far away Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong direction to fly.

Ju Zi(orange) dull looks at Huo Yuhao, has not actually retroceded, “why? Why you must tell me, will you close up long time? You may know, if has had your deterrent, I do not dare to continue to launch the war. Why did you ask me? Good, why I told you. You should remember that I initially will choose why to marry Xu Tianran. In order to hate, for the hatred of my parents. Is he, is he!”

At the same time was saying, her taishou refers to Duke White Tiger the Dai Hao direction, “he is my killing father personal enemy, is he, is leading the army, has attacked and occupied our land, is his soldier, has killed my father, making my mother sad and dies. The harmonious family, because of him, making me an orphan. My all living hope, to take revenge, to kill him. You do not make me launch the war, waits for ten years, ten years, I and others not. Do you know? I am fearing you, because, you were too formidable.”

“I was not worried that ten years later Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire will grow to any degree. Soul Guidance Technology, so is can it be that easy to pursue? But I fear you, fears your strength inflation. You were so formidable, I with own eyes have witnessed the Limit Douluo strength. Ten years later, you will be formidable to any degree, I am unable to judge. At that time, if I launched war again, won't you prevent me? But has your impediment, how also makes me take revenge? How to kill my personal enemy? Therefore, even if perfidious, I must kill him. So long as can report this intense and deep-seated hatred, even if were you comes back to kill me, how can also? Yuhao, helping me, making me kill him, I guaranteed, after having killed him, no longer moved Star Luo City every bit of property. You came back, I even can no longer seize this Star Luo City. However, Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, must die, must die!”

Speaking of finally, the Ju Zi(orange) mood became the hysteria, the body of her whole person fierce was shivering, in look, only then endless hate.

Huo Yuhao coldly visits her, “Ju Zi(orange), has not thought that you turned into so the appearance unexpectedly. For the one's own selfish interests, launches the Continent war. You are perfidious, ignore ten years, Anything was needless to say. Immediately repulses the enemy, will withdraw all your Sun-Moon Empire all soldiers belongs to Sun-Moon Empire. Returns Sky Soul Empire, Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire land. I forgive you not to kill. Otherwise, my slaughter completely your Sun-Moon Empire how? Right, your fear is right, I came back, I will not allow your Sun-Moon Empire to unify Continent!”

“Joke!”Nearby Kong Deming anger instead smiles extremely, “ignorant young child, you thinks that relies on your strength, can change the course of events, lets my Sun-Moon Empire army, isn't able to unify Continent? Even if pays certain price, you also will certainly die in this today.”At the same time was saying, he lifts right hand, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp rapid dispersing, becomes an arc, faintly regarding Huo Yuhao.

But Huo Yuhao actually looks like has not seen them to resemble, has turned around, Tang Sect as well as the Shrek Academy that people facing flying shouted to clear the way: “Everybody do not come, this matter, is solved by me.”

In Beibei heart one anxious, must speak. May fly actually unexpectedly really to stop in forefront Old Xuan, and stretches out the arms, has prevented the advances of other people.

“Everybody stops, making Yuhao process.”

Beibei urgently said: “Old Xuan, they have two people. Sun-Moon Empire that side......”

Old Xuan shook the head, said: “Population, if can play the decisive effect in overcoming the enemy, we belonged to the Douluo Continent three countries will not lose to Sun-Moon Empire. Don't forget, Yuhao is Ultimate Soldier that our Shrek Academy trains. Present he, is truly able to move unhindered invincible Ultimate Soldier! Believes him.”

Listened to the Old Xuan words, people are peaceful, but actually all vision brilliant looks at Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong direction.

Huo Yuhao coldly looked at Ju Zi(orange) one, the silver light dodged, he returned to side Tang Wutong, similarly, was Duke White Tiger side Dai Hao.

“Huo Yuhao!”Dai Hao somewhat surprisedly visits him, wanted to say anything, does not know that should say anything was good.

Since this war starts, Huo Yuhao baseless vanished, the Shrek Academy people do not know where he went. Meets once more, he unexpectedly already so formidable, this lets Duke White Tiger is also in the heart surprised. He died from Fu Bi, who knows, at crucial moments, Huo Yuhao catches up to rescue unexpectedly. Moreover, why does not know, this time he, in the heart has an unusual feeling. As if, at present this young people become are different from original some.

Huo Yuhao vision tranquil looks at Duke White Tiger, nodded to him, said: “You withdraw first. I handle at present these matters, among us, some matters need to carry on to mediate.”

Duke White Tiger has gawked gawking, but nodded, has not said anything again, turns around flies toward Shrek Academy and direction of Tang Sect people.

Ju Zi(orange) shouted to clear the way suddenly fierce: “And It is not good, he cannot walk. Cannot walk!”She knows that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong came back, misses this time, opportunity that she forever has not perhaps revenged.

The attack of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp while Ju Zi(orange) shouted angrily, started!

Dazzling glares, instantaneously go toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong concentrated fire, that fierce ray appears. That is close 300 eight levels of Soul Engineer cultivate for the powerhouse! Really under guidance and direction of Old Kong.

The glare covers instantaneously. Submerged the body of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

The body of Ju Zi(orange) has shaken shaking, she wants to revenge freely, when she saw that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were led the moment that the ray embezzles by that powerful soul, the heart leak jumped a racket, as if has come across any fearful matter.

They cannot......

Her worry has continued in fact also the flash. The glare after the twinkle, disappearance that was quietly. A leaf of silver front door, the silent appearance before Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong body, swallows that all the rays of attack completely.

The formidable attack, is unable to fall on the tangible, what also there is to affect? When Huo Yuhao dealing method with former Kong Deming facing the Star Luo City aspect Soul Engineer attack is almost same.

Just, in the control of Space Power, he obviously even better.

Kong Deming as if already had a premonition the right hand that this point, has lifted wields suddenly, this time, Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover has covered toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong by a broader direction. Has covered the big piece region.

Originally Huo Yuhao and silver shutter before Tang Wutong body, suddenly vanished in the Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover range unexpectedly.

As ten levels of Soul Guidance Device, the mystery is not only that simple! The blockade space, Kong Deming can also achieve . Moreover, he can also the blockade space of wide scope.

Kong Deming is the Soul Guidance Technology most outstanding representative, he always believes that man will conquer nature. A strength of person in formidable, facing total quantity formidable attack, does not have the means to contend eventually. Space guiding, but if lost the control to the space? How do they come to direct the powerful offensive of that 300 eight levels of Soul Engineer? That is impossible to achieve is right.

Therefore, his goal is very simple, wants the closed room at the same time, strikes to kill Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong with the strongest attack.

【Super explosive good news】 At the suggestion of my, the gizmondo agrees to extract a group of book friends, jointly organizes the Tang Sect ten years with me, under the poly Sanya line the tourism activities, the activity can extract 30 book friends to lead by me, goes to Sanya traveling together, lucky fellow who can participate in free extraction in my new game «Magic Chef of Ice and Fire» player, every week 5 quotas, besides the traveling, some of our also massive good gifts to give to everybody, carries on the drawing link. Including 6 as well as our Tang Sect peripheral wait / etc.. Drawing will start this afternoon probably. Address that the game downloads, everybody can search “the Magic Chef of Ice and Fire tour”with cell phone hundred degree celsius, chooses first downloading of hundred degree celsius prompt then, or comes my public prestige, the click tour to download also to gain secure packaging. Joins our public prestige to be very simple, prestige - the top right-hand corner plus sign, increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has first of authentication is I. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-615-part-1





Volume 13

#615 - Invincible!


About 300 glares sparkle once more, but this time, the goal actually directly is not Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, unexpectedly is Kong Deming oneself.

On Kong Deming, a strange silver mail-armor and helmet shines suddenly, this silver mail-armor and helmet presents for the mirror surface style completely. The front, is one has extended from the chest place to the giant gem of lower abdomen. This gem also presents for the bright silver. After the back all rays emerge, is rapid enters in that giant crystal stone under the guidance of Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover unexpectedly, the powerful silver light, making him at this time seem looks like a silver small Sun.

Sun-Moon Empire Soul Guidance Technology is so developed, is the card in a hand also not only has one to be so simple?

At this time Kong Deming lifts, is another card in a hand.

Right, was affected by Obstructing Bullet, general linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device was unable to use. However, at present Kong Deming displays, is not the simple linkage, but guides the linkage.

His oneself as a stopover station, came from these Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer Soul Guidance Ray carries on the guidance, to compress and fuse through oneself, erupts the formidable attack again. Related to complex space control knowledge.

Such attack does not have means to duplicate on others, because needs formidable Soul Power and Spiritual Power simultaneously, needs enough to know about these strengths.

Humanoid Soul Guidance Device that on Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer put on, all came from the design of Kong Deming, in addition the control of his Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover to Space Power, can complete such strikes, in Kong Deming looks like, such attack, has dominated above Limit Douluo completely, said that is the miracle does not have anything not.

This is also most strikes, to deal with Star Luo City here Limit Douluo that he can achieve. Before had not used facing Old Xuan, for does not want to kill Old Xuan. Initiates death enmity that the Shrek Academy aspect cannot be melted. But at this time facing Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, their existences has threatened Sun-Moon Empire, Kong Deming has opened a oneself biggest card in a hand immediately without hesitation. Formidable attack. Also will shortly show.

Huo Yuhao unemotionally looks at the present all. Stands with Tang Wutong shaking hand there. His left hand lifts slowly before the body.

A strange ray, appears on him.

The aquamarine halo is mixing ice blue color light shadow. In the distant place upper air, golden Sun originally turned into the blue full moon in this moment unexpectedly. Yes, full moon, but is not crescent moon.

The tyrannical incomparable ray locates suddenly to launch from the Kong Deming chest, that ray was unable to describe with the color, flash when it presents, the world must be gloomy. Terrifying prestige energy, making not far away Ju Zi(orange) call out in alarm makes noise. Must know. Kong Deming the card in a hand, even if is War-God Empress she, does not know.

So formidable attack, lets present all people to look at each other to change colors.

The sky was instantaneously gloomy, as if no anything to be able with this ray to vie. The Kong Deming corners of the mouth place has revealed a self-satisfied smile.

If with the Soul Guidance Device level described that this strikes, he is willing to call 11 levels of Soul Guidance Device it, yes, never has had 11 levels of Soul Guidance Device.

In fact, even if he, has strength of the striking. Because of so far, but also does not have what material quality to continue to withstand such huge energy. Even if there is Space Power not to be good as the guidance. When at this moment, this bunch of ray launches. On his front armor that huge silver gem started to collapse. Once the ray launch is completed, the mission of this gem also will be completed, thorough damage.

However, the Kong Deming smiling face, almost flickered below coagulates on own face. His some do not believe their eye.

What did he see?

He saw, as if in front of oneself, presented Extreme North Tundra, snow white white snow. Pure ice surface.

That is huge Ice Mirror, Ice Mirror itself presents for the pale blue. Is sending out the gentle halo, in upper air. Light of one bunch of full moon drop from the clouds, shine above this mirror. Make it is similar to the radiant sapphire is together ordinary.

The powerful ray that the Ice Mirror surface, the incomparable smoothness, the gentle halo and opposite comes has the sharp contrast.

The ray shines above Ice Mirror, mirror sidelurch, 45 degrees. Then the powerful ray, is guided unexpectedly instantaneously, high air-launched goes toward the distant place.

The ray of refraction, looks like can support the great column of world to be common, what it flies is that far, is unable to look at the end.

The Huo Yuhao complexion was only slightly pale. In him behind, one white one green, appearance that two forms are quietly, all stretches out the double palm, arrives in his back.

In the sky, the temperature is dropping at an exceptional pace, opposite, on each Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer, started to present incorruptible of silver Bai Se (White Color), their bodies also start some out-of-control, in airborne is unable to consolidate the flight to be ordinary unexpectedly.

“No, this is impossible......”Kong Deming to lose one's voice to call out in alarm, by his status, unexpectedly some mood out-of-control, it can be imagined, at this time his mood is what kind is not tranquil.

Regards as the powerful offensives of 11 levels of Soul Guidance Device by him, like this was melted unexpectedly and unexpectedly. But what the opposite party uses will be only any ray will reflect this simplest principle.

“Bang and Bang!”Two fulminations also resound.

Kong Deming front crystal stone, Ice Mirror before Huo Yuhao body almost simultaneously to shatter. Changes into the innumerable detritus, from the sky flies upwards.

“Happy”drinks from the Huo Yuhao mouth lowly resounds. blue moon instantaneously changes gold sun. In the sky, golden light is radiant.

Meanwhile, a resonant dragon roar sound resounds from his Tang Wutong mouth.

Her tender body revolution, changed into a giant Purple gold color Light butterfly dragon, picks up the body of Huo Yuhao. The unequalled mind pressure, and on Huo Yuhao simultaneously bursts out from her.

The strange mind thought has covered entire Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp instantaneously. The attack that they should follow on somebody's heels, stops. On everyone shone the dazzling ray, that clearly was the mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device brilliance.

In order to build an invincible master, Sun-Moon Empire on Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp does not know that has poured into many Heart Blood, all dispositions are most high level other. On each Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Master, is equipped with mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device, this was initially Ju Zi(orange) raised. Now really played the extremely vital role.

However, they can block the mind attack, actually cannot block the mood in the mind attack supplementing to fluctuate.

“Anger!”Also is one drinks to resound lowly. Bodies of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp about 300 Soul Engineer as if by prior agreement shivers, with the mood disorder, the happy anger back and forth is attacking their innermost feelings unceasingly, within the body Soul Power also becomes chaotic, they do not even know one should make anything at this time, the attack method originally, unexpectedly became lenient.

“Soul Shaking Burst!”The Huo Yuhao ice-cold sound resounds through the entire sky.

The sky collapsed!

Yes, when he shouted Soul Shaking Burst these four characters, looked like to the feeling of person the calamity generally. Terrifying shake strength erupts instantaneously. That already, not only came from the mind level, even is the entire space.

In the Soul Shaking Burst range, sky for it one dark, Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover fierce shivers. Moreover, another gold sun shines behind Huo Yuhao, this belongs to Tang Wutong.

The melodious singing sound is fluctuating in that gold sun front. Second round Soul Shaking Burst appeared.

Two rounds Soul Shaking Burst successively, if Huo Yuhao displays, among these two rounds, many also has a crevice. Even if Mermaid Double Chant, is impossible to let the similar attack, when the second release produces the overlay results.

But, after Tang Wutong Spiritual Power pours into, actually becomes different, similarly is the formidable Spiritual Power support of three Soul Nucleus, moreover under nearly pours into with Spiritual Power of Huo Yuhao a common origin, merpeople second level played Soul Shaking Burst that produced to burst out the unequalled strange effect immediately.

second level Soul Shaking Burst almost breath that in first level erupts has produced, the first wave has not fallen, latter wave already, overlapping, superimposes amplification!

The grating to shatter sound resounds unceasingly, all Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device completely to shatter, to shatter, is their head and Humanoid Soul Guidance Device.

Naturally, Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover!

Kong Deming wants to prevent Huo Yuhao, is actually not able to achieve. When he prepares to control own Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover, the front actually shines one group of dazzling black glow.

That black glow not is extremely gigantic, only then ruler odd|surplus Chang, is a handle black hammer, but on that hammer, is actually glittering the strange dark golden brilliance.

Sees this handle hammer time, Kong Deming first felt is the fatal oppression strength. The terrifying pressure, making his entire soul tremble.

Then that hammer shelled before his body in not far away air. The terrifying pressure, making him one lose balanced, under body and mind big change, Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover cannot completely control. That flash, he only thought one fell into the space of collapse completely, cannot control own body.

With amazement, in the eye full is with amazement. The Kong Deming personal appearance explodes draws back, at this time, he also can only achieve the self-preservation.

to shatter Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover draws in once more, appears before his body, the surrounding space control, although mouth and nose hemorrhage, in the range that but this ten levels of Soul Engineer cover from Clear Sky Hammer finally ran away.

300 corpses, drop from the clouds, drop dust.

In battlefield, solemnly silent!

In Sun-Moon Empire army eyes, in Star Luo City came from in belonging to the powerhouses eyes of Douluo Continent three countries', Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, is nearly in not existence that is possible to defeat. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-615-part-2





Volume 13

#615 - Invincible!


Initially, because of their entering the war, will make Dou Ling Empire die in that short time. Soul Master, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp simply is a legend, but, at this moment, this legend, forever was falling from the sky, looks like has not appeared.

The legend falls from the sky, only for them!

Sun-Moon Empire biggest relying on, in light of this to shatter. Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp before them, has resisted two rounds, then the formidable attack, cannot make them die. The result of this war, as if has been doomed.

Ju Zi(orange) has tarried completely, although she in the heart understands, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, if comes back again, their strengths will certainly be the extremely terrifying degree. However, some many also comforts in her heart, she has also believed that is relying on the Sun-Moon Empire overall strength, at least resists them not to have the issue.

But, now her in heart this thought already to shatter. Resists? How to resist? Without linkage Soul Guidance Device, how also possibly to resist these two became Limit Douluo, moreover strength far ultra Limit Douluo powerhouse!

“Why? Why you can refract my silver moon god light wave, this is impossible! The might of silver moon god light wave, did not belong to this world, that is the strength of close gods!”In the Kong Deming heart has filled unwillingly, he somewhat crazily was crying out, was asking to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao coldly visits him, “because, my Ice Mirror is, Absolute Zero!”

“Absolute Zero?”The Kong Deming delay, the concept of Absolute Zero, he had also heard, but, isn't that is only in the legend has exists? Even if Absolute Ice, is impossible truly to be the Absolute Zero level!

Absolute Zero, forms Ice Mirror by Absolute Zero, carries on the refraction.

His some not willingly asked again: “If, if resists directly, even if you are Absolute Zero, cannot block my attack.”

“Weak!”Huo Yuhao disdains snort|hum, why “I must resist directly. Are you willing to resist directly my strike fully? You have 300 people, we are only two people. The application of small skill, sufficiently makes them sink to the abyss. If, you can also use a moment ago the attack hundred times of that level, perhaps, has to be able really with the possibility that we contend with. As for the present. Finished!”

At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao raises head to look at the day, is golden light greatly puts on Tang Wutong under his body.

In the sky, two rounds gold sun simultaneously shine, complements each other fresh splendor in the upper air, all exaggerated the golden color the entire battlefield, the formidable mind fluctuation, has covered the entire Sun-Moon Empire army, even if had the least bit slightest sign of trouble, will fall into during their controls completely.

“Sorrow!”Huo Yuhao light saying.

Strange appeared, in the ground, all Soul Guidance Array in Soul Guidance Device, start to melt unexpectedly, melts into the metal liquid, spreads in the ground.

The sorrowful mood, affects, not only person, but is all. This is the mood strength.

Simple Ai Word, makes entire world shiver. That the prepare Soul Guidance Array place, almost will vanish shortly into thin air.

Huo Yuhao coldly looks to Ju Zi(orange) in enemy position, “now, you should not suspect my words. You should understand that I have the ability that makes you be annihilated. Returns all territories that Sun-Moon Empire invades, get lost Sun-Moon Empire to go. I have forgiven these 1 million lives, otherwise, you must shortly 1 million ghosts, in this to shatter.”

The Ju Zi(orange) complexion became a paleness. Looks has fallen back on Duke White Tiger in far place, she knows that her big enmity, forever was perhaps impossible to report.

Effort that many years, make, drains in light of this.

“Not, not! I must revenge, I must revenge!”Ju Zi(orange) exclaimed toward the Huo Yuhao anger suddenly: “Right, you can kill us, how even if you can kill us? I have issued the order, if my Sun-Moon Empire army collapses in light of this. Then, our country guards is belonging to the armies of Douluo Continent three countries all cities, will launch the massacre same place, can kill many, kills many.”

“You are fierce! However, can you save entire Continent? Can you? When the time comes, thousand ten million ten thousand people, die because of you. You kill my 1 million people, I extinguish kill you belong to the Douluo Continent three countries thousand ten million ten thousand people. Let them be buried along with the dead. You do not make me take revenge, I will hate fall in torrents above this entire Continent.”

Is listening to the crazy words of Ju Zi(orange) hysteria, not only the Huo Yuhao complexion big change, the Shrek Academy high levels in distant place, the Star Luo City high levels, as well as Dou Ling Empire and Sky Soul Empire powerhouses, all are the complexion drastic changes.

If Ju Zi(orange) such has done, then, entire Continent will therefore turn into the blood red! Is this how terrifying aspect?

Such disaster, is hard to imagine, at least is anybody is not willing to imagine.

Huo Yuhao gets angry: “What did you say? You how dare so?”

Ju Zi(orange) coldly visits him, “to take revenge, my anything can do, do not think that you won. Hands over Duke White Tiger, so long as has killed him, I repulse the enemy. Leaves behind Star Luo City to you, so long as you are living for day, my soldier will not send Star Luo City. I have controlled entire Continent, I must make anything, naturally can achieve. Your individual strength is strong, wants to save entire Continent, is impossible.”

The Huo Yuhao complexion at this time became a paleness, right, he by with the Tang Wutong powerful strength, turned around the situation. At present although 1 million enemies, but in the face of their powerful strengths, but is the range chicken earthenware dog. But, Ju Zi(orange) said right, Sun-Moon Empire has controlled entire Continent, in this case, if she really crazy carries on to slaughter, Huo Yuhao could protect several cities, but absolutely is actually not able to protect entire Continent! That is impossible to complete.

“Ju Zi(orange)!”Saying of Huo Yuhao coldly .

Ju Zi(orange) begins supinely, coldly visits him.

In this time, the form from Huo Yuhao behind is flying to shoot together suddenly, but, arrives at side him. Duke White Tiger Dai Hao.

“She must kill, made her kill. So long as can protect the Douluo Continent thousand ten million ten thousand lives, my life, what was also considered as?”Dai Hao said generously. This time he, in the eye full is the gratified color, is commander, he never has also thought that actually some people can rely on strength of change entire battlefield a oneself aspect.

Moreover, from Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong god, he saw the hope truly, saw the hope of Star Lou Empire, he still clearly remembers that Huo Yuhao had told him, oneself are the Star Lou Empire person, such being the case, Star Lou Empire had the future!

In the future, Star Lou Empire under the leadership of Huo Yuhao, can't regain to lose? Flagitious that Ju Zi(orange) said that must slaughter entire Continent, she is also not necessarily able to realize immediately. So long as died, her determination also broke. Isn't wants to revenge? Let her kill itself and that's the end. For the Star Lou Empire future, for Douluo Continent, he thought that own death is worth.

“It is not good.”Huo Yuhao shouted angrily, held the shoulder of Duke White Tiger, did not make him fly.

The Huo Yuhao look becomes profound, the powerful mind fluctuation, covers the entire Sun-Moon Empire army, in his look, were then many anything. Struggles, but quick set firm resolve.

“Ju Zi(orange), since your so recklessly unseemly behavior, do not blame me.”Huo Yuhao coldly snorted, the right hand in the body previous stroke, immediately, the silver light from the sky has delimited together, revealed a silver gateway to come out.

Ju Zi(orange) has gawked staring, looks at his look, suddenly, one fear beyond description appears in her heart. Because she guessed correctly suddenly that Huo Yuhao must do.

“And Does not want!”Ju Zi(orange) yelled makes noise.

But the hand of Huo Yuhao, actually searched into that silver shutter, the next quarter, seems six and seven years old, the well-dressed boy, appeared in his hand.

Towering that the boy presents, but, made all military officers of Sun-Moon Empire side is the complexion big changes.

Some boy also delay, have a look at Huo Yuhao, mother who has a look at not far away again, somewhat is suddenly vacant.

However, under such big change, he can also maintain calm unexpectedly, doubts looks to Huo Yuhao, “who are you? How do you catch me?”The thought is systematic.

“Huo Yuhao, you cannot, you unable to injure him, does not want, does not want!”Ju Zi(orange) stubborn finally after this child appears was defeated, she is almost choked with tears, yelled to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao coldly visits her, “you can let Continent loss of life, why I cannot. Yes, I am not willing to threaten you with a child, but, you, since threatens me with entire Continent, do not blame me.”

At the same time was saying, he boy in hand holds into the bosom. Face close Huo Yuhao of boy, the look somewhat is in a daze, is actually not afraid, even also puts out a hand, touches his face.

Huo Yuhao has moved aside slightly, but as before was actually touched by that boy.

“Why, I thought that you a little look familiar!”Boy curious asking, he as if really did not fear. Then has a look at mother's direction, “mother, you do not cry! This uncle's flavor heard well that he should not injure Yunhan!”

Yes, boy Sun-Moon Empire in Huo Yuhao this bosom now emperor, Xu Yunhan!

Huo Yuhao is relying on formidable Spiritual Detection, easy had found Xu Yunhan in the army in the position, then by oneself the control to Space Power, directly catches in him oneself hand, this is Ju Zi(orange) has not thought. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-615-part-3





Volume 13

#616 - Son


This matter of Xu Yunhan in army, in the entire Sun-Moon Empire army also only then few people know, reason that is leading him, because Ju Zi(orange) did not feel relieved that a son person stays in the empire. After all, she has carried off almost Sun-Moon Empire all strongest strengths, moreover before the son, has had the matter, she is worried about the story to repeat, therefore leads the son in the side, in her opinion, some these many formidable Soul Engineer Corp, Old Kong taught personally, naturally is safe cannot be safe, who knows that can encounter to at present so the situation unexpectedly.

Listened to the Xu Yunhan words, Huo Yuhao is also the mind slightly shakes, remembered initially first time with the appearance of this child meeting time. Lowers the head looks to him that Huo Yuhao sees, this child attractive black short hair, the pitch-black big eye is very bright, his skin has looked like mother, is fair and delicate. He who magnificent clothes serve as contrast is very noble. Those who touch the person is on his face is having the light smile. Six and seven -year-old children, actually did not have the least bit to be flustered at this time, instead curious looked up.

Can Huo Yuhao really to this child being able to get down hand? Answer inevitably negative, that radically is impossible. But, was forced this situation by Ju Zi(orange), he does not have the matter of means.

Ju Zi(orange) trembling sound track: “Huo Yuhao, you and you cannot start to Yunhan, cannot!”

Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath, returned to normal the somewhat depressing mind, “that you condition that promises me to say a moment ago. Person who is bringing your, withdraws Sun-Moon Empire to go.”

In the Ju Zi(orange) eye the ray twinkle, bites the mandibular joint tightly, looks at Huo Yuhao, she somewhat could not speak. For her, revenging is her lifetime wish, is. In her heart, the most important person has two. Was this has been missing for three years, appeared stands in oneself to inside man. Another, is he cherishes is holding young villain!

Huo Yuhao was better, said that was not her man. But, Xu Yunhan is her son, only son, even can be said as she goes on living the biggest significance. Ju Zi(orange) does not even dare to imagine, if his son had the matter, oneself will turn into any appearance. Perhaps, will make entire Continent hold a memorial service for the son with the blood.

Although she knows that Huo Yuhao is always tenderhearted, can guess correctly that Huo Yuhao at all impossible to begin to the son, but, she actually does not dare to bet, that simply was the too fearful situation.

“Why? Why can you protect that Duke White Tiger? Why didn't make me kill him? You should know that now our country unifies Continent, at present the so excellent situation, is not I can take responsibility, you threaten me with him. Is the empire marshal, I, I......”

Here. Ju Zi(orange) somewhat could not be justified, because of her scared seeing, hand of Huo Yuhao, gently is touching son's head. By the Huo Yuhao strength, only needs among the moment, can want that small life!

“Does not want, Yuhao, does not want! ten million do not injure Yunhan.”The Ju Zi(orange) entreaty said.

The Kong Deming complexion at this time became extremely ugly, not only Xu Yunhan emperor. Moreover is also his disciple. Although this young disciple also has six -year-old age, is. The talent that he displays has made Kong Deming like extremely. He has the confidence to train Sun-Moon Empire one generation of Great Emperor in the future.

At this time, the emperor fell into the rival. Obtained the situation of rolling victory completely to change immediately, let alone, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp also has been annihilated. Is develops rapidly after a sudden turn simply!

The strength that Huo Yuhao shows was too fearful, Sun-Moon Empire, basic can he contends in the frontage on nobody, in this case, was naturally impossible to retrieve Xu Yunhan.

Huo Yuhao is listening to the Ju Zi(orange) words, turns head to look to own Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, Duke White Tiger is also visiting him, four items of relative. Duke White Tiger in the eye is revealing the temperate ray, but the Huo Yuhao look, actually becomes incomparably complex.

“You asked why I can protect him? Why didn't make you kill him to revenge? Good, I work as all people to tell you today.”Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath.

In he cherishes Xu Yunhan to be very honest, any has not struggled.

“Because!”Huo Yuhao has turned the head, vision brilliant is looking steadily at Ju Zi(orange), “he is my kissing! Fresh! Father! Kisses!”

When this simple several characters put out from the Huo Yuhao mouth, just like thunderclaps, explosion maliciously above two person hearts.

Although his voice is not loud, but under the formidable Spiritual Power conduction, audience any place can clear hearing.

In the top, Dai Yueheng, Dai Huabin and Dai Louli three brothers sobered, happen to hears all that Huo Yuhao said. Besides Dai Louli, Dai Yueheng and Dai Huabin two brothers already complete delay.

Especially Dai Huabin, since entered Shrek Academy on that day, his in diligently chased a person, has been resisting with him. Regardless of how he cannot think that this person, can be his brothers unexpectedly and unexpectedly. Looked from the age that is his younger brother is right.

The Ju Zi(orange) vision has stagnated instantaneously, she looks at Huo Yuhao, the red lip has not opened on own initiative, dumbfounded looks that has the innumerable years in her heart, actually never thinks that can be this unexpectedly, can be this unexpectedly! Duke White Tiger, own big personal enemy Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, unexpectedly, unexpectedly is his father. That said that Dai Hao......

Thinks of here, Ju Zi(orange) just like was been ordinary in the top of the head by a trough ice water pouring, the whole person from the sky shook shaking, nearly cannot control the personal appearance, falls down.

Similarly shock unequalled, naturally also has float in Huo Yuhao Duke White Tiger.

“What did you and you say?”Duke White Tiger the sound completely changed.

In his heart, young people, are the outstanding person of younger generation, Shrek Academy most outstanding candidate, because of his reason, Star Lou Empire can during several Great Tribulation are difficult the broken tribulation. He and he actually said that he is his son?

“Right! You is a my father.”Huo Yuhao turns head to look to Dai Hao, his vision already no longer tranquil, the sound somewhat is shivering slightly, because his own mood fluctuates, one type beyond description sad is also affecting all people.

“But simultaneously, you are also my personal enemy!”Huo Yuhao said these words, the complexion is a paleness.

“This is impossible. How are you possibly my son?”Duke White Tiger loses one's voice to say.

Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath, constrains the mood that are surging reluctantly, “that. I reminded your, my mother. Surnamed Huo. You may also recognize it.”At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao lifts the hand, takes out a handle dagger from own Storage Soul Guidance Device, hands in front of Duke White Tiger.

“This is you give my mother's presenting a gift faith token, believes that you will not forget.”

Duke White Tiger the Dai Hao look one coagulated, coagulates above White Tiger Dagger in Huo Yuhao hand, his subconscious that White Tiger Dagger with, in the hand, his hand started not on own initiative shivers.

“You, you and you are the Yun'er children. Yun'er and Yun'er had a child to me unexpectedly. Did not say that Yun'er she is when I go to battle fell ill dead? How can how be able like this?”

Huo Yuhao coldly [say / way]: “Told your my mother dead, should be that duchess. In your heart, my mother died more than 20 years ago.”

Dai Hao dull is looking at White Tiger Dagger in hand, “I am busy with going on an expedition, after I knew Yun'er dead, is actually not able to go home to take care. At that time, when the border area became serious. My ten years have not returned to Duke's Estate. When I go back, sees, only then cultivates the loess, I can be Yun'er do. Also only then repairs the grave. You and you unexpectedly are the Yun'er sons, that and that you should not call Huo Yuhao, should call Dai Yuhao is right!”

Huo Yuhao makes an effort has flung under. The anger exclaimed: “No, I did not call Dai Yuhao, I called Huo Yuhao, I was also only Huo Yuhao. I am my mother's son, is not your son. From infancy to maturity, can you take care of my one day? You do not even know that has my existence? I in childhood, but also distant has visited you. At that time, you had also come back, is. Why haven't you gone to see my mother? Whatever the duchess does humiliate my mother?”

“Have I gone back? I every time go home, in a hurry departs. My military affairs were extremely busy. Was I, is I have neglected Yun'er.”The Dai Hao complexion starts becomes pale, even if in sharp sword facing the Ju Zi(orange) hand. He like, so has not been out of sorts at present.

Huo Yuhao has turned the head suddenly, suppressed the tears in eye pupil forcefully, “after and other solutions at present these, I to Duke's Estate, to you and to the duchess, will demand return you to owe my mother's all.”

At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao once more vision goes to not far away glassy-eyed Ju Zi(orange).

“Understood? You understand now! How although I am not willing to acknowledge, on me is flowing his bloodlines. Although he harmed miserably my mother, but he was the Star Lou Empire hero, I not, because had his bloodlines to be shamed. In any event, I will not make him die in your hands. Now you should understand why I can protect him?”

Constrains this enough several years of words when own innermost feelings says, Huo Yuhao only thought that in the chest opens greatly, must finish, after waiting to process the Sun-Moon Empire army, is he returns to Duke's Estate.

Tang Wutong drawing close to gently side Huo Yuhao, grips his arm, using the temperature of oneself palm to comfort him. She is only one not, because Huo Yuhao said the word surprised person, because she already knew these.

He also deep remembering, several years ago when leave Duke's Estate pledge that distributes, if no support of that pledge, practice that he so will not go all out.

Several years later today, in his heart, the hatred became desalinated, but, mother's matter he must solve.

Wipes bitterly and astringently, appears above the corners of the mouth of Ju Zi(orange), “cannot think that I cannot think, the matter can be this unexpectedly, you can be his son unexpectedly. Yuhao, actually, I must thank you. You said right, I cannot kill him, I cannot kill him. Regardless of I have resenting how, I cannot kill him. Gives back to me the child, gives back to me Yunhan. I promised you, my anything promised you. I withdraw troops, we evacuate, gives back to Star Luo Star Lou Empire. However, Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire were already seized, I am unable to return, this has surpassed our Sun-Moon Empire land area more than 50%, I do not have the qualifications of restore, I can achieve, returns Star Lou Empire throughout to Star Lou Empire. Including Bright Struggle Mountain Range. This is the maximum degree that I can make concessions.”

Is listening to the Ju Zi(orange) weak words, Duke White Tiger shook shaking, in the eye the ray has put greatly. Sun-Moon Empire is willing to return Star Lou Empire throughout, this is the happiness of accident.

As for Dou Ling Empire and Sky Soul Empire, the strength of two countries Imperial Family and control was already on the wane, even if returns to them, was incapable of controlling the country. This without doubt is the best result.

Huo Yuhao hesitates after long time, nodded, said: “Good, depends on you to say. You lead Emperor Sun-Moon ** the team, withdraws from Star Lou Empire. However, you initially were perfidious, ignore ten years, then, takes hundred times of repayments. In the millenniums, Sun-Moon Empire can not attack Star Lou Empire again.”

Ju Zi(orange) heaved a deep sigh, “good, I promised you. I promised you. But if Star Lou Empire attacks us, we must counter-attack. Gives back to me the child, I walk immediately.”

She gives the compromise finally, is also related with Old Kong, this final bottom line, Old Kong gives her. Really is the strength that because Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong show was extremely formidable. In addition existence of Obstructing Bullet, by the Sun-Moon Empire present strength, if resists again, if Huo Yuhao does not hesitate at all costs launching attacks, then, will be annihilated really! Now only then evacuates here first, then finds the way to study more formidable Soul Guidance Device to resist Huo Yuhao, has the practical significance.

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “You withdraw first. As for Yunhan, I will look after well his. You had a record of being perfidious, how do you make me also probably trust you? Ten years later, if Sun-Moon Empire has not had any trend, I naturally will return him to you.”

“What?”Ju Zi(orange) loses one's voice to call out in alarm, “can you carry off the Yunhan ten years? No, this is impossible, this is absolutely impossible!”

Heard that Huo Yuhao must carry off Xu Yunhan, Ju Zi(orange) one was anxious.

Huo Yuhao cold by right, “you were perfidious, ignore making of past years, launched the war outrageously. I am impossible to trust you again, such being the case, makes Xu Yunhan follow in my ten years, lightens a punishment and watches subsequent behavior. You can walk.”

4000 character big chapters, asked the recommendation ticket!

Today I in 18 area black Wu Huang all the players of debarkation, will extract a lucky player to gain we newest Tang Sect peripheral Tang Sect exclusive Wei Yi, on picture is our Wei Yi picture, these days every time opens a new area, I will deliver one to give the player in new area, as their battle dress, wanting the reader who obtains to search “the Magic Chef of Ice and Fire game”with cell phone hundred degree celsius, edition downloading of choice correspondence can enter to play \; Wei Yi the appearance, everybody arrives at my new and wave, micro, to have a look abundantly, the model who your San Ge are personally, your sister-in-law is a guest performer. Hey. Likes also being able to come to our shop to dazzle world Tang Sect to buy, for these days happen to was the pair 12, had the preferential activity. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-616





Volume 13

#617 - Imperial Sacrifices Position


“It is not good, this is not absolutely good, you give back to me the son, gives back to me the son!”At the same time was saying, Ju Zi(orange) does not have the acceleration of omen suddenly, flushed from Sun-Moon Empire.

She was not far from Huo Yuhao, moreover these is also quite towering, Humanoid Soul Guidance Device that her body puts on is existence of most top, Soul Guidance Thruster assumes an awe-inspiring pose, is almost is similar to Teleportation is ordinary, rushed to front of Huo Yuhao, in Xu Yunhan toward Huo Yuhao hand grasps directly.

Huo Yuhao lifts the hand, strength of the formidable fetter fettered Ju Zi(orange), limited in which her firmly. At this time Kong Deming wants to rescue again, already without enough time.

Short distance looks at Ju Zi(orange), the Huo Yuhao coldly [say / way]: Person who “is bringing your leaves, since I have made the decision not to change, has made the mistake, must pay the price. Initially I that trusted you, tells you including the matter that oneself closed up, how did you treat my trust? Now, I did not have the means to believe you again. I will not injure you, you walk.”

“Gives back to me, give back to me the son. I cannot let him with you, in your eyes, he is Emperor Sun-Moon Empire, you well will certainly not teach his, the son is in my life the final hope, Yuhao, I asked you, gave back to me the son, gave back to me!”Ju Zi(orange) was entreating desperately.

If before trading does, Huo Yuhao already was definitely tenderhearted, but, Ju Zi(orange) this betrayal, making entire Dou Ling Empire perish, even was almost also invaded including Star Lou Empire, and what is more, almost died including Duke White Tiger in her hands.

Huo Yuhao is hard the feelings, effort swung, “you walk! Does not need to talk too much.”

“”Ju Zi(orange) does not cry, “Huo Yuhao, you cannot like this, you unable like this. Yunhan and Yunhan he is your son!”

The space collects suddenly, said the instance of these words in Ju Zi(orange), the surroundings. In a diameter hundred meters range, space did not have the collapse of omen suddenly. Her sound also completely submerged during that space dent. Only has several people within these hundred meters scopes to hear.

The time and space, as if completely coagulated in this moment.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, on the face completely are the astonished colors, nearby Duke White Tiger also similarly is so. Their expression coagulations on the face, Ju Zi(orange) are also maintaining appearance that because has tears streaming down the face anxiously. Little Yunhan is also surprised of face, is gaining ground, looks to Huo Yuhao.

Hundred meters coagulation, this strange. In airborne that static.

A dignified sound, does not have omen resounding of suddenly, resounds through in their ears.

“I have said that never say this secret. Said this secret, I will want your son's life. It seems like that you had forgotten I said urging all, then......”

Powerful golden light shines together suddenly, Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong, Dai Hao as well as Ju Zi(orange) and Xu Yunhan, only thought that the eye is dizzy a while ago, next one flickers. They went to another place.

When the present all become is clear, they surprised discovered that they appeared above golden fog unexpectedly.

Even if Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong such cultivating is. In this moment, actually was unable sensation to oneself to be where.

Just, this time they, have not gone to think these, the Huo Yuhao vision one coagulated on Ju Zi(orange), lost the sound track: “What did you and you say a moment ago? You said that whose son he is?”

Ju Zi(orange) at this time the complexion is a paleness, that dignified sound, made her mind big change, her fierce seized from the Huo Yuhao bosom Xu Yunhan. Then baseless kneels down. “Does not want and ask you, do not injure my son. I did not say really intentionally. Really is not. I feared that they injure my son! Asked you. Asked you, do not injure my son.”

Huo Yuhao with enough time looks up at this time to surroundings. Spiritual Detection also releases. However, what making him be startled, he that formidable Spiritual Detection, when released outward, all changes of basic around on feeling, looked like the clay ox entering the sea is ordinary, did not have the mark without the trace.

What situation is this? Actually is this where? The Huo Yuhao shocking feeling the surrounding all, are not understanding completely had anything.

In this time, golden light, is glistening in the people front together quietly. Formerly that dignified sound once more resounded.

“You feared that has injured own child, did not fear that has injured others' child? I tolerated existence of this kid, is the year has under the premise of care for all living things in the heaven. However, you actually as before cannot bear say, the hatred, has hoodwinked your eyes, the mood of out-of-control, making you probably move toward the destruction. Such being the case, I help in you.”

The golden form is gradually clear, seems the 20-year-old handsome man appears before the people slowly.

He has a Touwan water blue color long hair like a waterfall, has hung the under foot, if not his great personal appearance and broad shoulder, perhaps thinks that he is a female.

On magnificent and expensive blue long gown as if there is wave to ripple, if carefully looked, look instantaneously that deep attracts deep blue, even the entire soul will be inhaled that is similar to the sea profound and endless blue color.

It seems in the 20-year-old handsome facial features has a pair of profound eye pupil, his look seems like the cavity, but actually likely is comprehensive, occasionally flashes through together purple aura, is the moving heart and soul. Will have the sense of reality that Fang magnificent and instantaneous life and death die out an instant.

In his right hand, is grasping a handle giant gold trident, the style of this trident in the Huo Yuhao eye that familiar.

He and he are......

“Father!”Tang Wutong cries suddenly, the personal appearance dodges, during was similar to the young swallow throws the bosom to jump into that youth to embrace generally.

Sends the youth to open the arm blue, hugs into her the bosom. On the face full is kind and color. Gently is stroking the Tang Wutong pink-blue color long hair, “clever daughter, you could rest assured that the father will certainly not make you be wronged.”

Tang Wutong has turned around, looks to Huo Yuhao, her look completely became is at this moment different. She is extremely intelligent, from the beforehand Ju Zi(orange) words, in addition father's anger, she understands, all that perhaps Ju Zi(orange) said a moment ago real.

“Father, this, this child is really, is really Yuhao and Ju Zi(orange)?”Said these words time, her sound somewhat shivered.

Sends the youth to nod blue, “good.”

In beautiful pupil of Tang Wutong. Were instantaneously many dense mist, looks at Huo Yuhao, the tender body somewhat is shivering slightly. Asked with the heartrending sound: “Is, what?”

Huo Yuhao dumbfounded [say / way]: “Wutong, you listen to me to explain. I do not know! No, this child possibly is not my. Is impossible! I and Ju Zi(orange) anything has not occurred, has not had anything really! I acknowledged that in the past, when has not known you are the female body, had liked her, but I and Ju Zi(orange) are only the friend have related, not true is crossing together. This not real. This child is not my.”

Sends the youth to sneer blue, “isn't your? Xu Yunhan, you know why he did call Xu Yunhan? Because, you called Huo Yuhao. Cloud to rain, vast to Hao. Just and your name coincides. You think that this is only the coincidence? Ju Zi(orange), you told him, was his child?”

Ju Zi(orange) tight is hugging Xu Yunhan, has a look at Huo Yuhao, has a look at Tang Wutong again and that sends the youth blue. Whole person already some delay could not speak.

The master of that dignified sound, unexpectedly is the Tang Wutong father, no wonder and no wonder he was not said by himself. He does not hope own daughter knows this matter!

“Asked you, to ask you do not injure my child. Asked you, I was only a pitiful mother, I feared that my child was injured! Asked you, asked you.”Ju Zi(orange) had not explained that but is holding Xu Yunhan, unceasing sends the youth to kowtow to that blue.

The tears, flow following the face of Tang Wutong suddenly, she looks at Huo Yuhao, a pair of beautiful pupil became red.

Any woman. Was impossible to forgive own man and other woman had the child outside! Even if she likes him again, at present in this case. Her innermost feelings only then endless grief and indignation.

Sends youth look ice-cold blue looks at Ju Zi(orange), “I have spoken words. Since you treat as the neglected advice. That pays the price!”At the same time was saying, his fierce uphold hand, the blue light flashes through together, Xu Yunhan in Ju Zi(orange) bosom disappeared from the scene, when appears again, already in his hand.

Ju Zi(orange) insane wish throws, but, the surroundings entire space instantaneously is congealing. Sends youth coldly blue looks at Ju Zi(orange), his hand, fell on the neck of Xu Yunhan.

“Lets loose him!”Shouted angrily to resound, before form rushed together suddenly, pair of tiger palm, the direct racket sent the youth to that blue.

Getting rid impressively Duke White Tiger Dai Hao.

From just both sides' conversation, he understood, this child perhaps is really Huo Yuhao. Although he knows why now has not made clear Huo Yuhao to turn into own son unexpectedly suddenly, but he actually understands, if Huo Yuhao is own son, then, at present this child who called Xu Yunhan, was own biological grandson! No wonder a moment ago this War-God Empress said that cannot kill itself, originally the foundation unexpectedly is here.

In his heart, did not have Sun-Moon Empire and Star Lou Empire at this time, only then own blood relative grandson. He can see that the grandson falls into manpower, was killed?

Double 12 activity fiery opening

Everybody kisses, we pair of 12 activity opened on December 11 officially! Has continued to 14 th! Below gives everybody under the introduction our festival detail

Enters the shop to give the red package.

Every purchases any commodity full 99 Yuan package to post.

New product issue: Badge, postcard, Wei Yi, playbill.

( 1 ) buys Wei Yi, delivers playbill( one) or the badge.

( 2 ) postcard( buys one and gets one free).

4.60 Zhang Ka( buys one and gets one free).

Every purchases the complete set book to deliver postcard one set,( purchase peerless Tang Sect delivers badge and postcard)

The limited edition card sign second kills 69 Yuan one, does not support the numerical selection.

The time is: December 11 to December 14 21 : 00 pm

Sells in advance the complete works 1-26 to deliver postcard one set, playbill two, badge.

Has the interior door member to make splendid activity to ask everybody to enter the shop to consult

What kind of? We give preferential benefit well! Hey, the excited words hurry to go to Taobao, I am dazzling world Tang Sect, etc. you...... Prepared?

Website:. Search shop: Dazzles world Tang Sect ( to be continued ) 752



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-617-part-1





Volume 13

#617 - Imperial Sacrifices Position


That sends the youth look to congeal blue, Duke White Tiger was also decided is in-situ. Meanwhile, Tang Wutong closely grasps him suddenly, “father, does not want, the child is innocent. Do not injure this child.”

Sends the youth to listen to her words blue, the look one became gentle, sighed: “But, my daughter is also innocent! Who comes to be take pity on you? My pitiful Xiaoqi.”

Tang Wutong Shelled Teeth bites the lower lip tightly, “father, we go home, I and I thought you, thought mother. We go home.”At the same time was saying, she has wept bitterly loudly.

“Wutong and Wutong!”Huo Yuhao responded at this time from the shock that must throw to go forward. But that sends youth actually coldly blue looked at his one eyes, his body was also stagnated is in-situ.

The blue light dodges, sends the youth and Tang Wutong blue changes into two light shadow, vanished in this golden fog without the trace.

The dignified sound from the sky reverberates, “Star Lou Empire must return, Sun-Moon Empire changes the name is Heaven Dou Empire. Otherwise, snort|hum!”

Xu Yunhan was remained airborne, happen to instantaneously was restored the ability to act Ju Zi(orange) to hug in the bosom.

Little Yunhan has not been afraid, is staring a sparkling big eye as before, having a look at this, to have a look at that again, a curious color of face. He will certainly not be afraid, because sent on the youth god from that a moment ago blue, he has not felt existence of murderous aura.

Huo Yuhao changes Ju Zi(orange) suddenly, the anger exclaims: “Why? Why you said that this is my child? Can he be my child? Why?”

Ju Zi(orange) holds Xu Yunhan to stand up, coldly looks at Huo Yuhao, “regardless of you think not to believe that he is your child. You think that what life child I will give casually? In the past, I already know that Xu Tianran must make me taking advantage of planting to give birth. Therefore, I can only early prepare. Still remembers in Extreme North Land? You fell into my hand to lose consciousness that time. You could rest assured that my Ju Zi(orange) did not have is so inexpensive, has anything with you. I have stolen your seed with Soul Guidance Device, afterward, when Xu Tianran forces me, implants my within the body that seed. Right, Yunhan is your flesh and blood, but, I do not have with your relations. He has not related with you, you have paid that seed, what hasn't your he made?”

Huo Yuhao delay looks at Ju Zi(orange), visits him to cherish Xu Yunhan, suddenly, in heart five senses mixed Chen, all sorts of feelings. Regardless of how he cannot think that matter unexpectedly is this.

All sorts that once had, were reverberating in heart unceasingly, initial all, he recalled quickly. Yes! That time, he once to lose consciousness in front of Ju Zi(orange) after a period of time, should be that time. No wonder and no wonder first time see this child time, has had the enormous favorable impression to him.

Is thinking again initially Xu Yunhan also small time had called his father's situation, suddenly, Huo Yuhao does not know that should say anything.

Ju Zi(orange) embraces tightly the son, whatever the tears flow, cold sound track: “I borrowed your seed, to influence that you have, I can only say that was sorry. However, I must tell you am, the child, does not have with your relations. He is only my son, the future will be the Sun-Moon Empire king. He is surnamed Xu, is not surnamed with you. You should understand now why I feared you will injure him. If, you have injured him, you will certainly regret life-long.”

Duke White Tiger Dai Hao has a look at Huo Yuhao, has a look at Ju Zi(orange) again, suddenly, he does not know that should say anything were good. All that today has, have subverted the cognition in his heart completely!

Huo Yuhao pain closes the double pupil, at this time, his heart was all chaotic.

Closes up after three years with great difficulty, achievement Limit Douluo, and strives to turn the tide, preventing Star Lou Empire to be destroyed thoroughly. But, own lover actually departs because of such matter.

Before Tang Wutong leaves, in the eye pupil that thick moved made him feel as if a knife were piercing heart. Because does not know the outcome what's the matter, he even including explaining cannot achieve.

Strange Ju Zi(orange)? Now he did not have the strength to blame. The son, oneself virgin, really had a such eldest son.

“Yunhan, releases your Martial Soul.”Ju Zi(orange) in Little Yunhan to bosom said suddenly.

“Good.”

Gentle Soul Power, releases from Xu Yunhan, the command is closing the Huo Yuhao again opening eyes pupil of double pupil. Duke White Tiger Dai Hao also went to him the vision.

On Xu Yunhan, shines a Bai Se (White Color) ray, his eyes pupil, suddenly becomes bright, what stranger is, his pupil turned into the double pupil unexpectedly, the small stature inflates several points slightly, opening that on the forehead, vertical eye is quietly, but the hair, actually turned into half black half white fierce appearance pattern appearance.

This is......

Three Eyed White Tiger? What Martial Soul is this?

Looks at double pupil in his eyes pupil, Duke White Tiger the Dai Hao body has shaken shaking, in this flash, he suddenly with amazement discovered that all heroic spirit in oneself chest are nothing left, looks at this Martial Soul, he confirmed without doubt, at present this child, is own descendant!

Huo Yuhao also similarly shook shaking, he has not inherited White Tiger Martial Soul, is, around that vertical eye, has the light sun mark halo impressively! That belonged to Spirit Eyes and Eye of Asura aura, the vacation not.

Although this child's Martial Soul is only sole, but, simultaneously had the White Tiger the mind fluctuation of powerful and Spirit Eyes. This absolutely is formidable Variant Martial Soul.

Surrounding golden color desalinates gradually, space reverses.

Xu Yunhan restored original appearance, walks arm in arm, in mother cherishes, but to the correlation in space, his vision is actually the audiences falls on Huo Yuhao, is somewhat curious, somewhat strange visits him.

Outside Star Luo City, is sky over the Sun-Moon Empire army, the surrounding all are coagulate as before, the time and space, stagnated completely.

Even if Huo Yuhao is ignorant, can guess correctly indistinctly own that father-in-law's status, Gods, certainly was Gods. Besides Gods, who can control this time and space strength? One think has stood in the world peak, but compared with this father-in-law Sir, actually differs is too far and is too far.

Originally Wutong unexpectedly is the daughter of god, no wonder and no wonder she will have such talent.

This time he, did not have thoughts to ponder more issues, because, the time and space of blockade, flicker below opened completely.

Under is in the glare of the public eye, Sun-Moon Empire army, is Shrek Academy and Tang Sect people, as well as distant place the Star Lou Empire high level on Star Luo City top, military officers, had not discovered that any is not right, for them, all also were just one absent-minded, then all returned to normal.

Only the discerning person can discover that the airborne person was short of one, Tang Wutong has disappeared.

The Ju Zi(orange) complexion is somewhat pale, child returned to her to cherish, the personal appearance dodges, she has spread out and between Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao look complex visits her, at this moment, even if he does not know how should process the present all.

“I will keep the promise, certain meeting. This time, bright testimony.”Ju Zi(orange) to saying that Huo Yuhao muttered.

Huo Yuhao makes an effort has selected under.

Ju Zi(orange) takes a deep breath, changes the Sun-Moon Empire military officers, drinks one tenderly, “withdraws troops!”

Words that blue clothes youth just before leaving time spoke, already deeply the brand mark in her heart, Huo Yuhao also believes that has a testimony of Gods, Ju Zi(orange) this time is how regardless of does not dare to violate the promise.

But in fact, what he and Ju Zi(orange) does not know, the words that Gods spoke, in other words said actually, is Gods, cannot disturb the world of mortals all easily. If not involves his daughter, he cannot even come easily.

Under Ju Zi(orange) commander, the Sun-Moon Empire army restrains slowly, is similar to the tide retreats generally. The Star Luo City direction, after short silence, erupted to cheer immediately shocking.

Had finished, the war had eventually ended, the previous quarter also thinks they who must move toward the destruction, latter the moment controlled their destiny, and obtained the final victory of this war, this is the strange change!

Huo Yuhao float in midair, turns head to look to Duke White Tiger. Duke White Tiger is also visiting him, at this time this blood and iron marshal, already did not have the past war, his look is gentle and complex, even regarding Sun-Moon Empire, the hatred became desalinates. Because, the emperor in that country, is his blood relative grandson! His grandson, is controlling on Continent unexpectedly the biggest country, this is what kind its wonderful one.

“We go back.”Huo Yuhao nodded to Dai Hao.

He has grown up, the powerhouse who can eagerly anticipate a time truly, departure of Tang Wutong, making him feel like a knife twisting in the heart, but at this time, too many matters was waiting for he processes. Only then all handles after these matters, he can seek for the Tang Wutong form.

The son, oneself really had a son. Besides the Tang Wutong form, at this time his in mind, never doesn't have Xu Yunhan that pair of bright eye pupil?

Sighed, Huo Yuhao flew toward the Tang Sect people.

Under the leadership of Beibei, the Tang Sect powerhouses welcomed go forward, arrive in front of Huo Yuhao, Beibei stretched out the arms, has given him a big hug. Assumes Tang Sect besides Tang Ya, Tang Sect other powerhouses almost all here.

“Little Junior Brother, Wutong? Where on Wutong?”After Beibei hugged Huo Yuhao, cannot bear ask.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong walk are three years, some of their many words want to inquire.

Huo Yuhao low-spirited shaking the head, said: “Had some conditions a moment ago, when here matter, I sought her. First Senior Brother and Old Xuan, we return to Star Luo City first.”

Under the crowding around of people, Huo Yuhao and Duke White Tiger return to Star Luo City together.

New book issue! My newest work «Day Hot Main road» started to upload in the beginning Chinese net, everybody direct search, or selected the direct bus on our peerless Tang Sect homepage to find. Troubles everybody to advance the collection and recommendation. Peerless Tang Sect will terminate in the 20 of the month, before then, the new book renews one chapter every day, after 20 th, every day renews restores to two. «Day Hot Main road» is I especially has wanted to write, has formed in one's mind a very long work. This time, I must break through, writes has never written theme. Got used to seeing the growth experience of pursuing a goal with determination, this time, I must make everybody has a look, what is invincible tall Shuaifu, this book has to be called tall Shuaifu to foster the plan. Inside has the much knowledge, is I quotes in the reality, believes that everybody looked, to some of your help. The different functions and machine armor and invincible class, the innumerable amusing things, will show to everybody in this work. We hope that you like. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-617-part-2





Volume 13

#617 - Imperial Sacrifices Position


When he falls above the top, obtains, greets cheering of hero. Yes, at this moment, he is the Star Lou Empire hero!

A hero of changing the course of events, because has him, Star Lou Empire can preserve. And has set making of millennium. Millennium Sun-Moon Empire cannot attack Star Lou Empire, making Star Lou Empire have enough time to pursue the Sun-Moon Empire footsteps. Let alone, has this invincible Limit Douluo, Sun-Moon Empire wants to be perfidious, perhaps does not dare to implement.

Emperor Star Lou Empire Xu Jiawei welcomed, has a look at Huo Yuhao, has a look at Duke White Tiger again Dai Hao. Before Huo Yuhao in the words that airborne spoke, he may hear clearly.

“Dai brother, has not thought that you have such a good son.”Xu Jiawei acclaimed was saying.

Duke White Tiger smiles bitterly, “I am also today know!......”He wants saying that but does not know whether he is willing to recognize my this father, but has words on the tip of the tongue, has not said eventually.

Huo Yuhao sinking sound track: “Your majesty, the matter, I also had other matters to process. If you had anything to with Duke White Tiger say, please as soon as possible, then, I must mediate some private affairs with him.”

The official business, should then processes the time of private affair.

Spoke these words, Huo Yuhao changes Old Xuan, the knees kneels down, has done obeisance toward Old Xuan.

Old Xuan surprised [say / way]: “Yuhao, do you do?”

Huo Yuhao lowers the head, said: “Perhaps Old Xuan, I cannot keep Shrek City, cannot keep Tang Sect. My some matters must be done. I must look for Wutong to come back.”

On the Old Xuan old face reveals a smile, “is so?”

Huo Yuhao nodded.

“Gets up, child.”Old Xuan has drawn from the ground him personally, racket his shoulder, “if the Old Mu soul in heaven can see your present achievement, will be very certainly happy. Does matter that you want to handle, you are Academy, is Continent does were too many and are too many. Although I do not know that between you and Wutong had anything. But you want to make anything, does. We support you. As for the Academy aspect, you do not need to be worried that has the Tang Sect people, moreover, Sea God Pavilion were also many a young blood.”

“Um?”Huo Yuhao surprised looks at Old Xuan.

The flame form walked from Old Xuan together, invests into the bosom of Huo Yuhao during directly, closely grasps him.

“Younger brother, you came back finally. For three years, do not have the message, you may know that we do ask you to look laboriously?”This walks, hugs the Huo Yuhao person, is Phoenix Douluo Ma Xiaotao.

Her that rush of blood to the head red long hair was even more bright, compared with before, she appeared gentle, but that rich fire element fluctuation, wanted formidable were too many and are too many.

In the past became the accumulation of Evil Soul Master, qualitative change that Flaming Mucilage brought, as well as her assiduous practice and comprehension, in these three years time, not only achieved mastery through a comprehensive study, but also still further. In Shrek Academy the first person of younger generation, Absolute Fire Transcendent Douluo, in the future can move existence of Limit Douluo that level inevitably.

Huo Yuhao held Ma Xiaotao, the mood is lit immediately, all sorts that after this initially and Tang Wutong left, has to narrate together.

When Old Xuan hears Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao falls from the sky successively, looks the disappointed color. Limit Douluo of older generation, at present only remaining he. Initially hard to solve Dual Black and White Sacred Dragons and Grim Reaper Douluo, all passed away.

“......, The situation was critical at that time, I really do not have the strength to inform Academy again, moreover is thinking Ju Zi(orange) can guarantee ten years do not launch the war, this talent and Wutong close up together. But who knows that had such situation. Blames me, has caused this Continent disaster.”Huo Yuhao was saying at the same time, in the look full is the low-spirited color.

“Good fortune makes the person!”Beibei said: “Little Junior Brother, can this blame you? You have done to suffice. Strikes to kill Xu Tianran, to witness leaving the world of two Limit Douluo, kills Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, all that in addition just you made, you are we belong to the heroes in Douluo Continent three countries', by strength of the, preserved has belonged to the Douluo Continent three countries final hopes. You have done cannot be good.”

Huo Yuhao hear of he mentioned Sun-Moon Empire, on face revealed a light smile: “Sun-Moon Empire will not exist quickly. He will change the name is Heaven Dou Empire. Ten thousand years ago, on our Douluo Continent, is Heaven Dou Empire and Star Lou Empire fights. Ten thousand years later today, must as before so. Sun-Moon Empire no doubt subtly affected Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire with Soul Guidance Technology. But in fact, this two countries over ten thousand years of background, affects the Sun-Moon Empire person similarly again in turn. Assimilates anyone as for whom finally, but also was very difficult to say. So long as did not have Sun-Moon Empire this name, then, the final victor, not necessarily is they.”

He has not said with the Gods related matter, that somewhat will abstain after all from, but actually attended to carry out to speak the truth.

“Younger brother, what to do do you then plan?”Ma Xiaotao asked.

Huo Yuhao said: “I, if wants the means to look for Wutong. Where although I do not know her, but I believe that in a place, can certainly unable to find her to be right.”At the same time was saying, he gains ground, looks out the horizon.

Since the Tang Wutong father is Gods, then, she also certainly followed the father to return to God Realm. To retrieve her, naturally must go to God Realm to be good.

Regarding others, God Realm radically is illusory existence, may regarding Huo Yuhao, he actually touch the God Realm front door.

In the Ma Xiaotao eye reveals several points of low-spirited color, “this time walked, when can come back?”

Huo Yuhao is smiling bitterly shaking the head, said: “I do not know.”

Ma Xiaotao after short absent-minded, said resolutely: “Younger brother, you go. The Academy matter you do not need to be worried, that side Tang Sect, there are your good partners. Academy has me. I had decided that forever keeps in Academy. Sea God Pavilion Master of next generation, I, when decided.”At the same time was saying, she has smiled.

Sea God Pavilion Master this position representative, not only the authority and status, have a deep responsibility.

“Elder sister, thank you.”Huo Yuhao makes an effort has hugged her.

Ma Xiaotao said with a smile: “I can for be these many, looks Wutong that you do, must find her. If will have in the future if possible, you may probably come back to visit me.”

Although guessed that but in her heart also faintly understands Huo Yuhao will go to what kind of place. In her heart never hasn't yearned? She had not said. She believes that depending on own strength, will not necessarily have moved that world possibility in the future.

In this time, suddenly, the back is hearing one to call out in alarm.

“Your majesty, may not, your majesty!”The origin of this sound, unexpectedly is Duke White Tiger.

Huo Yuhao turns round to look that sees only Duke White Tiger on one knee to kneel down in Emperor Star Lou Empire in front of Xu Jiawei, but in the Xu Jiawei hand is taking a handle sharp knife blade, the sharp knife blade to his throat.

“Dai Hao, you get up. Do not compel me. If you did not agree that I die before you immediately.”At this moment, this Star Lou Empire emperor, unexpectedly very somewhat the makings of rascal.

Duke White Tiger Dai Hao at this time is a chaotic appearance, not only he, Dai Yueheng, Dai Huabin and Dai Louli three brothers also came at this time, all kneels in him behind.

Huo Yuhao brow micro wrinkle, walked subconsciously.

Xu Jiawei sees him, on the face smiling face were more several points, “Yuhao, urged your father quickly.”

Huo Yuhao looks to Dai Hao, “what happened?”

Dai Hao heaved a deep sigh, said: “Your majesty wants the Zen position to give me.”

“Ah?”Huo Yuhao has not thought that this Emperor Star Lou Empire will come such one unexpectedly.

Xu Jiawei is confident of face, looks at Huo Yuhao saying: Useless that “my this emperor works as . Moreover, in recent years, I also work as was too tired and is too tired. Our Xu lineage/vein, following not outstanding talent, but Dai Clan actually progresses day by day. Said honestly, so long as Dai Hao sits the throne, has your deterrent, Star Lou Empire can be as stable as the rock of Gibraltar. Let alone, in the past this throne was your Dai Clan. Now, just gives back to you.”

After the process that this country nearly perishes, in the Xu Jiawei heart regarding the authority already awakened greatly. Especially arrival of Huo Yuhao.

Saw Huo Yuhao by a strength of person has ruined Sun-Moon Empire able to move unhindered invincible Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp the time, Xu Jiawei secretly pledged in the heart, if Star Lou Empire can pass this disaster, he rather gives Huo Yuhao his throne.

All that then has became have dramatized, Huo Yuhao unexpectedly was Duke White Tiger the Dai Hao son. Xu Jiawei gets a sudden inspiration, had idea.

Gives Huo Yuhao the throne directly, might as well give convenient that Dai Hao comes. First did not say Duke White Tiger influence in empire, in addition in the past the Dai Clan book was Imperial Family, was much easier. Regardless of between Huo Yuhao and Dai Hao have what kind of contradiction, rescued father's situation from him a moment ago, Xu Jiawei understands that Huo Yuhao will certainly be protecting Dai Clan. But Star Lou Empire is wielded by Dai Clan, really may inherit.

Therefore, he had such decision, being duty-bound not to turn back has handed over the position of king.

Will Duke White Tiger comply? Xu Jiawei threaten with deaths immediately, has performed at present this picture.

Huo Yuhao somewhat was also speechless, this Emperor Star Lou Empire, was really too astute!

“Dai Hao, the idle talk little said that you comply, doesn't comply?”In a Xu Jiawei tight hand the dagger, the tian eye loudly shouted to clear the way: “Does not comply, you are the treacherous minister who kills the king!”

Duke White Tiger face upwards to heave a deep sigh, “your majesty your majesty, why bother are you? I comply.”1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-617-part-3





Volume 13

#618 - Challenges The Beastly God!


With Duke White Tiger: “I comply.”Also means that exchanging ownerships of Star Lou Empire.

Xu Jiawei puts down in the hand with a smile short blade edge, draws from ground Duke White Tiger, implored the one breath lightly, said: “I can rest finally. I under the imperial edict, considers the world this matter imperial edict immediately, how then must do, that was your matter. However, the title of duke may probably give me one. We exchange, as if also very interesting.”

Dai Hao somewhat speechless looks at face jumping for joy color Xu Jiawei, he is the joy of sincerity. For these years, is Monarch of the country, the pressure that he bore was too big, is too big. Now the powerful enemy retreated, has downloaded responsibility, his whole person seemed to be young.

“Before you handle other matters, our matters should also make one to mediate.”The Huo Yuhao sound conveys.

Dai Hao has turned round, look somewhat complex looks to him. The Dai Clan three brothers are also same.

Dai Louli goes forward fast several steps, before rushing to the Huo Yuhao body, cries: “Brother!”

On the Huo Yuhao face reveals a smile finally, Dai Louli was initially bigger, the Soul Power fluctuation that the body sends out is also not weak, has cultivating of Soul Emperor close Soul Saint unexpectedly. Obviously these years his growth.

Huo Yuhao hugged his, “must continue to try hard.”

“Um.”Dai Louli excited nod.

Some Dai Hao doubts looks at Dai Louli, “Luoli, you know him......”

To this time, Dai Louli naturally did not have any concealment necessity, nodded, said: “Master who father, in my mouth said that is my brother!”

“Ah?”Dai Hao immediately surprised staring in a big way the eye, he also clear remembering, initially that by the person who Dai Louli called the master, more than once had saved own life. Originally and he has been protecting himself. But oneself this father, has such outstanding sons not to know.

“Yuhao......”closing eyes of Dai Hao pain, he knows that he has a deficit this son, was too many, are too really many.

Dai Yueheng and Dai Huabin are also the look vary, Dai Yueheng is better, after all he and Huo Yuhao is not the person of same time, but Dai Huabin this time expression actually appears incomparably strange, he as if indistinctly recalled to mind anything, particularly childhood situation.

Huo Yuhao light [say / way]: “You come with me.”At the same time was saying, his big hand wields, golden light raises suddenly, covers in which the Dai Clan fathers and sons four people completely, the golden light lift-off, directly soars the Star Luo City outside to go.

“Brother, where can you lead us to go?”Dai Louli felt that atmosphere some are not right, asked to Huo Yuhao in a low voice.

Huo Yuhao said: “Duke's Estate.”

Dai Louli has gawked staring, in this time, is standing in rear Dai Huabin said suddenly loudly: “Huo Yuhao, if you want to revenge, comes to me.”

Huo Yuhao body one stiff, has turned round to look suddenly to him.

Facing some Huo Yuhao shock actually ice-cold looks, Dai Huabin actually happy does not fear.

“I have remembered, you were in the past that boy. Originally you are also living.”Saying of Dai Huabin coldly .

“!”Dai Hao turns round suddenly, a palm of the hand pulls out on the Dai Huabin face, the violent anger said: “You know that you actually know his existence. Said, in entire Duke's Estate, only then I do not know that also had such a son?”

Dai Huabin pulled out by Dai Hao pours in place, kneels no longer stands there, actually lowers the head, does not say a word.

Dai Hao gains ground, looks to Dai Yueheng, the anger exclaims: “Said that you also do know?”

Dai Yueheng smiles bitterly is kneeing down, he knows certainly that knows including age immature Dai Huabin, how he possibly does not know shortly, “initially, Ms. Yun died, he was missing. Father, I......”

“You were needless to say.”A Dai Hao foot tramples to fall him to the ground, then firm he, has actually had tears streaming down the face at this time.

“Yun'er, I am unfair to you! Also is unfair to our sons. In others eyes, I am commander, is the hero, is, before you, I is actually an out-and-out bastard.”

Huo Yuhao has turned around, has not said anything, has not gone to look at Dai Hao. Controls golden light to fly silently.

White Tiger Duke's Estate in approaching the Star Luo City place, but when he arrived here, actually dumbfounded.

Original White Tiger Duke's Estate how grand magnificent! But this time here, actually turned into stretch of ruins.

Spiritual Detection swept off, occupies a land area of vast White Tiger Duke's Estate to turn into stretch of ruins, complete bricks did not have.

The Dai Hao forced smile said: “That War-God Empress takes me as the dead enmity, her anger, already vented here. Naturally anything will not stay behind.”

The Huo Yuhao sudden whole body shivered fiercely, gains ground suddenly.

Golden light barrier accelerates instantaneously, falls suddenly in a direction, the rapidness of speed, the surrounding scenery therefore became illusory.

Frightened, Dai Hao at this time, actually felt the frightened mood from oneself this son. Is he afraid? What is he afraid? Dai Hao surprised looks at Huo Yuhao.

Yes, Huo Yuhao is afraid, because he has thought a possibility, will make him lament possibility lifelong.

Finally, that place was already in sight, after Spiritual Detection scanning of Huo Yuhao in the past, his whole person body shook shaking, but tight mood, relaxed finally.

Five people dropped from the clouds, fall on there.

That is a piece of repair very good grave, although is lonely, but is independent.

Reason that Huo Yuhao will fear, is feared that mother's grave is similar to that White Tiger Duke's Estate generally is also ruined! After all on this tombstone, there are inscriptions of Dai Hao two characters. If so, he will certainly not let off Ju Zi(orange).

But now looks like, this grave is lucky, here does not have the trace that the army passed by, as if dark, had a strength to protect here.

“Pū passes”one, Huo Yuhao kneels down in front of the tombstone, the sound is shivering, “mother, I came to see you. I came.”

Dai Yueheng and Dai Huabin were kneeling, at this time looks up to that tombstone. Dai Yueheng sighed, Dai Huabin was the pursing the lips lip, the body is actually shivering, in the eye pupil, had the tears to flow unexpectedly.

Dai Louli kneels down side Huo Yuhao, has done obeisance to that tombstone directly.

Only then Duke White Tiger is also standing, is only, this time he, actually already choked with sobs.

“Yun'er, Yun'er I am unfair to you. My actually you had sons not to know to me.”

Huo Yuhao kneels there, the sound actually becomes incomparable ice-cold, the matter that “you do not know also has, your duchess, maltreats my mother, we were inferior including the servants in the palace. I had asked mother, when can eat to the full. I also deep remembering, mother at that time the pain on face. In order to made me eat the chummy sesame seed cake, mother does not hesitate just to leave the sesame seed cake of pot to put in the bosom, took to me to eat. But she was actually scalded.”

“Mother died, but, even if before she dies that flickers, I have not seen a regret from her eyes. I am not really clear, you have anything to be worth her liking. Mother, all dehumanizing is you give him. You are the Star Lou Empire good marshal, is actually not a good husband.”

In the Huo Yuhao sound, does not have anger, has ice-cold. But his body, actually in unceasing is shivering.

Waits for this day, his waited was too long and is too long.

He came back finally, although he is not a duke, does not have the lofty title, but present he, completely had the qualifications to keep the past promise.

“I once well hated, to hate the duchess, hates to injure my mother's Dai Huabin. May afterward, I not hate them gradually. Because, my mother can not receive the pain that they bring. In the final analysis, because she has fallen in love with you, because of you, my mother will receive that many painstakingly.”

Before Dai Hao absent-minded arriving tombstone, his firm knee is slowly curving, kneels down in front of the tombstone, “right, you said right. All these blame me. I cannot give her to be happy, actually must with her in the same place. Has harmed her eventually. Yes, all these blame me. Yuhao, I know you to hate, I do not have the face to make you call me a father. But asked you to allow me to live again for one year, when I the domestic matter will arrange, came here to build a simple hut to occupy. At that time, I finally can idle, every day accompanied your mother to speak, every day confessed to her. That day when I die, if you permit, thinks that I had that qualifications, I also buried here, was accompanying her, if there is a next generation, I will exhaust all my abilities to love her.”

Huo Yuhao look no longer ice-cold, the Dai Hao words, touched in his heart finally the softest place. He knows certainly in the past what mother most hoped to obtain is anything. It is not any status or is other, she is only one is hoping the husband can come back, can defend in husband concubine!

One wanted to do, doesn't make him confess before mother's grave? He said that in Huo Yuhao heart holds to read, gradually desalinated eventually.

To his present cultivating is, in addition to the control of Power of Emotion, already was not initially that because of hating to hoodwink the eyes age.

Stands up, Huo Yuhao arrives at side Dai Hao, held him.

“Hopes you to keep one's word, can achieve all that you say today.”Spoke these words, after he has thought deeply about one slightly next, said: “In the past I left, had sent the pledge, must revenge for my mother, must make her have the most honored status. I know that my mother most hopes actually, is your wife. Then, you received the Zen position of Emperor Star Lou Empire now, I want your to seal|confer my mother to be an empress, later can not set up the empress again in addition, particularly cannot make the duchess be the empress, looked that in share that you confessed that I no longer looked for the She enmity.”

Because of writing a book, cannot have anything to spend the time the hobby, therefore has fallen in love with the liquor. Weary, relaxes, will think slightly two cups, understood the liquor gradually. Therefore afterward had the Bacchus. But new book «Day Hot Main road» in alternative forms more specialized told the story about liquor to everybody. Including Bacchus story that in some true reality world has. The second chapter, the Goths old distillery, has sent! Everybody has a look quickly. The new book also troubles everybody to collect and recommend, thanks. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-618-part-1





Volume 13

#618 - Challenges The Beastly God!


Looks at Huo Yuhao becomes gentle many faces, Duke White Tiger smiles bitterly, “you wanted to look for the She enmity unable to achieve.”

“Um?”Huo Yuhao stares.

Dai Huabin bites the mandibular joint tightly, the [say / way] of having tears streaming down the face: “My mother already died. Five years ago died. If you want to revenge, clashes me to come.”

Did the duchess die?

Huo Yuhao stayed, yes! The birth and death, any person will die, at this moment, he suddenly thinks very relaxed, this is the relaxedness of heart. Since many years, have pressed a big stone on their heart to dissipate on such to shatter. Had finished, yes, all finished. Has hated, finished finally.

Dai Hao look complex looks at Huo Yuhao, “child, what do you then have to plan?”

Huo Yuhao said: The matter that “the matter, I wanted to handle, has basically achieved. This time, Sun-Moon Empire decides however does not dare to be perfidious again. Let alone also has existence of that relations. The Xu Jiawei Zen position gives you, absolutely is a move of good chess. Although cannot say that Star Lou Empire millennium without cause for grief, but in hundred years, should not have any dispute really again. Only needs to develop well is. I must handle the matter that I must handle.”

Duke White Tiger said: “Will you also come back?”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “Should unable. I will go to a remote place.”

Dai Hao sighed, “I know that I did not have the qualifications to make you call me a father. However, I actually as before must say one, my son, takes care. If some day you tired, tired outside, comes back.”

His son called, the Huo Yuhao body shook shaking, the last hostility in look also melted. Is gazing at the tombstone, on the tombstone, mother's voice and face smiling face appears in the mind. As if mother full Han is hoping looks at itself.

“Father......”two characters gently. Puts out from the Huo Yuhao mouth.

Duke White Tiger tiger body shakes greatly, some do not dare to believe looks to him, fierce stretching out the arms. Effort hugs into to cherish him.

Yes! This is own son!

Huo Yuhao this “father”summon, naturally not because of Dai Hao. But is he knows that what mother most desired is anything. So long as can make mother happy, regardless of makes anything, he wants.

“You walk first, I want to accompany my mother.”Huo Yuhao said in a soft voice.

Duke White Tiger loosens the both arms, turns around to look to the tombstone, supple sound track: “Yun'er, you are waiting. I came back to accompany you quickly. I have a deficit your, uses my latter half of one's life to repay.”

“Brother”Dai Louli called out.

Dai Yueheng has also stood up, and has pulled up Dai Huabin.

Dai Yueheng arrives at side Huo Yuhao, has patted his shoulder.

Dai Huabin also walked, vision complex visits him, long time, somewhat difficult [say / way]: “Sorry.”

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth place reveals a forced smile, “whatever, my mother ressurection, your mother is not. In the past. Passed. Ok!”

Ok! These two characters said from his mouth, how difficult! But he said eventually, in this moment. He puts aside that hatred in innermost feelings finally completely.

Star Lou Empire Xindi Dai Hao, leading three sons to leave. Before the tombstone, only remaining Huo Yuhao people.

His kneeling silently before mother grave, on the face is revealing the light smile.

“Mom, this is you wants to see. You are so good. I have achieved, I made him return to your side finally, later, had him to accompany you, you will not feel lonely. Mom. I quite think that you, good to think you! If you are also living, that this good.”

He such kneels before the grave. In a low voice was pouring out, whatever time passed. In an instant, has knelt a one day night.

Light golden light, behind condenses in him, gradually takes shape.

“Had finished?”The gentle sound will immerse, to mother recalled that Huo Yuhao awakens, he gained ground suddenly, sees, is a familiar and kind face.

“Is you.”Huo Yuhao stands up, respectful salutes to oneself behind golden hair youth.

On the God of Emotion Rong Nianbing face is revealing the light smile, “your matter, I knew. Evidently, your present is not happy!”

The Huo Yuhao forced smile said: “This solution, was solved finally. But, are baseless many a son, Wutong went to me. Where I do not even know her.”

Rong Nianbing said: “What do you have to plan?”

The Huo Yuhao look instantaneously becomes firm, “I must look for her, regardless of pays what kind of price, I must look for her. Please lead me to go to God Realm, she certainly there. Where do you know her? Is the Wutong father, actually?”

Rong Nianbing said: “Nobody can lead you to go to God Realm, I am not good. To go to God Realm, can only depend upon own strength, but is not the external strength. You want to inherit my God Position, but also misses the last test not to complete. You need to become most powerhouse on Douluo Continent. As for your future father-in-law's matter, when you can inherit the position of my Gods truly time, I naturally can tell you.”

The Huo Yuhao look moves slightly, said: “What you said that Beast God?”

Rong Nianbing nods the head slightly, his body also starts gradually to desalinate, changes into the point golden light dissipation in the air.

“Goes, you defeat Beast God that moment, can inherit the time of position of my Gods.”

Huo Yuhao stands in same place, intention phonograph, on the face appears gradually a smile.

Although God of Emotion Rong Nianbing has not stated clearly, but can listen from his words, he and that future father-in-law should be the understanding. In other words, so long as can arrive at God Realm successfully, then, wants to seek for Wutong is not the extremely difficult matter.

Beast God, Di Tian! Finally to has can challenge your time?

Intense fighting intent bursts out from the Huo Yuhao god suddenly, only then defeats Beast God, can look for own Wutong. No one can prevent itself from going to God Realm!

Huo Yuhao has turned around, kneels down to mother's tombstone once more.

“Mom, I must look for your daughter-in-law, when I retrieve Wutong, certainly leads her to worship you.”

After kneeling three times and kowtowing nine times, Huo Yuhao sets out, soars, flies in the Star Luo City direction.

In Star Luo City, is brimming with a happy expression.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection easy covers entire Star Luo City, seeks person who he must find. Quick, he found the Tang Sect people stationed is.

Breaks the space, appears in front of the partners.

Must leave, he must say goodbye to his partners, says goodbye to Old Xuan.

“Can walk?”Beibei looks at Huo Yuhao, in the look, filled has not abandoned. Three years do not see, a dynasty returns, actually must leave.

Huo Yuhao be with smile on the face looks at Beibei, said: “First Senior Brother, you could rest assured that after I have retrieved Wutong, we will certainly come back. I must hold the wedding with Wutong in our Tang Sect and in Shrek City. Without your blessings, our happiness are incomplete.”

Listened to his such saying, Beibei, He Caitou, Xu Sanshi and other talented people to laugh.

“What do you also wait for? Quickly has not gone, must come back the Wutong belt, otherwise, you did not use.”Jiang Nannan said with a smile.

“Yes, certain!”

Said goodbye to the partners, Huo Yuhao leaves Star Luo City once more. After he rises into the upper air, immediately has not actually left, but turns around the personal appearance, is looking out the Sun-Moon Empire direction.

They already on road. Yunhan, Little Yunhan. Disappointed flows in his heart. Ju Zi(orange) Ju Zi(orange), I do not know how really should face you. Perhaps, is really, good fortune makes the person. You said right, I do not have the qualifications to be the Yunhan father, he is you, is your son.

Shaking of effort, abandons in the mind the last distracting thoughts, Huo Yuhao jumps, flies to shoot to go in the Star Dou Forest direction.

......

After January, outside Star Luo City, the original White Tiger Duke's Estate ruins were cleaned up cleanly, makes the ancient rite of making sacrifices stage.

Xu Jiawei informed the world, the Zen situated in Duke White Tiger Dai Hao. Xu Jiawei is cannozed as Duke Star Crown, after the ancient rite of making sacrifices ended. In the original White Tiger Duke's Estate site, construction mansion.

Dai Hao ascends the throne proclaims oneself emperor, seals Dai Louli as the crown prince, Dai Yueheng and Dai Huabin for the crown prince. Seals deceased better self Huo Yun as the empress. Presents Ice Spirit Douluo Huo Yuhao is State Master.

Shrek City relieves prohibits, Shrek Academy recruits students again outward. Tang Sect expands the Soul Guidance Hall R &amp\; D institution, Soul Guidance Hall Hall Master takes over by He Caitou. Xuan Ziwen joins Shrek Academy, appointed Soul Guidance Faculty Dean. No matter what Ma Xiaotao Martial Soul Faculty Dean.

Old Xuan passes on the position of Sea God Pavilion Master in Yan Shaozhe, crossed on the good wine to add the chicken leg the wonderful day.

No matter what Ice Spirit Douluo Huo Yuhao reputation Pavilion Master.

After March.

The Sun-Moon Empire army evacuates in Star Lou Empire completely. Returns Bright Struggle Mountain Range.

Also a half year.

War-God Empress Ju Zi(orange), resists opposition, under silver moon Douluo the support of Old Kong as well as military, announced that Sun-Moon Empire changes the name is: Heaven Dou Empire.

Starting from this moment, Douluo Continent restored for ten thousand years ago, the day fights, the Star Luo two potentials of big empire north and south confrontations.

Continent belongs to tranquilly. The wound of war in the rapid growth of Soul Guidance Technology, was smoothed gradually.

......

Instant thousand li(500 km).

As if only passed several instances, Star Dou Forest had already been in sight.

The silver glittering, Huo Yuhao breaks space, reappears in the midair, but this time he, actually already sky over Star Dou Forest.

Sky over Star Dou Forest, is always the famous airspace reservation. May at this moment, after Huo Yuhao appears, does not have any flight Soul Beast to dare to approach.

The sky is sunny, the blue sky such as washes. The beautiful sunlight shines on Star Dou Forest, making this big forest lend the thick life aura.

……

The «Day Hot Main road» third chapter already, although writes is very tired, but specially was stimulated for these days. Two years have not written the new book, write the feeling of new book, like protecting an immature baby, hoping him to be able perfect growing up slowly. Troubles everybody to collect and recommend, thanks. The new book will surely give you pleasantly surprised one. ( to be continued ) 752



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-618-part-2





Volume 13

#618 - Challenges The Beastly God!


Float in airborne, the Huo Yuhao body starts to shine a light halo, huge Spiritual Power, is centered on his body outward diffusion, flows swiftly general just like the mercury, spreads to entire Star Dou Forest.

“Di Tian, I came!”The simple five characters, change into the tidal thought that spreads to Star Dou Forest, in an instant, big forest complete coverage of this length and breadth, the mind thought of that terror, making the powerhouses including 100,000 years of Soul Beast, shivered all.

Star Dou Forest central area. Lake of Life.

The giant head raises from that deep green lake water suddenly, carries over the innumerable water splash. Rich life aura disperses to all around along with it.

The golden giant eye pupil opens slowly, the huge body raises gradually.

“Did you come finally? I and others you waited to be very long and be very long.”The low and deep sound from the sky reverberates, rises the wave to be billowing, sky over entire Star Dou Forest, immediately slight distortion. The sky gradually changed color, the beautiful sunlight, shortly will be covered by Wu Yun (black clouds).

Huo Yuhao float in midair, faces this Wu Yun (black clouds) to press the city to destroy the potential actually to remain unmoved.

“The day, I also waited for a long time and is very very long.”Huo Yuhao vision tranquil looks at a direction.

One group of smoke clouds from that direction lift-off, just started, only then small one group, but is quick, the smoke cloud enlarges rapidly, just like a giant smoke dragon general lift-off.

Full of vitality Star Dou Forest, unexpectedly becomes in this moment a silence, a sound has not sent out.

The smog condenses, Beast God Di Tian of a black clothed and long hair shawl, the double hand back after behind, that appears in front of Huo Yuhao.

His pair of profound eye pupil falls on Huo Yuhao, looks at front this as if unadorned youth, his slight bow. “That time cannot hold you, I know that will have such a day of arrival, but has not thought. On this day comes such rapidness. Power of Destiny has camouflaged all your, I have looked for your one year. But throughout has not actually sought for your trail. You dare to look for me today, thinks that had grasps certainly?”

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, looks at Beast God, looks like the old friend who long time does not see is common, said: “You are in front of me a palatial mountain, does not surmount, I will never move toward the peak.”

Di Tian smiles cold, said: “That has a look. Is I stays behind the Star Dou Forest destiny, you have stepped from me, pursues your God Position.”

Huo Yuhao not accidental Di Tian knows one pursue the God Position matter, if he has not felt, he was not Beast God.

“Comes up.”Di Tian drinks one coldly, one step steps forward, the silver glittering, he escaped into the space to disappear does not see.

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, is one step steps forward similarly, marches into the space.

To their this levels. Each other resistance arrived at the boundary of simplifying, but absolutely is more dangerous than any fight.

The clear and bright sky, almost flickered below darkly. The dim ray gives people a strange aesthetic sense. Has not constrained, instead has to plant to keep aloof an edition of sublimation.

Two silver light are almost simultaneously glitter in this Wu Yun (black clouds), Huo Yuhao and Di Tian simultaneously appear above ten thousand meters upper air.

Even if the powerhouse of Titled Douluo rank, is unable to hope to attain so the altitude. Not only here has the ultra-low temperature, the air is extremely thin, intense astral wind.

If the general biology suddenly appears here, then, the flesh and blood will change into flying ash withering away instantaneously.

But Huo Yuhao and Di Tian simultaneously appear in this level, seems actually likely on the flat land general. Not any change. Moreover, they simultaneously present time. Even continually distance, before, in airborne exactly the same.

Di Tian nodded to Huo Yuhao. “I very long had not had such fighting spirit like today. Also there is many year of nobody to challenge me. Actually, I am very lonely.”

Huo Yuhao said: “I can feel, actually, you that have not been attached to the life, why?”

Di Tian gives a calm smile, “if you also lived for several hundred thousand years, you will not ask my such question. I am familiar with each dust in Star Dou Forest, sees this in society to occur all slight. To here, I was already sick. Is a responsibility, making me persevere here, cannot leave. Otherwise, I rather use the future years to pursue a novelty.”

“? Beast God wants to pursue what novel is?”Huo Yuhao somewhat curious asking.

In the Di Tian eye pupil reveals one to yearn for the color, “world outside Douluo Continent. I, had swum around this world long ago. Do you know? Actually our world is a giant sphere, if flies in a direction, the final result circles a big circle, returns to the zero point. But on our world, the sea occupied the most region, genuine land only then few pieces. But has the highest civilization, is our Douluo Continent, in addition afterward Sun-Moon Continent. Naturally, now has Douluo, did not have Sun-Moon. I was born in Douluo Continent, therefore, to this point, I am is happy.”

Huo Yuhao visits him surprisedly, “our are world a sphere?”

Di Tian nodded, said: “Right . Moreover, star that we can see every night, is spheres, Sun and moon is also.”This time he, looked like precipitated several hundred thousand years of wise.

“Therefore, I want other planet besides us to have a look. I attempted to fly high. After exceeding certain altitude, the oppression strength and binding force in air will reduce, but, there actually barrier, only then runs out of that barrier, has to track down another world possibility. I do not know whether my this life can achieve, but I want to attempt really very much. Perhaps that wall barrier, is God Realm gives us the fetter of this world. If I can overrun, has to go to God Realm possibly also perhaps. I even thought that God Realm likely existence on another planet. Dominates above us existence. There, can control many strengths and mysteries.”

“Why don't you try?”Asking of Huo Yuhao doubts.

Di Tian shook the head, said: “I cannot. Among the life and death has the big terror, but this for me is actually not anything, but, I actually and is not only living. I must protect Star Dou Forest, must protect our Dragon Clan final pure bloodlines. Therefore. I cannot take risk, I must live, even if alone bored is living. Also is the same.”

“Said honestly, your appearance. Gave me pleasantly surprised. From you, before I saw some, other these humanity not to have. Over ten thousand years of nobody can go to God Realm through their practice, obtained God Realm to approve, but you, had this possibility finally. If not because on you are having our Star Dou destiny, I am even willing to help your helping hand, only hopes after you, can come back, the thing that sees in that side tells me you. For me, this is most meaningful.”

“Was a pity that you fused Three Eyed Golden Lion, this has been doomed, among us can only be the opposition. I will not kill you, if this time I can defeat you, I will get up your seal, making you keep Star Dou. Takes your present cultivating as and ** degree, the millenniums will not have the life issue. Moreover, I will also moisten your body with the Lake of Life lake water. And finds the way to let under your birth the descendant, then from your descendant, inherits this destiny.”

“I will look for 100,000 years of Soul Beast to be the wife to you. Like this your descendants will have the Soul Beast characteristics, the life can be long-time, but your destiny, the association inherits in the birth descendant's process. At that time, I killed you again, your Destiny Skull fusion having the descendant of Soul Beast bloodlines. His long life and destiny fuse, must be able to guarantee my Star Dou Forest to be safe. This matter I have thought is very long, thought that like this processes should be the best result.”

Di Tian said is very earnest, completely as if these matters have completed.

On the Huo Yuhao face does not have any look change. Silently listens to him to narrate.

“Has unbearabl chill in a high position, originally Beast God. Also is not joyful. Even tracks down own thing unable to achieve continually. However, I admire you very much. Perseveres for a responsibility, you are worth me admiring.”At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao bows to Di Tian slightly, shows the respect.

After bowing, he slowly is also straight the body, the vision also starts with the change of movement becomes different. The gentle look started becomes bright, fills sharp bright.

“All that but, you conceive, must be based on matter. That is, defeats me!”The Huo Yuhao sound spreads by far, the billowing voice, rips open a crack airborne Wu Yun (black clouds) unexpectedly actually. The bright sunlight shines the earth once more, shines on him, making his whole person cover golden color.

Di Tian nodded, said: “Good, defeats you. Then, we start.”At the same time was saying, his right hand lifts slowly, remote to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao also makes with his same movement, similarly is the right hand lifts, not only that on him is also bursting out the unequalled intense ray.

Round gold sun, behind suddenly shines in him, intense ray, far ultra space sunlight. Under the golden background, this time he, looks like the deity arrives general.

Di Tian behind, similarly shines a Sun, compared with the brilliance of Huo Yuhao, this Sun was actually the black, like black ink, in the jet black edge, has a purple halo jet black.

The purple ray slight twinkle, is rippling one just like the flame light mark.

gold sun and black sun, each other confront in the sky, Wu Yun (black clouds) originally, instantaneously was also turning into half golden color and half black. Moreover not in top of the head, but was subsides the under foot.

Tomorrow the chapter of renewal of new book can place early morning, after zero point, to list. The good novel feeling, to the list, is a little not for a long time disturbed, a little anticipated. I have not been reporting the too high hope, but I believe you. The 14 th work. I can also like Venerable Jin Yong, write an antithetical couplet. Hey.

Therefore, after 0 : 00 pm, accompanies our new book to clash the list! Cheered for it, the new chapter, will give everybody saying that the story of deity lost treasure, world liquor king! ( to be continued ) 752



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-618-part-3





Volume 13

#619 - Three Spirits Nucleus!


Di Tian has 800,000 years of cultivating of after is! His strength, such as deep pool like prison. Their palms, almost also glisten. golden light and black light, collide instantaneously together.

They, originally be only about hundred meters distance, but under this collision, the body of both sides is similar to receives an electric shock general, explodes instantaneously draws back.

Before them at the central point of position, one group of glares sticks out suddenly instantaneously, the terrifying energy storm made the entire space fiercely shiver.

Giant black hole appeared in that position instantaneously, the diameter has achieved about the hundred zhang (333m), crazy was swallowing the surrounding all, below clouds therefore ascended, poured into toward that black hole.

The strange picture also appears, under swallowing of that black hole, in the sky looks like presented the tornado that black and golden color mixed to blend to be ordinary, although this continued less than ten seconds, but actually world phenomenon.

Huo Yuhao and Di Tian are separated by several kilometers, each other confronts. In the Di Tian eye flashes through one startled to accommodate, “your achievement, third Soul Nucleus? Space Attribute?”

Huo Yuhao nods the head slightly, “good. Otherwise, why can I challenge you?”

......

Soul Power blends, the breakthrough arrived at the most crucial time. Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor strength already consumed being not much left, in the dantian, third Soul Nucleus already took shape, but actually in independent revolution.

Sits in the cave, Huo Yuhao in the heart senses at this time a great deal. He knows that the following fusion, is most essential one step, fused successfully, that reached the sky in a single bound. If failed, then, not only need destroy, sits in opposite Tang Wutong is also so.

If some choices, Huo Yuhao rather never will practice this third Soul Nucleus. Also is not willing to take risk with Tang Wutong.

But, their within the body has injected into that many Soul Power by Dragon Emperor Douluo and Grim Reaper Douluo, does not absorb. Means the death. Does not control, dying is quicker.

Therefore had this closing up.

Now. He must do, is lets this third Soul Nucleus and own another two Soul Nucleus fuses mutually, and in the collision process, forms a brand-new collision chain link.

To realizing from experience of Space Power, his completed was similar, but at present, is most important, realizes from experience this with own Soul Nucleus fuses completely. Also must control the processes of three Soul Nucleus collisions, this is what kind difficult!

If were not before has swallowed Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler complete Spiritual Power, Spiritual Power promoted another level, a Huo Yuhao point assurance not to have, but currently, he finally has certain assuring.

The mind thought transfers completely, three big Soul Nucleus velocities of whirl slow down in his control gradually. Slower, waits a minute process of fusion not to make a mistake on exceed easily. This without doubt is the best choice.

Three Soul Nucleus speeds are weaken, Huo Yuhao starts to carry on the trimming. He by mind Soul Nucleus of own between the eyebrows place, was the first Soul Nucleus velocity of whirl sped up. But the second, 2-3 rd Soul Nucleus velocity of whirl of chest place and dantian place weakened several points.

As the matter stands, first, 22 nd Soul Nucleus that blended mutually started becomes some disorder.

Their each other blending, are based on balanced. Then can complete Yin-Yang Supplement. At this time, a velocity of whirl quick, a velocity of whirl is slow. As the matter stands, balanced must be broken naturally.

The Soul Power fluctuation does not start steadily, but Huo Yuhao has actually made a strange choice, he extracts quietly Spiritual Power in spiritual sea.

mind Soul Nucleus in the spiritual sea core position, he extracts, while mind Soul Nucleus and spiritual sea division gradually.

Huge Spiritual Power in spiritual sea, is the mind Soul Nucleus source is, does not have the support of spiritual sea. mind Soul Nucleus cannot maintain steady. Also is Huo Yuhao this formidable mind controlling force dares such to do, trades Titled Douluo to carry on such attempt. Already death does not know where went.

Within the body Soul Power slightly ballooning. Huo Yuhao started his true difficult travel.

mind Soul Nucleus under his control, the huge Spiritual Power gable in subsides by spiritual sea pulls out to suddenly. Fell toward the chest place unexpectedly.

But second Soul Nucleus of chest place, actually under his Soul Power promotes, rise.

Right, he must do, is, changing positions!

To complete the practice of this third Soul Nucleus, the best method that he thinks is so.

After absorbing Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler huge Spiritual Power, in fact, Huo Yuhao two Soul Nucleus some were not balanced. Because mind Soul Nucleus is too strong, but Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus is more inferior. Therefore, when each other collides produces whirlpool Soul Power, will have the situation that the mind Soul Nucleus strength swallows the Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus strength to appear.

Therefore, before Huo Yuhao, has to separates part of spiritual sea and mind Soul Nucleus, the independent storage, this has not had problems. But at this time, he must rely on, is actually the mind Soul Nucleus superiority, carries on this fusion.

The Yin-Yang Supplement two big Soul Nucleus sudden universe invert, pain that this brings, looks like all moves out of the way the five main internal organs (entrails), places position again.

Although before, Huo Yuhao has prepared all, all routes arranged. But when he does truly, is bearing the huge pain as before.

Two Soul Nucleus each other interlock, in that flash, the Huo Yuhao whole body pore bursts out blood fog, at the tenacious degree of his body. Does not have the means to bear the so fierce pain. On the forehead, Eye of Destiny has opened uncontrolled, inside does not have gloomily up.

Eye of Destiny is in itself and mind Soul Nucleus mutually fusion! Now Huo Yuhao must move out mind Soul Nucleus, independent existence, this has the huge influence to Eye of Destiny obviously.

But he actually as before persists in such doing.

Two Soul Nucleus each other separate finally, Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus is upward, mind Soul Nucleus downward, they each other collide and energy in entanglement, Soul Power that produces was not already steady. Low and deep airing sound, continuously appears on Huo Yuhao, this is because Soul Power is not steady, in results that his within the body unceasing exploding produces.

Finally, Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus by extremely irritable push originally mind Soul Nucleus position, but mind Soul Nucleus also extremely irritably arrived at the chest place, two big Soul Nucleus each other were actually towing, wanted to return to the original position. Among them the Soul Power chain link, looks like has tightened the rubber band is common, so long as relaxes the control. They will immediately recoil place originally.

Also at this time, Huo Yuhao unexpectedly slowly has opened eyes.

If some people can see his present look. Will discover that in his pair of pupil, actually has the innumerable chaotic rays to glitter.

He is shivering, lifts own right hand, approached the Eye of Destiny place fitting on own forehead in the past.

Such usually is looking like in the simple movement, at this moment, unexpectedly becomes incomparably difficult.

Finally, the right hand of Huo Yuhao lifts played the enough high position. His fierce effort, right hand according to Eye of Destiny.

One group of strange rays glisten suddenly there, Huo Yuhao lowers roars, his voice was ordinary just like the wild animal at this time. Meanwhile, he remove the dantian place third Soul Nucleus final protection. Third Soul Nucleus is revolving strength appears immediately, the huge force of traction erupts suddenly there, space Soul Power whirlpool that produces instantaneously mind Soul Nucleus collision toward Huo Yuhao chest place in the past.

But also at this moment, unequalled huge Spiritual Power, instantaneously erupted in the Huo Yuhao Eye of Destiny position. The rubber bands that between first, 22 nd Soul Nucleus huge pulling strength, in addition tightened. Control that as well as Huo Yuhao lets loose suddenly.

mind Soul Nucleus and Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus, spring instantaneously, respectively toward position return originally.

But at this time. The third Soul Nucleus strength is towing on mind Soul Nucleus, under that huge pulling force function, this third Soul Nucleus was entrained the dantian by pulling immediately, left position originally.

At this time if with several characters described that the situation in Huo Yuhao within the body, the snafu, is then most appropriate.

Three Soul Nucleus, complete shifting, within the body Spiritual Power and Absolute Ice Soul Power or Space Attribute energy. All is in a confusion.

However, three Soul Nucleus in process of such revolving. A little is not chaotic. That is, mind Soul Nucleus toward originally the between the eyebrows position ball in the past. Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus wants the position.

This point. Because in Eye of Destiny has the function of formidable suction suddenly, becomes more rapid.. mind Soul Nucleus shot instantaneously, with the Eye of Destiny suddenly fitting, and erupted unequalled huge Spiritual Power, in that flash, mind Soul Nucleus, Eye of Destiny and Huo Yuhao spiritual sea, has completed the fusion instantaneously. Spiritual Power sublimates suddenly.

At that time, the mountain peak that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were, turned into the pure golden color because of Spiritual Power of this terror.

However, that force of traction was really too strong, Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus just returned to the position, pulled rebound. Third Soul Nucleus at this time, actually shot. The energy between their two, has had instantaneously the collision.

These two directions of Soul Nucleus revolving are clearly opposite, strange appeared. Under the precision control of Huo Yuhao, they almost in same instantaneously have also completed the effect of Yin-Yang Supplement mutually fusion. But actually in Soul Nucleus should not in position, but rises the place of Huo Yuhao close shoulder.

Three Soul Nucleus, have formed a strange triangle.

New week, is the peerless Tang Sect last week. Two years, had soon ended, are somewhat moved. I know that place some of ending are not entirely as desired, some everybody unsatisfied places, plot that also some have not shown completely. But a book has written for two years, a day has not broken, I was a little really tired. This is my first attempt writes so long big lengthy. We hope that everybody many selects time to me. Next time will write again is so long, this time will be certainly better.

Peerless Tang Sect last act, means that new world is going to open. I have adjusted the good condition, welcomes the arrival of «Day Hot Main road» with fullest mind, therefore, the new week, lets we taste Tang Sect at the same time, pays attention to our new books. The day hot main road, I to everybody a pleasant surprise, the theme will certainly inform my evolution with one type has never written! Sought the collection, to ask the recommendation ticket for the new book. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-619-part-1





Volume 13

#619 - Three Spirits Nucleus!


\; The controlling force that the Huo Yuhao previous quarter just let loose, came back at this time.

Has completed Yin-Yang Supplement two Soul Nucleus, the submersion, third Soul Nucleus returns to the dantian suddenly, that is its place, but second Soul Nucleus? Then returns to the chest.

Because of the Yin-Yang Supplement reason, two Soul Nucleus rays become especially powerful. But first Soul Nucleus huge Spiritual Power, subsided at this time.

Its arrival, is not sole and Soul Nucleus collides, but was the direct hit on the second, 2-3 rd Soul Nucleus chain link. Huge Spiritual Power, pours into to whirlpool Soul Power in that extreme twist in directly.

Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus and mind Soul Nucleus are Yin-Yang Supplement, among them naturally appeared fuses supplementarily. But Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus and that third Soul Nucleus is also Yin-Yang Supplement, under each other substitution, unexpectedly becomes the extraordinary harmony.

mind Soul Nucleus is most formidable, its strength drops to Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus, again through after Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus fuses, subsides to third Soul Nucleus. Excessively many Spiritual Power were melted through the fusion by third Soul Nucleus. By the second, 2-3 rd Soul Nucleus strength, just dominates mind Soul Nucleus above them the energy melts.

A strange balance, like this appeared. It looks like circles link of reciprocation, presents in Huo Yuhao within the body. But Soul Power of these process multiple fusions, condense in the Huo Yuhao dantian, through his law of Mysterious Heaven Skill daily practice, spreads to the meridians again.

The beforehand disorder, vanishes completely, the Huo Yuhao situation turned, the forehead is the Spiritual Power agglomeration. The dantian is the Soul Power agglomeration. In his Soul Power. Simultaneously had mind, Absolute Ice and space, three species.

Third Soul Nucleus, the fusion is completed!

The entire process said that so is complex, in the process of implementation, the complex degree can be imagined. Can finally complete the most important point, actually lies in Spiritual Power enough formidable, mind controlling force enough precise.

Right hand of Huo Yuhao. Puts down slowly, around his Eye of Destiny eye pupil, is glittering quietly the apertures of thorn shapes.

Yes, there, has special existence.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler initially was struck by Huo Yuhao kills, stays behind not only one 700,000 years cultivate for Soul Nucleus, small one eye. That one eye is in itself the vertical eye shape. It is not the ornaments, but is Soul Bone that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler leaves behind. Unprecedented Soul Bone, External Soul Bone. Evil Eye!

This Evil Eye, normally, does not only have humanity to absorb, one is because implication Spiritual Power was extremely huge, another reason is because it is vertical eye, it cannot even say that is Soul Bone. But is a strange energy combining way. Above Soul Bone.

And storage. Is purest Spiritual Power, as well as some memories of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler about own ability.

It when the choice seizes abandons Huo Yuhao, actually has also paid the huge price, after all the main body did not have, he impossible to inject in Soul Ring to fuse with Huo Yuhao all strengths. In this case, he kept in Soul Ability this part this small one eye.

But who knows that seizes the shed to be defeated, controlling force that in this one eye he kept naturally vanished. Huo Yuhao in the final moment, the use fuses in this Evil Eye situation, lets own Spiritual Power big eruption. Thus promoted Absolute the mind controlling force, had just the process of this fusion., The fusion is not so impossible to be completed.

After the fusion is completed, he rested for a long time, fully restored. Then, helping the Tang Wutong process, took his Spiritual Power to cultivate, in addition the controlling force, he was Tang Wutong that Evil Eye, no, should say that was Eye of Asura is right.

......

Hears the Di Tian surprised sound, in the mind to recall initially cultivated the difficulty of third Soul Nucleus, in the Huo Yuhao heart sighed. His success, has very big relations with the luck. If no Dragon Emperor Douluo huge Soul Power, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Soul Ring and that one eye, he is the basic opportunity does not have.

Only then has attempted truly, can know that the condensation of this third Soul Nucleus is difficult.

He is unprecedented first, Tang Wutong, although is second, but actually in his empirical base, and is helped to complete by him completely. Naturally, but must establish, under their Martial Soul Fusion 100% premises. Let Huo Yuhao help another person complete third Soul Nucleus again, that is also absolutely the impossible matter.

In the Soul Power total quantity, Huo Yuhao and compared with Beast God Di Tian, has the archery target disparity eventually, but, during collision. He actually relies on powerful Soul Power that three big Soul Nucleus fusions are producing, making Di Tian be also surprised, because, in the nature, Di Tian has actually lost to Huo Yuhao. Under is in inverse proportion, their first collision, unexpectedly is, shares half and half!

The gap by that black hole, remote looks, even if their cultivating is, does not dare to approach that black hole at this time. The strength of swallowing that transmits was really too fearful. Phenomenon that is the space completely torn into shreds. Once were involved, is irreversible. Also is impossible to know in advance where will be transmitted to goes.

The Huo Yuhao look moves suddenly, the body shifts suddenly like lightning.

Because in the space has the place of such huge to shatter, no one can utilize Space Power at this time. Therefore, can only rely on own speed.

He moves, Beast God follows closely to move, shifts, without doubt must go round that to shatter space.

The black hole closes gradually, but actually knows in the mind consciousness of Huo Yuhao and Di Tian that in that region, the space broke to pieces completely one piece by piece, wanted to heal completely, but also required very long time.

Hundred li (0.5km), they have the tacit understanding in a flash extremely almost simultaneously stopped. Eye of Destiny on Huo Yuhao forehead opens, the right hand toward Di Tian one finger, on oneself does not see Soul Ring to appear, above the Di Tian top of the head, left a whirlpool and Skeleton Skull.

Chaotic Mind and mind are weak.

The Di Tian corners of the mouth place reveals one to sneer, “useless, this grade of Soul Ability for me, simply does not have any function. Even if your Spiritual Power high is not again good. Only if you can achieve to dominate above me another degree. Our Dragon Clan, immunity most mind attacked.”

At the same time was saying, he toward Huo Yuhao one finger, immediately, around the Huo Yuhao body, in a diameter kilometer range, looked like has also burst with joy generally, the purple air bubbles emerged out of thin air, the rapid scrap, changed into the innumerable purple raging waves again toward the central big dragon, was circling again shooting up to the sky.

The terrifying dark element will corrode the incisiveness of characteristics display.

However, that purple region has stopped quickly, gradually was turned into Bai Se (White Color) by the purple, glittering and translucent carving snowflake starts to fall gently from the peak piece by piece, then the purple whirlpool originally gradually is defeated and dispersed, changes into the innumerable snowflakes to scatter in all directions to flutter about.

Cold the extremely air, the temperature unexpectedly once more reduced, the entire sky has covered mist of misty white, but Huo Yuhao is hidden in this mist.

“Good. It seems like that you comprehended the Absolute Ice true meaning.”Di Tian was acclaiming nod . The right hand wields, naturally disperses to his front snowflake, the right hand that he lifts has not taken back, but had the change, the joint rapidly becomes thick, then scales appear, changed into dragon claw impressively.

The Dragon God claw, once deterred many colleagues the Dragon God claw, Beast God Di Tian unexpectedly in this fights with Huo Yuhao, from the beginning prepared to use?

Dragon God claw, although did not have to attack, but in the world, actually as if gushed out a huge dignity beyond description, all snowflakes that Huo Yuhao evolves, in this flickers unexpectedly is simultaneously to shatter, changes into the powder powder, vanishes instantaneously does not see, he also reveals the personal appearance from that snow fog. Body slight shakes.

The Dragon God claw remote to Huo Yuhao, the Di Tian complexion also becomes dignified, in him behind, huge Black Dragon light shadow appears slowly, but above this Black Dragon light shadow, but also one group of seven color rays are glittering faintly.

Di Tian of this condition, Huo Yuhao is unprecedented, he only thought the great strength that is unable to contend with, is fettering own body and soul, the pressure is increasing unceasingly, as if must grind her thoroughly general.

Dragon God claw, although replies on the Dragon God strength, but this actually initially Dragon God truly left Di Tian. Also is relying on the strength of Dragon God claw, Di Tian can break through the bottleneck repeatedly, and deterrent many colleagues, become in the beast the god.

This is not the Gods strength, absolutely has actually surmounted the Limit Douluo level, half god!

The Huo Yuhao biggest problem is, he has not thought that the fight just started, after both sides slightly have also probed one next, Beast God will use the most ultimate strength. In contact that in this just started, he knows that he lost, has lost to the experience and paradox of Beast God.

In his heart, the status that Beast God Di Tian kept aloof affected his judgment. Beast God in the true fight, has not shown any a wee bit arrogance unexpectedly, instead is directly own strength most direct shows, with the most formidable ability, crush attacks to Huo Yuhao, for does not give him the cushion the opportunity.

This feeling appears in the Huo Yuhao heart very strange, he frequently had also done this, will not make the match the strongest strength display, will solve the match, this without doubt will be when any fight will be the best means.

But now, this situation falls on oneself, but was not that comfortable.

Huge oppression strength, making the entire sky as if twist, near the Huo Yuhao ear, was reverberating the low and deep dragon roar sound. That dragon roar sound is extremely dignified, dignified frightening mind.

The Dragon God claw of Di Tian the turning golden color bit by bit, in his double pupil, was actually burning seven color rays flame.( Not

Ends being continued

~^~) 1052



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-619-part-2





Volume 13

#619 - Three Spirits Nucleus!


Wipes the light happy expression to reappear in the Di Tian corners of the mouth place, cannot think that young people. In fact, when you dare to come to challenge me, I you have regarded the entire life archenemy. mind that if has not gone all out, do I possibly live the present?

Di Tian originally, is vertically and horizontally invincible, truly is extremely arrogant. However, before soon, receives Evil Soul Master to attack that time, he was injured, although is not serious, and completed has instead killed, but that time, has made the profound impression on him. Also reminded him, now the strength of humanity, might threaten him.

Therefore, when today he felt when Huo Yuhao actually had unprecedented third Soul Nucleus, he without hesitation launched the most formidable attack.

Although Di Tian does not know that what degree the third Soul Nucleus prestige can be, but, don't forget, he grasped the Dual Soul Nucleus time, at least was Huo Yuhao several hundred thousand times, didn't he also possibly have a point to realize from experience regarding third Soul Nucleus? Therefore, he does not make Huo Yuhao display the complete strength, comes up, used the most formidable strength.

The Dragon God claw, this itself does not belong to it, but dies from caring for of Dragon God. The strength of this half god frightened to compare it to want the formidable match innumerably. Helps it become one generation of Beast God.

But now, this strength uses once more, immediately suppressed Huo Yuhao completely.

Huo Yuhao halo twinkle, is fluctuating unceasingly, in the Beast God Di Tian eye, he as if indistinctly saw that the Huo Yuhao three Soul Nucleus rays are sparkling unceasingly. Each sparkle, his Soul Power outward overflows by the stance of rushing.

But, is this also useful? Even if three Soul Nucleus, that also belongs to the strength of humanity, as before and Gods strength has the disparity that is unable to overstep, regarding this point, Di Tian was really too clearly.

The Huo Yuhao look also becomes ice-cold gets up, in him behind, light shadow of spirit flashes through unceasingly, but each twinkle was maintains very brief time to carry on the replace.

He cannot feel Di Tian energy change, but Di Tian can actually feel him as if in using various Soul Power, tries to work loose from this fetter.

The Dragon God claw of Di Tian turned into the golden color completely, but in claw sharp position, is glittering seven colored halos.

“Useless, did not use in attempting the struggling money, in the face of the strength of half god, you can do, only then Soul Power exhausted gradually. You could rest assured that I will not kill you, I must carry on the complete plan that I said a moment ago. After your Soul Power consumption completely, I will lead you to return to Star Dou Forest.”

Huo Yuhao vision tranquil looks at Di Tian, Soul Power fluctuation was weaken suddenly. Him one is weaken, the seven color rays on Di Tian Dragon God claw greatly are immediately bright, the entire sky fiercely twisted. Body as if collected tightening of Huo Yuhao inward, has possibility to shatter anytime.

Di Tian has gawked staring, in his opinion, a powerhouse of Limit Douluo rank, should so not be easy to collapse!

But also in next quarter, suddenly, together ices the blue ray to dodge to pass. Front Di Tian only thinks. That ice blue color ray arrived in front of him.

“Bites!”In a crisp cry, the Dragon God claw lifted, has blocked the attack of that ice blue color ray.

But, that ice blue color ray is similar to the fresh flower blooms general, transforms the innumerable [say / way] ice blue color ray, Di Tian body complete coverage.

The method of half god level, is not only then Di Tian has.

Huo Yuhao was negligent, but, Di Tian also similarly had the issue. That is, he does not dare to kill Huo Yuhao. If a moment ago he, when uses the Dragon God claw, the direct all-out attack, Huo Yuhao likely will receive heavy wound. However, he actually wants to control.

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath, Morning Dew Knife! God of Emotion powerful weapons. Hasn't above never also belonged to the Gods strength? After Huo Yuhao has completed the condensation of third Soul Nucleus, can display finally completely these half god level prestige.

To his present level, Extreme Ice Battle God Armor too has not affected greatly, but Morning Dew Knife is different, even if he becomes Gods, Morning Dew Knife also same can be his efficient weapon.

Dragon Sacrifical Gathering Dancing Knife Technique.

Two forms after short several seconds, flash through suddenly, Di Tian breaks the space, appears beyond the kilometer, his Dragon God claw turned into seven completely colored. However, on him, has seven wounds. Each is not big, does not have the blood to flow out, but above is actually hoodwinking incorruptible.

May in fact, looks like the surface really seems that simple?

Huo Yuhao beyond the kilometer, some respites, Morning Dew Knife in hand is glittering slightly the blue tearful halo, the light mist and halo fuse to fluctuate mutually, extremely gods and ghosts.

Gaze that the Di Tian vision stagnates he, the complexion became the unprecedented dignity. Half god level, he actually also had half god level other strength.

Although Di Tian can judge, the round eruption, was huge regarding the consumption of Huo Yuhao. However, similarly, this round eruption, actually had taken a moment ago to him the injury. The Absolute Ice prestige energy, is attacking his body crazily.

No, not only Absolute Ice, has the mind thought of Huo Yuhao, as well as Space Power.

Space Power can melt, but the mind thought and Absolute Ice actually started to have the destructiveness. If not his Golden Eyed Black Dragon King formidable body and spirit. Perhaps already had the irreversible serious injury.

Has been injured, oneself were injured unexpectedly once again.

The Dragon God claw of Di Tian lifts slowly, suddenly, he raises head to the day, low and deep dragon roar phonochemical for innumerable strange voice resonances, huge Black Dragon light shadow explodes suddenly, changes into the innumerable black mist to emerge to that seven color dragon light shadow.

Immediately, seven colors brilliant Sheng, exaggerated the Di Tian form seven colored. The Dragon God claw makes the movement that empty stresses in the Huo Yuhao direction. Huge dragon claw emerges out of thin air immediately. Grasps suddenly toward Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao both hands grip tightly Morning Dew Knife, deeply inspires suddenly, around the body, strong Bing Wu (ice mist) fluctuates at an exceptional pace, changes into huge Bing Wu (ice mist) aura.

Morning Dew Knife lifts up high excessively, in this flickers, the Huo Yuhao whole person became has filled with the sacred aura. The sacred thought to the person a sense of reality beyond description, as if in this flash, he completely has merged into one organic whole with Morning Dew Knife.

His facial expression actually becomes gentle, Bing Wu (ice mist) closes up, Huo Yuhao vanished. Displaces, is actually together the slender form.

That is not Ice Emperor or Snow Emperor, is not Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong in Goddess of Light that can display together. But ices blue form together.

This form has hundred meters high fully, the whole body lends the light Bing Wu (ice mist) aura, the face is not seeing clearly, can only see that she wears the ice blue long skirt.

“Yeah”a deep sigh resounds.

One group of ice blue mist, blow out from the position of her forehead, happen to welcomed the Dragon God claw.

Seven color light shadow that the Dragon God claw transforms from the sky stagnated unexpectedly instantaneously, and changes into the ice blue color.

Di Tian one dull, what ability is this? This has dominated the level above Absolute Ice! The strength of Dragon God claw, during the freeze of that ice blue color mist, is consuming unexpectedly at an exceptional pace.

He does not certainly know that this is Huo Yuhao has never used ninth Soul Ability, Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion ninth Soul Ability.

When his cultivating to promote nine rings, Huo Yuhao thinks that he obtained ninth Soul Ability to be OK from Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) there directly. However, at that time had actually had variation. Ninth Soul Ability has not appeared directly, but had the ambiguous condition, looks like one group of dense fog, at that time his ninth Soul Ring, although is the red, but Huo Yuhao does not know that actually own Soul Ability is anything.

Until Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor the Spiritual Consciousness combustion, dissolves with him after one completely. This ninth Soul Ability appears.

100,000 years of Soul Ring, ninth Soul Ability has certainly two. But these two Soul Ability are not any spirit, but is the strengths of four big Ice Attribute spirits has, and unified the Morning Dew Knife strength. Changes into Absolute Ice two big ultimate Soul Ability.

At this time, Huo Yuhao uses, is one of them, takes Morning Dew Knife as to direct, strong capability that can display.

This Soul Ability, Huo Yuhao gives a name for it, is called: Ice and Snow Goddess Breath!

“Explodes!”Huo Yuhao ice-cold results in the sound from the sky to resound. The Di Tian body shakes suddenly, a strong black halo erupts from his within the body. For all this, has remembered a series of explosive sounds on him. Before that is, after Absolute Ice enters body freeze, by characteristics of Ice Explosion Technique detonation.

Was frozen the ice blue Dragon God claw to start to shiver, Ice and Snow Goddess Breath after is Huo Yuhao Soul Ability, does not ice the strength of Xue Nu god truly. But Dragon God claw of Di Tian inspiring, approached in the Dragon God prestige fully infinitely can.

At this moment, Huo Yuhao moved suddenly, he does not enter instead draws back, during the personal appearance twinkles, the person arrived at that freeze Dragon God claw front. A palm strikes directly above that Dragon God claw.

“Pū”in dull thumping sound sound, the Di Tian body of distant place has shaken shaking, because of inspiring of Ice Explosion Technique, making him unable to control to the Dragon God claw immediately, or is intercepts Huo Yuhao. Only can see that this palm pats.

The next quarter, the Di Tian pupil contracts suddenly, because his surprised discovery, oneself and relation of Dragon God claw energy, unexpectedly stiffly shut off.

This did Huo Yuhao, actually have so the strength?

Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion ninth Soul Ability, second of two big ultimate abilities, Absolute Zero! In addition in Snow Emperor Three Ultimate, Emperor's Palm, Great Coldness Snow.

Reinforces Ice and Snow Goddess Breath by Absolute Zero, pours into again Absolute Zero by Great Coldness Snow. The terrifying ultra-low temperature, the Morning Dew Knife Gods strength, bursts out completely, finally blocked Di Tian this to kill struck. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-619-part-3





Volume 13

#620 - Little Huo Throwing Knife


The Huo Yuhao complexion is somewhat pale, a series of eruptions, let the three big Soul Nucleus crazy revolutions of his within the body. Do not look at these as if easily, may in fact, he consume over 50% Soul Power. This after he becomes Limit Douluo, has never had situation.

“Good!”Di Tian gives a loud shout. One rumbles suddenly void, this time, is the left fist.

A thought of Wei ice world bursts out immediately, Huo Yuhao behind presents huge Black Dragon, opens mouth, swallows in which his body.

Di Tian rips open the space once again, changes into the silver light to vanish together does not see.

The huge fetter and corrosion strength of corrode inward, but under the function of Absolute Zero, instantaneously was frozen.

When Huo Yuhao wants to break this Dragon Head, suddenly, the intention moves, whole person body suddenly half revolution. Seven color rays passed over gently and swiftly from his side together instantaneously.

Huo Yuhao only thought that a half body hemp, the strength of that terror is leading his body fierce revolving unexpectedly, the Absolute Zero ultra-low temperature cannot affect that attack unexpectedly.

In this flash, Huo Yuhao finally truly felt the prestige of Dragon God claw to be able.

In the Dragon God claw, seems having one absolute strength, extremely terrifying strength. In this strength, but also mixes with more terrorist Yuan Suwit to be able.

What Huo Yuhao excels is the ice, but in this Dragon God claw, implication is actually nearly entire attribute strength.

Water, fire, earth, wind, Light, darkness and space, the element fluctuation also appears, and fully erupts by the extremely chaotic stance.

This strikes, Di Tian pursue is not the strength, but is the speed. The speed was really too quick, utilized Absolute the fusion of Space Power and Power of Darkness. Moreover happen to just consumed in Huo Yuhao greatly slightly has the flash of relaxation. Without locking, has not forewarned, Huo Yuhao cannot fend eventually completely.

The half body lulled, the Huo Yuhao within the body three big Soul Nucleus full plays, resisted that terror finally reluctantly the strength of Dragon God.

Swallows his Dragon Head to change into the powder powder to scatter in all directions to flutter about, Huo Yuhao one step steps forward, drills into the space crack, shunt Di Tian following attack.

The space twinkle, they continuously appear, collides unceasingly. Rays, from the sky glitter. Each collision instantaneously separates.

Looks to the sky from Star Dou Forest that sees, is sky of piece of complete distortion, the color of sky also in unceasing fluctuation, suddenly golden color, suddenly black, suddenly seven color ray twinkles. Although is separated by ten thousand meters, actually as before suppressed Soul Beast in entire Star Dou Forest do not dare to move slightly.

In central area.

Jade Swan, Myriad Monster King, Bear Ruler and Scarlet King, four Great Ferocious Beasts gather, in the eye is revealing the different looks.

Dark Gold Terror Claw unceasing popping of Bear Ruler takes back again, in eye ominous glittering.

Myriad Monster King is an appearance looking pensive.

Scarlet King and Jade Woman, what are more is the worry.

After is separated by ten thousand meters, they are formidable Ferocious Beasts, although as before suppressed fierce, but is also insufficient unable to move.

Scarlet King low and deep was roaring, “was actually, really had the so formidable strength, can spell to fight such with Beast God?”

In the Jade Woman eye the ray twinkle, “probably is a humanity. Does not know that is. Di Tian lift-off time I discovered that then saw indistinctly he and a humanity lifted off.”

“Is impossible. How to have the strength of humanity to be able with the Di Tian direction ratio?”Appearance that a Scarlet King face does not believe.

Bear Ruler hey said with a smile: “Can be that is only old Evil Eye to come?”

Myriad Monster King ill-humored [say / way]: “Thinks to be good? Evil Emperor is impossible to come, he cannot take care of oneself now, immediately must face Great Tribulation. Only if he breaks through to 800,000 years of boundary successfully, has the possibility of challenge.”

Bear Ruler anger snort|hum, “that he, if broke through?”

Myriad Monster King said: “Talks nonsense......”it just now to say these two characters, suddenly, the whole body shakes, four Great Ferocious Beasts, simultaneously look up to airborne, in the eye revealed color with amazement.

Sky of distortion suddenly becomes clear, unusual brilliance beyond description dodges to pass together.

“Really is Evil Emperor?”Jade Swan loses one's voice to say.

Myriad Monster King dumbfounded [say / way]: “That is, that is, Space-Time Ray?”

The upper air, turned into grotesque and gaudy world. On the Huo Yuhao forehead, Eye of Asura is glittering the profound and terrifying ray, in that flash, it as if lives.

Not far away, the body of Di Tian as if likely is slowing down the movement general, is moving slowly. The surrounding all time and spaces, in this flicker as if completely have stagnated.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power, bursts out just like the blowout generally outward, the body surface of Di Tian human form, was reappearing rapidly scales.

Just presented time, these black scales seemed are full of the gloss, but was quick, these gloss declined, became dim, then fell.

This time Di Tian, in the look has been full of the inconceivable color, looks at Huo Yuhao, body that even he shocks is still shivering.

“When, spatial, light! You, how can you display Space-Time Ray?”Di Tian delay looks at Huo Yuhao.

Continually collides when them, displays the half god level ability respectively, various Dragon God claw and Morning Dew Knife show it can, Di Tian strikes once more hit Huo Yuhao, is blocked by Absolute Zero that on him sends out. But, Di Tian saw dark blue that in Huo Yuhao Eye of Asura sends out.

In his eye pupil deep place, together dark blue ray suddenly suddenly to launch.

When this dark blue ray appears, Di Tian that the time as if static, has been preparing to pursue, in this flickers is imprisoned unexpectedly completely in the midair. Surrounding all spaces, at an exceptional pace in compressing, the dark blue ray seems like very slow is moving, in process that but, moves in it, the sky turned into the dark blue, the earth turned into the dark blue, all, in that flash, as if turned into the dark blue.

Space-Time Ray!

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler ultimate deep meaning. Initially, it was relying on this formidable ability, can escape from the Di Tian hand ascends to heaven.

This is came from in Spiritual Source Power of Space-Time! Power of Space-Time can eliminate all living thing Spiritual Source, making its Spiritual Source weaken instantaneously.

Initially, Beast God Di Tian, although heavy wound Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, but Di Tian itself, because also this Space-Time Ray, recuperated the millenniums to restore in peak condition, obviously this Space-Time Ray was formidable.

But this time, Space-Time Ray appears again, appears on Huo Yuhao unexpectedly, what is more fearful, Di Tian can also feel clearly that releases Space-Time Ray that from Huo Yuhao, was unexpectedly more formidable than initially Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler. Because in this Space-Time Ray, the level of mind thought that wins that time.

Spiritual Power of half god level, this clearly is Spiritual Power of half deep level! His mind Soul Nucleus, has achieved half god level that the 700,000 years have not practiced unexpectedly. Originally, his strength, not only that handle blade is half god!

Di Tian understood, he understood suddenly, can have the Space-Time Ray strength, this can only prove an issue, before coming to look for itself, Huo Yuhao looked for Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, and that old match, changed into his Soul Ring.

No wonder and no wonder he so has confidence. Yes! Three Soul Nucleus and half god level mind Soul Nucleus, add the first half god level again Morning Dew Knife, Absolute Zero, Ice and Snow Goddess Breath. Can he not grasp?

The double pupil of Di Tian turned into seven at this time completely colored, he is stimulating to movement the Dragon God claw to take to his strength fully, can not let own Spiritual Source reluctantly in Space-Time Ray senile, collapse.

Also, at this moment, he saw a handle quiet blue ray in the Huo Yuhao hand, that ray is not powerful, but clamps in his fingertip. However, the flash when this gloomily blue colored light glow presents, wipes desperately, appeared in the Di Tian eye pupil deep place.

The double pupil of Huo Yuhao, in this moment, like the sea, next one flickers profoundly, he has closed the double pupil, even links Eye of Asura also to close. In the hand that quiet blue ray suddenly is powerful, even has substituted for the beforehand Space-Time Ray halo.

Was restrained by Space-Time Ray, in this moment, Di Tian is incapable of preventing Huo Yuhao radically, but this time Huo Yuhao, likely has actually merged into one organic whole with the world.

Suddenly, his arm wields, that group of blue glow collect instantaneously, a handle is glittering and translucent carving, carves the blue knife lightning flash that becomes just like the crystal, from the sky draws the Absolute blue ray, the instantaneous flash passes together.

The Di Tian look disastrous incident, he noticed that is that overlapping space wall bonds passes through instantaneously, this blade, has concentrated the Huo Yuhao complete vigor, is the work of perfect peak. More fearful, is that handle knife, above, Di Tian also felt half god level aura similarly.

Has not looked at that handle knife again, because knows perfectly well not to evade. Lowered the head, he stares to the ground, looks the direction that one raise, in the look, full is the attachment with does not abandon. Has an unwillingness beyond description.

Dragon God, can't I complete you to give my duty eventually? Wipes bitterly and astringently, appears in the Di Tian corners of the mouth place, perhaps, this is also the extrication.

The body shakes gently, the next quarter, Di Tian thought one flew. Like that handle throwing knife that it forward flight comes, under that impulse beyond description leads, his body, unceasing flying upwards backward, across overlapping space. Another world, as if has been waving to him.

In the ground, four Great Ferocious Beasts also saw this, their vision also similar delay.

That has ruled the Star Dou Forest several hundred thousand years, becomes Beast God, present age first Soul Beast can Di Tian, such depart, really?

At this time, airborne did not have the grotesque and gaudy impediment, Jade Swan Jade Woman, saw clearly the appearance of person of that blade.

Sought the collection and recommendation for the new book, the new book day hot main road, the week click list first, was very good to look. Moreover ** will get up! 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-620-part-1





Volume 13

#620 - Little Huo Throwing Knife


Huo Yuhao, was that has created Huo Yuhao of Spirit Transferring Pagoda organization unexpectedly.

Why, why can be he, why he must kill Di Tian. Did his strength, when become so formidable?

In the Jade Woman look, has filled puzzled, but has also filled sorrowfully.

Di Tian......

Sent out that blade, Huo Yuhao same place was also staying for several seconds, caught one's breath.

Goddess of Mercy Tear Goddess of Mercy tears. The hidden weapon technique of Tang Sect most top. Has not condensed the Goddess of Mercy tears, because the ordinary Goddess of Mercy tears are impossible to rout Di Tian. What he uses is the ghost axe finger of God quiet blue flame, carves Dragon Kefeng a blade to be cold, Demonic Engraving God Knife! God of Emotion Rong Nianbing gives his second handle blade.

This pierced feeling, but also never has. Several hundred thousand years of experience, changes into tip, reverberates in the chest unceasingly, making Di Tian completely immerse to recall. In this moment, anything seemed to be unimportant, all that all has occurred.

When childhood suffers caring for of Dragon God, Dragon God falls from the sky, changes into two Dragon King, then Dragon Clan moves toward declining, to the present, all, unceasingly has been reappearing in his mind.

The vitality is passing quietly, Di Tian closes one's eyes, the feeling of extrication he suddenly thinks special relaxation. Like this finished, although fills to regret, but also after all finished!

“Beast God.”The Huo Yuhao sound actually broke in the Di Tian mind at this time, changed into a dense chill in the air, awakened from own immersion him.

The Di Tian opening eyes pupil, he has gawked immediately staring, because he feels, although own vitality is passing, the speed of but passing seems not fast.

How can?

Di Tian subconscious looks to oneself that sees, is one side of the right chest the pierced wound.

This and this clearly are not the fatal injuries!

To this level, everyone knows. If wants to be fatal the match, attacks the forehead to be most appropriate. But. Why Huo Yuhao actually does not know, attack judgment his forehead. This cannot imagine simply. This injury, although that terrifying blade intends to oneself within the body able to move unhindered, Space-Time Ray is also harming own body, but, oneself completely are capable of continue counter-attack!

Di Tian does not certainly think that Huo Yuhao let slip, that is at all the impossible matter.

“Why?”Di Tian doubts looks at Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao smiles, “I must defeat you, actually do not kill you. Did you forget? I have sent the pledge. Did not kill any Soul Beast on own initiative.”

Di Tian coldly snorted, “that Evil Emperor how?”

Huo Yuhao somewhat helpless [say / way]: “That is because it wants to kill me, I have to counter-attack.”

On the Di Tian face reveals a bitterness and astringency, “good to counter-attack. You won.”

Huo Yuhao nodded, in this flickers, the facial expression of his whole person as if stretches, to Di Tian slight bow, “Beast God, said goodbye. Perhaps, this time leaves. Opportunity that we again have not met. However, I must thank you, you have rescued my life. Moreover, some comprehensions that if has not obtained on you, I probably have not had today's strength. Said goodbye, treasured.”

Spoke these words, Huo Yuhao beckoned with the hand to Beast God Di Tian, one step steps forward, escaped into the space, vanishes does not see.

Looks back that he is departing, Di Tian corners of the mouth place bitter and astringent suddenly became stronger several points. Because he suddenly discovered. Before the feeling of that extrication was very good. Without extrication, means. Own responsibility had not ended.

Falls gently slowly, returns to Star Dou.

Four Great Ferocious Beasts are also glassy-eyed looks at Di Tian. They do not understand before, actually in airborne what happened, the Di Tian injury is heavy, but aura actually as before such as deep pool like prison.

In the original conscience Bear Ruler of some ideas, had lowered the head immediately, feared that Di Tian discovers anything.

Di Tian beckoned with the hand to them, arrives by Lake of Life without consulting anybody.

After four Great Ferocious Beasts look at each other in blank dismay, quietly retreat.

“He does not kill me, he he, he does not kill me.”The expression on Di Tian face suddenly becomes rich, cries and smile suddenly suddenly.

At this time, suddenly, the light silver halo from all directions surged.

“He does not kill you, even if he must kill you, you were impossible dead. Your responsibility also needs to persevere.”The dignified sound resounds.

Di Tian awakens immediately, on one knee knees down.

“Because he has not killed intent, I have not gotten rid, otherwise, even if finished closing up ahead of time, I will also cut to kill him.”

Di Tian as if returned to normal, cannot bear ask: “But, on the Lord, why doesn't leave behind him? On him, load bearing Power of Destiny! That is Power of Destiny that our Star Dou Forest most needs. You also need.”

That sound said mystically lightly: “Power of Destiny only belongs to Douluo Continent, anybody impossible to carry off it. He must leave this world person, Power of Destiny can naturally return. Di Tian, I know that you are very alone. These years, were laborious you.”

“On Lord.”Di Tian kneels to bend down in the place.

“Endures patiently again for ten thousand years, ten thousand years, I then go out again, to that time, my internal injury completely will have made up. When I am born, you can roam through the world.”

“Yes, thanks on main.”

Silver light restraining, all return normally.

Ten thousand years, regarding humanity, are the incomparably long years, but, regarding had 800,000 years cultivate for Di Tian, are actually not anything. Ten thousand years, had an accurate deadline finally.

Wipes the excited color cannot help but to reappear on the Di Tian face, he is excited.

......

Silver glittering, Huo Yuhao baseless.

On this day, this place, in this moment, completely became seems to be different.

Huo Yuhao as if can the clear feeling, own spiritual sea seethe with excitement and sublimate, six big spirits are cheering.

He can feel, Soul Power of oneself within the body is transforming, one special makings, appears from him gradually.

Di Tian for him, is a mountain, is a fetter.

When this fetter is unable to become his hobbling again, the final bottleneck already opened.

Looks up the day, Huo Yuhao stretches out the arms, this time he, only thinks in the world, all start become different, his soul, seems ascending toward another world.

“You have succeeded, congratulates you, Yuhao.”The gentle sound resounds. Light golden halo drops from the clouds, condenses the forming in front of Huo Yuhao.

Rong Nianbing is original that dresses up as before, on the face is having the smiles of some feelings. He is clearest, at present this youth can arrive at present this step, is what kind is not easy! Tribulation that he undergoes, initially had experienced it is really is much more difficult.

“Teacher.”Huo Yuhao respectful has done obeisance to Rong Nianbing. In this moment, he thought that he has the qualifications to call these two characters truly.

Rong Nianbing shows a faint smile, said: “Said that I am not suitable to make your Teacher, your Teacher, has someone else. I happen to present, picked up a bargain. If not I, perhaps you have not needed to withstand these many misery. But how regardless to say that you finally were after the bitter comes the sweet. Did you prepare for?”

“Yes.”Nod of Huo Yuhao makes an effort. He prepared certainly, he must look for the beloved wife! At this time, what did not have to prevent his heart, flies toward that world, but in that world, Wutong, you fortunately?

Rong Nianbing nodded, the expression on face also becomes dignified, sinking sound track: “My Gods, named God of Emotion. The mood has the laughter, anger, sorrow and happiness, the world has the vicissitudes of life. The mood has well, to have the badness, you must control, is this Power of Emotion. Now something can also tell you.”

Douluo Continent that “you are, is planet, in addition, on this world, existences of many planet. On these planet, other human living thing, the energy of specific name worrying strength exists. Read the strength to ascend, gradually formed a special place. This place dominates above planet, but is closely linked with planet, looks like a piece opens alone, but space. Because this space is humanity opens, therefore, generally, only allows humanity to enter. This place, is called, God Realm.”

“God Realm holds, is these in each planet, own strength breaks the planet limit, is unable again by the person who the planet seal prevents. This is Gods that you said that I am so, that Tang Wutong father is also so.”

“Said accurately that I do not belong to your this planet, does not belong to Douluo Continent. But the Tang Wutong father belongs to here . Moreover, his name you should hear. He called: Tang San.”

Hears Tang San these two characters, Huo Yuhao whole body big change, how regardless of he has not thought that oneself deeply have been loving woman, can be the Tang Sect ancestor unexpectedly and unexpectedly, established Tang Sect the female of Tang San.

Looks at the Huo Yuhao dumbfounded appearance, Rong Nianbing shows a faint smile, said: “Tang San came from Douluo Continent, therefore has also paid attention in Douluo Continent. Tang Wutong is his daughter, Tang San loves to her extremely, therefore allows her to come in Douluo Continent to gain experience.”

“God cannot interfere human world, any planet is so. Therefore, even if Tang San, can only send in Continent own daughter, and seal she belonged to the memory of god. Then had among you meet. From beginning to end, Tang San has been observing you, will therefore have Tang Wutong seal. His has also played edge ball, because Tang Wutong was his daughter, the body was having a divine nature, therefore he can influence subtly affected Tang Wutong through some methods. Thus affects you.”

Asked the monthly ticket for peerless Tang Sect finally. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-620-part-2





Volume 13

#620 - Little Huo Throwing Knife


“You undergo that many tribulations, including part is actually Tang San representative God Realm to your inspection, if not so, you do not need to experience these many. Still remembers Heaven and Earth Sentiment Query Valley? There is so. But also that time, I also see all that in Heaven and Earth Sentiment Query Valley had, has approved your existence. But at that time, Tang San actually experienced something in God Realm, temporarily does not have the leisure to continue to pay attention to you. I can afterward go to enter, making you comply, to inherit the position of my god place.”

“Therefore, you do not need to blame him, without him to your tempering, you are impossible to have today, my this Teacher, instead was inferior that he comes importantly to you.”

Huo Yuhao dull is listening to narration of Rong Nianbing, the past all were pacing back and forth in the mind unceasingly, the place that some could not think through, at this moment, gradually dredged.

No wonder, initially in Heaven and Earth Sentiment Query Valley, oneself had encountered the attack of that golden form, that golden form that formidable.

No wonder, the Wutong body will have seal, keeping oneself from being intimate.

No wonder, after Wutong returns to that Clear Sky Sect, will vanish does not see.

The Clear Sky Sect legend, initially did not start from Tang Sect ancestor Tang San?

Originally, unexpectedly is so and unexpectedly is so! Wutong unexpectedly is the Tang San daughter, but oneself this future father-in-law Sir, suddenly has been testing himself.

Rong Nianbing temperate [say / way]: “In God Realm, the god also divides the different levels. And, God Realm most powerhouse has five people, they form God Realm committee, including two Godking, separately are God of Kindness and God of Evil, three big Law Enforcer, separately are God of Asura, God of Ruin and God of Life. Tang San is one of the three Law Enforcer, is God of Asura. Because two big Godking both go to some planet rebirth, experiences the world to change in every possible way. During two big Godking of new generation are also growing. Therefore, present Tang San, it can be said that God Realm most powerhouse, is the person of management God Realm. Besides God Realm committee, is first-level Gods, I am one of the first-level Gods, because Power of Emotion fluctuates similarly with two big Godking good and evil mind, wants to be stronger than general first-level Gods, but compared with Tang San, actually wants the inferior point.”

“Under first-level Gods, is second-level Gods and three Gods, God Realm patrols extremely hunting for wait / etc.. These people, compose God Realm together. Because the God Realm itself space is limited. Therefore, only then has the position of Gods, can enter God Realm. These practice the Absolute person in the world, must undergo the verification of God Realm committee, in having free time in the situation in position of Gods, awards him the position of Gods, can after he breaks through, rises into God Realm. At present you must face is so the situation.”

Here, Rong Nianbing stopped, he knows, all these that oneself said that Huo Yuhao also required the time to digest.

The Huo Yuhao look gradually becomes limpid, he was quite intelligent, listened to narration of Rong Nianbing, bright God Realm, gradually presents in his mind.

Originally, God Realm is one dominates above Douluo Continent, world of powerhouse!

“To understand?”The Rong Nianbing smile asked.

Huo Yuhao nodded.

Rong Nianbing said: “Reason that told you these, again gave you a choice the opportunity. I exploited the Tang San loopholes after all, I pay for you, is far from him being many. You can carry on now choose, if you are also willing to inherit the position of my Gods, naturally. If you do not want, chooses Tang San, does not have the issue. He looks forward to some people to help him undertake. I can tell him your meaning, believes that he will be very happy. Moreover, retrieves wife regarding you helpful.”

Huo Yuhao actually silently shook the head, “did not need to trouble you, I hope that can inherit the position of your Gods. The real men should keep one's word . Moreover, I cannot depend upon to flatter the father-in-law to retrieve Wutong. Such I will look down upon myself. Please give me God of Emotion the position of inheritance of Gods.”

On the Rong Nianbing face reveals a gratified color, “good. But I must remind your matter, the life of God Realm is very alone bored, even if my like this first-level Gods, cannot leave God Realm at will, impossible the place stay in any world of human beings too longer. Once enters in God Realm, only if position of inheritance Gods to appropriate candidate, otherwise cannot leave. I and Tang San want to inherit the position of Gods, is actually not willing to treat in God Realm, hopes that can roam through world, by our strengths, performs to go to the remote place to seek to have existences of other God Realm, even is many splendors.”

Huo Yuhao look not because of the Rong Nianbing words, but has vacillated, firm [say / way]: “I am willing to inherit the position of your Gods.”Regardless of pays what kind of price, he must seek for Tang Wutong, this point, will not change because of any other matters.

Rong Nianbing said: “Good, should tell you, I told you, since you want as before, you are very good, is very good.”

Both hands also lift, immediately, is centered on his body, the pale blue and scarlet red, two different color rays simultaneously ascend.

Huo Yuhao only thought Absolute Ice Soul Power of own within the body was inspired instantaneously, when this flash, formerly sent out Demonic Engraving God Knife that type the feeling of the world merging into one organic whole transmits once more.

The Rong Nianbing big hand wields, the surrounding scenery passes and fluctuates rapidly. In a flash, they as if arrived in the starry sky.

The Rong Nianbing behind ice blue and fiery red two color rays gush out from within the body unceasingly. Shines on Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao can feel at this time, only then sublimates, within the body three big Soul Nucleus fiercely are all revolving at the unprecedented terrifying speed, each operation, bursts out the huge Soul Power fluctuation.

Halos from the sky drift about, on the Huo Yuhao face is sending out the strange thought.

Star light drop from the clouds at this moment, falls on him unceasingly.

The surroundings is a grotesqueness and gaudiness, but in Huo Yuhao own mind world, the lifetime experience is flashing through rapidly.

From initially in the unfair treatment that White Tiger Duke's Estate suffered, arrived again afterward met Daydream Ice Silkworm, absorbed first 1 million years of Soul Ring. Afterward met Tang Wutong in Shrek Academy, this all, continuously appeared in his mind world, seemed only an instance, he read one his life.

Has not known how long, the Huo Yuhao opening eyes pupil, saw again, is be with smile on the face Rong Nianbing.

Four items of relative, Huo Yuhao eyeground deep place, are many have wiped the vicissitudes, are many a clear(ly) to have become aware. Within the body all strengths were being sublimated had the earth-shaking change.

Three Soul Nucleus melt gradually, within the body Absolute Ice, Spiritual Power and Space Power in instantaneously completely fuse in together, the brand-new strength appears.

spiritual sea turned into a purer golden color, Spiritual Consciousness transformed, he once felt the Divine Consciousness aura that had been to bloom from his spiritual sea on Holy Necromancer and Slumbering Calamity Elux outward. Moreover during sublimation of continuing.

Rong Nianbing both hands lift slowly, from his top of the head, a strange royal crown floating, this royal crown itself presents for the ice blue and fiery red two colors, but in the above place, has the strange imaginary color aura to fluctuate faintly.

As soon as it appears, Huo Yuhao only thought that own various mood were transferred completely, happy, anger and sorrow, happy, love, hatred and wickedness, seven emotions transformation.

Huo Yuhao Morning Dew Knife flies, from the sky changes into together the blue light, returns to Rong Nianbing on, seven handle blades, are representing similarly also seven mood.

Starts to inherit the position of Gods, Rong Nianbing must take back the most important strength.

Seven handle blades, separately are representing the water, fire, earth, wind, Light, darkness and space. This is the God of Emotion Rong Nianbing seven handle blades.

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife.

God of Flame Roar True Sun Knife.

The Wind of Freedom Gentle Hymn Proud Sky Knife.

Mother Earth Awakening Rhythm Longevity Knife.

Divine Mystery Hundred Transformation Hexagram Jade Pearl Knife.

Linking Heaven and Earth Dawn Holy Brilliance Knife.

Eternal Hell Curse Devil's Devouring Knife.

Seven handle peerless Divine Weapon, are sending out seven different brilliance, is representing seven handle different mood.

Suddenly, Morning Dew Knife starts, changes into ices blue light shadow together, shoots at the Huo Yuhao direction suddenly.

Huo Yuhao only thought that the whole body shakes, the blue light flashes through, one sad mood bursts out from own heart along with it, this is the sorrow, the sadness in seven emotions.

Is the scarlet red right noon time blade, just like the right noon time blade of kitchen knife shape, is bringing the blazing flame, broke through instantaneously.

The extreme anger appears, this is the anger!

Green light blade edge follows closely, but, that is representing wind proud Tiandao, The Wind of Freedom recites lightly, after anger, joyful being near body, this is happy.

Yellow calm long blade flashes through, the immortal blade, is representing the earth strength immortal blade. The yellow color halo integrates Huo Yuhao within the body, changes into the joyful aura, this is happy.

The silver ray bursts out, Divine Mystery Hundred Transformation six glow, Xuan Ji blade, wicked strength, but is actually not the simple wickedness, it is also a mood of repel.

Then is the curse of Eternal Hell, this is the true hatred, bites the demon blade, the black glow runs throughout, Huo Yuhao only thought that in the chest all negative mood transfer.

Finally, is that bright golden light, unequalled golden light enters from his top of the head, passes through instantaneously throughout, penetrates the entire body of Huo Yuhao completely.

Passes through the dawn of world, the Saint flash blade, the Light strength. In an instant, earth rejuvenation, all negative mood, finally by that love gable. Seven emotions, the true meaning of love.

The seven emotions run throughout, seven handle peerless god edges return side Rong Nianbing, on his face reveals one disappointed with not to abandon, but actually the big hand wields, that seven handle god edges change into play the ray, air-launched goes toward the star of distant place.

Some everybody once the familiar face soon will appear. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-620-part-3





Volume 13

#621 - Dai Mubai And Zhu Zhuqing


Nobody knows where their goals are, but in this flickers, they are actually escape into the space to vanish do not see.

Rong Nianbing arrives in front of Huo Yuhao, royal crown in the hand, has placed on him slowly.

In the Huo Yuhao eye pupil, the seven emotions glitter, finally, all belong to tranquilly, color of the shiny smooth, appears on him.

The royal crown integrates quietly, the seven emotions restrain.

Suddenly, a colored ray beyond description bursts out from Huo Yuhao instantaneously. His six big spirit 11 appear from within the body.

Daydream Ice Silkworm, Ice Emperor, Snow Emperor, Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass and Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) and Mermaid Princess Li Ya, six big spirits, appear successively in his side.

The seven emotions decompose instantaneously, on Snow Emperor, inherited the sorrowful mood, on Ice Emperor, inherited the mood of anger, but Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass inherited the happy mood, Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White), inherited the happy mood. Mermaid Princess Li Ya is wicked, but final Daydream Ice Silkworm, the whole body has actually covered bright golden light. This makes Huo Yuhao have earth-shaking change truly, and had future 1 million years of Soul Beast, inherits, strength that loves.

Six big spirits, inherited one mood separately.

Rong Nianbing brow micro wrinkle, “also misses one type. The hatred, do you want to inherit the hatred the strength?”

At this moment, on the Huo Yuhao forehead, vertical eye opens slowly, together black ray from surges, float before him, the aura of hatred rises suddenly instantaneously, the final seventh mood was continued by it, is not just that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler?

Although it is not one of the Huo Yuhao spirits, but the degree of it and Huo Yuhao union, actually absolutely does not compare any spirit to be bad.

Is feeling the surrounding all, Evil Emperor as if also understood anything, the intense hatred restrains gradually, finally changes into of diminished version, similarly as float as Huo Yuhao side, although on it is lending the hateful aura, but the look deep place, has actually belonged to tranquilly.

“Good.”Rong Nianbing nodded to Huo Yuhao. An intense white light erupts from him suddenly, and Huo Yuhao sweeps across in which completely.

Huo Yuhao with his seven big spirit, simultaneously closing one's eyes pupil. The seven emotions flow unceasingly, all, is being sublimated is changing.

How long has not known, when Huo Yuhao again opening eyes pupil, seven big spirits vanished to disappear, he discovered with amazement that he stands above a hill.

Around this hill, performing is the fog. The fog surges, in the air, full is various rich elements, is fluctuating marvelously.

The mood transformation, Huo Yuhao lowers the head to have a look at itself.

All as if have not changed, is only, in own mind, seemed to be many anything.

Suddenly, the surrounding fog turned into the golden color, gentle golden color. To person a strange sense of reality.

Forms appear slowly from fog, flies in the Huo Yuhao direction.

Their looks are handsome, the attire is the plain elegant cream color, is only several time of breath, arrived in front of Huo Yuhao.

Altogether is 12 people, simultaneously respectful bends the waist to salute to Huo Yuhao.

“Has seen Sir God of Emotion.”Is a man said.

[Say / Way] of Huo Yuhao doubts: “Are you?”

The man said: “We are the God Realm god officers, beginning you God Realm, we are make you see Godking and Sir Law Enforcer.”

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Had the work.”Also comes it, then settles it. Words that Rong Nianbing spoke, he still clearly remembers, oneself that father-in-law Sir, is the Tang Sect ancestor, is God Realm Law Enforcer!

The hand signal that the god officer makes invitation respectfully, flies in the front, other god officers disperse in the both sides, on the face the manner is really respectful and prudent.

Huo Yuhao is only the thought moves, body is flutters to forward, after to turn into a god, all as if became different. Spiritual Power and Soul Power originally, had the earth-shaking change.

spiritual sea has been full of the strange golden color now, that idioplasm feeling, looks like another space. In, so long as the thought, all things can the nature formation.

This made Huo Yuhao remember Teacher Elux to leave own undead Demi-plane, at this time his spiritual sea looked like brand-new plane is ordinary, was not Demi-plane, but was true plane. But there, oneself is all control. Perhaps, that is the feeling of true Gods.

Present spiritual sea, should call the god sea to be right. But within the body is flowing golden Soul Power, should call mental power.

Now his mental power, can follow his thought change to transform the attribute, can control all elements in this God Realm space to fluctuate easily. Naturally, this attribute transformation limits to several that he had as before, but actually no longer divides each other, pure, moreover transforms along with the thought that extremely rapid.

The light fog dispels, the scenery also unceasingly is fluctuating at present, grotesque and gaudy, Huo Yuhao thought dispersing.

He discovered with amazement that this God Realm as if has not been separated from the category of person, has the earth as before, has the mountains and rivers. Where regardless, is having rich heaven and earth elemental energy, at least is on Douluo Continent dozens and over a hundred times. Even if and so on breath, the meditate practice on Douluo Continent be bigger than to own promotion.

However, in this strange world, as if dark one special strength is also fettering anything.

Regarding this, he must in the future gradual going sensation. After all, what Rong Nianbing introduced was only some foundations, but in God Realm of this length and breadth, its magical thing, has not known that had many.

Does not know how long to fly, front brightens suddenly, the surrounding golden color also became rich. The gentle halo just like mother's hand, is touching the exquisite flesh of fog gently, the illusory space has the exceptionally moving substantive feeling. Indistinct, in not far away, as if has a palatial palace, caresses to touch to be unreal and real in this gentle halo.

Form that static standing and waiting for a long time in the fog, is looking into the endless distance together, does not know that is looking at anything.

He has a Touwan water blue color long hair like a waterfall, has hung the under foot, if not his great personal appearance and broad shoulder, looked from behind merely that perhaps thinks he is a female.

On magnificent and expensive blue long gown as if there is wave to ripple, if carefully looked, look instantaneously that deep attracts deep blue, even the entire soul will be inhaled that is similar to the sea profound and endless blue color.

It seems in the 20-year-old handsome facial features has a pair of profound eye pupil, his look seems like the cavity, but actually likely is comprehensive, occasionally flashes through together purple aura, is the moving heart and soul. Will have the sense of reality that Fang magnificent and instantaneous life and death die out an instant.

A god officer directs Huo Yuhao to fly in front of him, stopped, respectful bows to salute, “Sir Sea God.”

“Um.”Sends the youth to turn around blue, looks to Huo Yuhao, the gentle pupil light actually becomes piece of ice-cold.

The god officers draw back quietly, leaves them the space.

When with previous time meets compares, this time sends the youth blue looks like dignity, particularly the pressure of that keeping aloof, some Huo Yuhao breath of suppression are impeded.

“You and hello, Sir Sea God.”Huo Yuhao some do not know how should call him, called the father-in-law directly, he feared to enrage the opposite party, that cannot call the name. Only can call with these god officers a moment ago.

Tang San looks at somewhat cramped and disturbed Huo Yuhao, light asking: “You inherited Rong Nianbing the position of Gods, starting today, you were one in God Realm. The God Realm rule is numerous, later the bright officer will teach you. You will have small space in God Realm, two Godking and other two Law Enforcer in respective practice, later at the god congresses, you will have to see their opportunities. So long as you obey the God Realm rule, other matters, God Realm committee does not interfere.”

“Comes the person.”The Tang San sinking sound shouted to clear the way.

light shadow appears side him together rapidly, that is a whole body puts on the man of golden long gown, the mental power fluctuation that the body sends out, obviously compared with beforehand these god officer formidable many, “Sir Law Enforcer.”

Tang San waved, said: “Brought God of Emotion of new promote to go to his residence.”

“Yes.”[gold/metal] Yishen the officer replied again respectfully.

Tang San coldly looked at Huo Yuhao one, turns around to flutter to go toward not far away that palace.

“Sir Sea God, please wait a moment.”In the Huo Yuhao heart is greatly anxious, hurries to shout one. He comes God Realm, the most important goal is to retrieve Tang Wutong! Sees with great difficulty own this father-in-law Sir, if has separated again, in this strange God Realm, how making him seek?

Tang San stops the footsteps, [say / way] that does not return to: “What matter do you have?”

Huo Yuhao has gripped the fist, even if under Tang San that powerful power and influence suppression, he also as before supports were saying: “Please let me see Wutong, I want to explain to her.”

“Dissolute!”Tang San sinking sound shouted to clear the way suddenly, then has turned around suddenly, on the face full is the anger, “did you harm my daughter to be insufficient? Is because knew you, she has eaten that many in the world of mortals painstakingly. Do you also want to see her?”

Huo Yuhao braces oneself saying: “Yes, all are my mistake, but, I only want to see her. Please give me an opportunity, Ok?”

Tang San sneers, looked by a [gold/metal] clothes god officer, [gold/metal] Yishen the officer is understanding, floating draws back, changes into golden light shadow to vanish does not see.

“To see Wutong? Ok.”The Tang San sinking sound said.

In Huo Yuhao heart one happy, when he sees clearly the expression on Tang San face, the joy actually instantaneously sank.

Really, Tang San continues saying: “So long as you can defeat me, can see her.”

New book day hot main road latest chapter already, ** will get up, welcome everybody to collect and recommend. Clicks on list first in the member.

Also, tonight announced that Magic Chef of Ice and Fire plays first batch of five to draw a prize-winning ticket Hainan You Shuyou list, everybody remembers that looks in the evening the chapter or today's prestige - platform announcement information.

Has to want with the book friends who I go to the Hainan free traveling, in participates in us playing carries on to draw. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-621-part-1





Volume 13

#621 - Dai Mubai And Zhu Zhuqing


Did Huo Yuhao stay? Defeats him? Defeats God Realm most formidable Law Enforcer? Even if were inherits Rong Nianbing of position of Gods to confess Tang San that was inferior to? This ten thousand years ago rises into God Realm Douluo Continent, becomes the Gods powerhouse? Moreover own future father-in-law, this and are this possible?

“How I and can I begin with you?”Huo Yuhao somewhat crabbed saying.

Tang San gives a calm smile, “that you leave.”

The Huo Yuhao forced smile said: “You are the Tang Sect ancestor, are God Realm Law Enforcer, do I possibly fight you? How also possibly to defeat you?”

Tang San coldly snorted, “now I am not Law Enforcer, is not the Tang Sect founder. I am only a daughter was bullied the father. You had said to Wutong how many times, will protect her, to protect her, doesn't make her receive a wee bit injuries? But, did you achieve? You in time and time again unceasing injures her, lets abyss that she falls into the pain. Your children had, but also entangles my daughter to do?”

“It is not such. Sir Sea God, you listened to me to say.”Huo Yuhao urgently said: “The child, I do not know the circumstances of the matter. I do not shirk the responsibility, is, this matter, I really not clear what's the matter Ah? I and I to the present, virgin!”Said the virgin two characters, on his face red, white.

Wipes the happy expression to dodge not to have from the Tang San face, but in front of illusory the light fog by him was actually covered, Huo Yuhao has not looked to say.

Tang San sound ice-cold, “you me told as before anything is useless, wants to see Wutong, has a road. Defeats me!”At the same time was saying, the Tang San big hand wields, strong air current moves, departs about several hundred meters to after the body of Huo Yuhao.

“Wutong and Wutong, I come, I am Yuhao! You where? You where!”Huo Yuhao is shouting suddenly. Yelled loudly that the palace toward distant place was shouting.

“Shut up!”The Tang San sinking sound shouted to clear the way.

Suddenly, surroundings scenery big change. Sea of clouds fairyland originally vanishes does not see, displaces. Is stretch of a big forest of cover, the surroundings all also turned into the green.

The call of Huo Yuhao stops, his surprised looks at the surrounding all, the present picture so is why familiar, as if returned to Star Dou Forest to be ordinary likely?

In this time, suddenly, a nondescriptive terrifying murderous intention front surface is throwing, the strength of this murderous aura. Just likes the essence is ordinary.

Huo Yuhao was towed by the internal combustion engine, looks in a not far away direction that sees with amazement, in that direction, the form is walking together gradually toward him.

This and are this that Tang Sect ancestor?

At this moment, Tang San in Huo Yuhao look, formerly had no longer filled air/Qi of immortal spirit Gods, his long hair and magnificent long gown, all turned into the blood red unexpectedly.

What is more fearful, with his vanguard. In his behind cover big forest, turned into the scarlet unexpectedly, strong murderous aura. Essence general attacks unceasingly to him, but the surrounding all plants, gradually wither in the face of this murderous intention, in him behind, turned into a piece of bloodshed, as if there is innumerable ghosts in calling out, even if on worst Evil Soul Master, Huo Yuhao has not felt has been to so strong tyrannical murderous aura.

How can like this? Isn't he God Realm Law Enforcer? Why now seems, likely is the devil is ordinary.

The Tang San whole body is rippling the blood red seems even somewhat viscous. His ice-cold sound reverberates in the entire space.

“Since you must court death, I help you. Is Law Enforcer. I have the right to handle all contrary Gods. I already wanted to massacre you, making my daughter escape that suffering since then. Cannot affect world of human beings concerned about God Realm the rule. Therefore had not begun. Now, since you came God Realm, that happen to delivers, I also want to you an opportunity, but you dare to shout loudly before me unexpectedly, today, wants you to be buried in this.”

At the same time was saying, the Tang San right hand wields, suddenly, in the surroundings ground, the innumerable leaves of grass increase instantaneously, change into sturdy vines, disturbs toward Huo Yuhao. Each vine presents for the blood red, inside as if faintly has the appearance of leaf vein, looks like the blood red big snake that live is simply ordinary.

Does he want to kill me? In Huo Yuhao heart panic-stricken, that murderous aura is not false, moreover is he has seen strongest murderous aura.

He is not willing to begin with the Wutong father, must protect oneself at this time!

Gentle golden light from Huo Yuhao bright, golden light changes, changes into the ice blue color, outward diffusion.

The extremely cold aura floods in the air immediately, that blood red vine bitter experience to extremely cold, the speed immediately became slow several points. The Huo Yuhao personal appearance dodges, flies toward the place above, avoids the entanglement of vine.

However, at this time, the body surrounding scenery once more changed, day originally, turned into the earth suddenly, but earth originally, actually turned into the sky. Huo Yuhao actually that is flying to grips on the ground.

Such aspect Huo Yuhao first meeting, the person falls to the ground, that blood red vine has twined instantaneously, his body fetter firmly. Although his Absolute Ice mental power can make these vines slow, but actually cannot affect the prestige energies of these vines truly.

After that vine twines his body, immediately braves sharp thorns, grips to his within the body. At Huo Yuhao that formidable body intensity, actually does not have the means to defend in front of this sharp thorn completely, the intense stabbing pain spreads over the whole body instantaneously.

However, Huo Yuhao had experienced the innumerable painful men, was more painful than hundred times of matters he to experience this. Therefore, although the severe pain made his whole body one tight, but also made his state of mind sober completely.

To look for Wutong, must live to be good first. Whatever, cannot die here.

A huge form appears behind Huo Yuhao, impressively Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White). A joyful thought also outward blooms from him along with it. The happiness of seven emotions.

These disturbance tight blood red vines were stiff immediately, then slight swinging, they also looked like have the life to be common, danced because of the joy.

Huo Yuhao only thought that loosen, hurries Teleportation, has been separated from the fetter. But these time actually does not dare to fly again upwardly. That Tang San can actually make the universe invert. To be separated from his control is too difficultly and is too difficult.

In this time, a blood red big net is dropping from the clouds, covers toward his body.

Strong murderous aura also from the sky erupts. Huo Yuhao discovered with amazement, how regardless of dodge. As if impossible to fend the fetter of that big net. In this flash, that big net as if turned into an entire space, must him load resembles.

Cannot avoid, that can only shoulder hardly.

takes a deep breath, in Huo Yuhao pupil light none remaining twinkle, in order to sees Wutong, what kind of pain, oneself present must shoulder to be good.

Giant ice cones are centered on his body rapid formation. Then erupts to the surroundings, the innumerable ice cones shoot up to the sky just like the great column generally.

Is surprised including Huo Yuhao, Octagonal Ten Thousands Directional Thorns after oneself become Gods, unexpectedly already so formidable?

Moreover, a Bai Se (White Color) halo also along with it from his outward diffusion, Absolute Zero!

Absolute Zero this Soul Ability, should call divine skill now, it most major characteristics, have huge amplification to the Huo Yuhao all Ice Attribute abilities, in actual combat. Has the extraordinary significance.

That icicle rises straight from the ground, becomes fully has the hundred zhang (333m) to be high in a flash.

In the sky blood red big net falls, collides with the ice cones together. The ice cone is melting rapidly, but also made the speed that it fell slow down. At least strove to Huo Yuhao for several minutes.

The Huo Yuhao personal appearance retrocedes rapidly, he has never thought must defeat Tang San this matter, because he is very clear, that radically is the impossible matter. Therefore, he only then runs, first travelled said again.

Although Tang San is God Realm Law Enforcer, but in God Realm, not only also only then his Law Enforcer. Now only then flees his control first. Then thinks that other means ask the wife to be right.

Explodes rapidly draws back, Huo Yuhao has released Absolute own speed. Meanwhile. Has detonated these icicles.

Ice Emperor light shadow appears behind Huo Yuhao, the anger of seven emotions.

Under the function of mood of anger. The Ice Explosion Technique prestige can erupt Absolute instantaneously, seems the indignation of nature, the mood mix of violent anger in that innumerable Ice Explosion, changes into the fragment of ice, able to move unhindered dances in the air.

Halos burst out from Huo Yuhao unceasingly outward, are drawing support from the mood of anger, not only Ice Explosion Technique has inspired, following, is Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain and Ice Bear Snowstorm. Huo Yuhao incisiveness of own range control release.

This big forest, as if completely turned into sheet ice blue world, terrifying ultra-low temperature Absolute Zero in that Snowstorm, the prestige can the power, even if is God Realm Law Enforcer Tang San, the footsteps have stopped.

In the blood red double pupil, reveals color of the surprise, muttered thought aloud: “Has not thought that this boy just now enters God Realm, has passed to his Power of Emotion and own ability union Rong Nianbing unexpectedly was so good. Really is fills the elasticity fellow, the pressure is bigger, the rebound is also bigger.”

Huo Yuhao cannot choose the exact way because of flurry is running away, when Ice Bear Snowstorm erupts, he felt obviously murderous aura weakened, secret relaxing., as if also had a feeling of control world. Is this level of god?

The first batch of traveling award has pulled out officially, the winner's list is:

Young 18 areas

Month 7 areas

Heart rain 16 areas

Is drunk to become common practice 14 areas

Simple .11 areas

This week of award winner is: Tang Xiaoyao 10 areas

Asked fellow lucky prize-winning players to relate our custom services: 800051345, they will register your materials, after the list all comes out, will inform you to prepare the traveling schedule.

The range of next week drawing is the rank first ten players in region entire clothing/taking strength ranking first five players and 19 areas, the names of 19 areas are the Saint masters, the player who wants to be selected can go to the new area to give a try \;

From this week, the material object reward of drawing gradually will also provide in the hand of fellow winners, therefore everybody many participation game, has the opportunity to win our rewards as far as possible \; ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-621-part-2





Volume 13

#621 - Dai Mubai And Zhu Zhuqing


\; The surrounding scenery fluctuates gradually, but actually throughout is the big forests, as if this big forest is inexhaustible. Huo Yuhao self-examines, at own speed, in so situation whole-heartedly, even if were true Star Dou Forest has completed to pass through, but this forest actually as before has not felt the end now, his Divine Consciousness released outward, felt, was only the infinite trees and vegetation.

Behind when to a wee bit cannot feel murderous aura that transmits, Huo Yuhao stops the footsteps, falls in the ground. When turns round to look, the back as before is the boundless big forest, but did not have that father-in-law's fearful aura.

Although did not have the danger temporarily, but on the Huo Yuhao face actually full was the forced smile, had such a formidable and strong father-in-law Sir, how this looked for Wutong by oneself! Moreover, oneself this father-in-law Sir or God Realm Law Enforcer, oneself just entered God Realm, completely ignorants regarding the surrounding all, is really difficult.

Then this does? In a completely strange place, and has in the situation of giant crisis anytime, cultivates to turn into a god him with great difficulty, feels no use.

Smiles bitterly is walking forward, how regardless to say that must go out of this big forest to say first again, he does not dare to fly sky over the forest to go, because such is too easy to expose itself. But in this big forest, as if has a mysterious strength, even if Divine Consciousness, is unable to investigate a farther place.

Does not know how long, front suddenly sees the light suddenly, a lakelet appears in front of Huo Yuhao.

Sees this lakelet, Huo Yuhao slightly stares, because he discovered with amazement. Here really looked like Lake of Life in Star Dou Forest.

Wait / Etc.!

Suddenly. In the Huo Yuhao eye reveals the surprised color, because he discovered that in this lakelet lakeside really small courtyards, in the courtyard has three log cabins, is not big, but is fine, particularly lakeside in this forest. Has several points of elegant taste.

Has the room naturally to have the person, Huo Yuhao hurries to walk toward that log cabin, although does not know what here lives is any god, but finds the person to inquire that the situation in this God Realm, must try to find out carelessly is much stronger, particularly in oneself offended under the premise of Sir Law Enforcer.

Before arriving at the courtyard, Huo Yuhao high sound track: “Has the person?”

So summoned three times, a log cabin central gate opened. Goes out of a person from inside.

This person of golden hair, stature is quite big and tall, the facial features are plain, seem the 30-year-old appearance, but stands there, plain atmosphere beyond description sends out from him. Just likes the palatial mountain is ordinary. Shakes the person heart and soul.

Why does not know, saw this person, Huo Yuhao thinks unexpectedly somewhat familiar, unexpectedly a little likely saw Duke White Tiger. His vision is sharp, slightly staring, startled sees, in this golden hair man eyes pupil, unexpectedly is also the double pupil.

“Comes.”The golden hair man voice is vigorous, but is having several points of sonorous sound.

The front gate opens, Huo Yuhao walked subconsciously. But his double pupil, actually throughout looks steadily on front golden hair man face, in the heart has as if guessed correctly anything, actually some cannot confirm.

“Did he come?”In this time, another sound is resounding, this sound is somewhat chilly, but is quite moving, in the chilliness, seems mixing with several points of gentleness.

In log cabin, goes out of one person, a black long hair hangs loose after the brain, the simple black long skirt puts in her is truly graceful. It seems 28 and nine -year-old appearances, the stature is really abundant, the facial features are also beautiful. In a pair of beautiful pupil, the chilly meaning caresses the face. But looks at the Huo Yuhao look, actually is really gentle, even is also having several points of gentle flavor.

“You are Yuhao.”The black hair female smiles was saying.

Huo Yuhao nodded, the look somewhat is vacant.

That black hair female turned head to look at a golden hair man, said with a smile lowly: “He may be stronger than you must much, is first-level Gods.”

The golden hair youth said proudly: “That is also my type.”

The Huo Yuhao look concentrates suddenly, immediately confirmed in oneself heart to guess that “you and you were?”

Golden hair youth vision brilliant visits him, in the double pupil, the none remaining glitters, “I called Dai Mubai, this was my wife Zhu Zhuqing.”

Dai Mubai? Zhu Zhuqing?

Hears these two names, even if Huo Yuhao had guessed, has the feeling of one's blood bubbles up to the brim as before.

Initially enters God Realm, actually encounters Law Enforcer to engage in factional strife, is the vacant no use time, actually met, has run into own ancestor!

Right, is the ancestor. Once, Douluo Continent 10,000 years ago, initially, Shrek Academy was also only small Academy of concept, only received the monster, but did not receive the average person.

At that time, that generation of Shrek Seven Devils appeared, making entire Continent shock, had afterward Shrek Academy, had afterward Tang Sect.

But in then Shrek Seven Devils, the leader without doubt afterward became Tang San that Sea God and Asura god double god unites, but, in seven devils other six people similarly are also outstanding.

seven devils ranks first, must call an elder brother's person including Tang San, the name is: Dai Mubai, is called Evil Eyes White Tiger, is first-generation White Tiger Douluo. White Tiger this title, has followed Dai Clan to inherit. The Huo Yuhao father, Duke White Tiger isn't Dai Hao, this lineage/vein descendant? In other words, front man, if is really Evil Eyes White Tiger Dai Mubai, he is the Huo Yuhao ancestor!

But Zhu Zhuqing, then ranks in that generation of Shrek Seven Devils sixth, is called Hell Civet. In initial Shrek Seven Devils, besides Tang San, individual strength was strongest, was Dai Mubai. In the legend, Dai Mubai also same to turn into a god, after the birth descendant, disappears from the scene. At this moment, Huo Yuhao has witnessed this legend without doubt.

When is most difficult, bumps into the family member, this feeling was really too wonderful, the Huo Yuhao subconscious release own Divine Consciousness, has covered toward Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing.

( To know the old generation Shrek Seven Devils story, for details sees does clumsily, «Douluo Continent»)

Dai Mubai knit the brows, anything had not said.

Although Huo Yuhao the mood surges, but will not always be at a loss, if has admitted mistakes the ancestor, that may too lose face. Therefore, he must feel clear is good.

The inheritance of bloodlines will not change because of the passage of time, the next quarter, Huo Yuhao has done to the end obeisance, knees down, sound because of excited, but somewhat is shivering the [say / way]: “Huo Yuhao pays a visit two ancestors.”

“You should say that called Dai Yuhao! Otherwise, what ancestor do you also recognize?”Dai Mubai reprimanded.

Dai Yuhao? These three characters explode into the Huo Yuhao heart, immediately made him stay. Yes, oneself should be called Dai Yuhao to be right. But, can oneself call this name really?

In the mind, past events reverberate, in childhood, how mother was pulls to grow up difficultly, how also to change into semifinished product loess finally, the intense stabbing pain burst out in the heart. Although told him sanely, should not offend these two ancestors at this time, but, he actually as before could not bear gain ground, the anti- sound said: “No, my name is Huo, is not surnamed Dai.”

“What did you say?”The Dai Mubai beard and hair all opens, an unequalled powerful imposing manner bursts out from him suddenly.

He clearly is second-level Gods, Huo Yuhao is actually first-level Gods, actually suppressed not gasping for breath, a little looks like before unexpectedly, facing Tang San time.

Huo Yuhao clenches the teeth, the support, did not speak with hardship. But the stubbornness in look, is actually his reply.

The Dai Mubai look is cold and gloomy, “don't you recognize the ancestors unexpectedly?”

Huo Yuhao expression also already cold, in this short time, he has set firm resolve. Some matters can change, but something, are also forever unchangeable.

“I have not recognized the ancestor. However, my surname actually can only follow mother. From infancy to maturity, is raises me who mother suffers great hardships, in the family|home wanted a little delicious thing, the mothers to give me, but she actually in the back silently ate at is not being the thing that the person should eat. Without mother, I already died, what discussed that recognizes the ancestor to return to the birth family? I can no longer hate, when I had the ability, mother was not already, I can only for the matter that mother handles, inherits her surname. Therefore, my name is Huo, this surname, will never change, only if mother ressurection, makes me change personally!”

At the beginning, Huo Yuhao said that these words somewhat were difficult, but more said that his own imposing manner was more powerful, spoke of finally, he has stood up from the ground, top Dai Mubai to take to his tremendous pressure, categorical that the words said.

Dai Mubai coldly [say / way]: “Your matter, I knew. You offended Tang San, if no us, Tang San is impossible to give you a wee bit opportunities, will strangle you, if you are surnamed Huo, you can get the hell out, is not my Dai Clan person, I will not help you be tiny bit. In this God Realm, you will be unable to take a single step forward, even was placed on trial by Tang San.”

The Huo Yuhao heart is piece of ice-cold, smiling that he self-ridicules, retrocedes suddenly two steps, then respectful bows with hands clasped, salutes to Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing.

When Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing think he must change the mind, he has actually walked tall, turns around to walk toward the courtyard.

He walks without hesitation, does not have the sluggishness of least bit. Rather with world artificial enemy, cannot change him a filial piety to mother.

“Yuhao!”At this moment, suddenly, a summon from behind resounds suddenly. In this sound, filled sobbed with anxiously, has endless feeling attached.

Hears this sound, the Huo Yuhao whole body shakes suddenly, in the double pupil, full is color with amazement, he looked like the immobilization by witchcraft was common, stood is motionless there, dull, has turned round slowly. But he that firm back, in this moment actually in unceasing is trembling, fierce is trembling.

On December 21, the Chengdu bamboo slip sold! Am I wear the western-style clothing to sign to you good, or wears Tang Sect Wei Yi, the little friends in Chengdu? Peerless Tang Sect last big result.

Activity subject: The Tang three few «Peerless Tang Sect 26» new product listing Chengdu bamboo slips sell will move the time: On December 21, 2014 14 : 00-15 : 30 operating location: Chengdu Bucher purchasing books center West Shop( Yingmenkou road 12 th)( not

Ends being continued

~^~) 1052



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-621-part-3





Volume 13

#622 - Big Result


In three small log cabins, leftmost that already opened, the entrance place, a cotton garment Jing Chai female stands there, on the elegant face, full is the tears. She is holding the doorframe, as if the next quarter, oneself will throw down. Her beauty, is delicate, but actually not in part of ones duty annoys the person to love tenderly. It seems has several points of vicissitudes slightly, but as before is the world is outstandingly beautiful.

“Mother”Huo Yuhao cried suddenly, flies to throw, his whole person who also resembled looked like was completely uncontrolled generally, threw to that woman in front of directly, closely grasped her leg, cried loudly.

Yes, this woman, at present this woman, is Huo Yuhao that pitiful mother Huo Yun'er!

Some Zhu Zhuqing rebuking stared Dai Mubai one, the eye socket micro red [say / way]: “Is you dislikes, must do the matter that this moves unnecessarily.”

Dai Mubai hey said with a smile: “Worthily is father's type, has the strength of spirit. I like such child, has not made me make an effort white. The young fellows, are good and good. The eye that then, Oscar that fellow must envy was red! Ha Ha Ha Ha!”

Huo Yuhao has not thought that here will see mother unexpectedly, suddenly, the mood has been hard completely self-made, under cries, since heart many years depressing emotion complete explosion, recently Wutong left, pain that also the bitter experience suppresses continually, as if also during these wept bitterly to release completely.

Huo Yun'er gently is touching son's head, the tears are the flood, wants to draw Huo Yuhao, but she also where has that big strength!

After Dai Mubai, etc. he had cried a while, the stride arrives at side him, has raised from the ground him.

“Man and real man, crying a while vented to be good, should not be endless. This is the celebration, should Gao Xingcai be right.”At the same time was saying, he has also patted the back of Huo Yuhao, vigorous mental power breaks in Huo Yuhao within the body, him the mental power disorder that because the emotion intense eruption causes has stabilized.

“Many thanks the ancestor helps.”If Huo Yuhao at this time yes what's the matter, he were not silly. Knocks down directly, numerous has knocked three knocks to Dai Mubai.

Dai Mubai such has also been made by him, on the face is actually look with a smile, even is also bringing several points of intense pride. Looks at such, is self-satisfied cannot in be self-satisfied. Yes! No matter what who has such a descendant, same self-satisfied.

“Gets up.”Dai Mubai waved, this time, was Zhu Zhuqing has actually drawn from the ground Huo Yuhao.

Dai Mubai said: “Now the mother and child have a reunion, did you also call Huo Yuhao? Yun'er, this matter I gave you.”

“Yes, ancestor.”Huo Yun'er sobbed is complying with one, in the beautiful pupil full was the endless gratitude.

Zhu Zhuqing said with a smile: “Your mother and child so are separately long, many words must say that said to the room. Goes.”

“Yes.”Huo Yuhao hurries respectfully complies with one, he only thought that at this time throat as if stem anything, the brain is a confusion. Mother ressurection, this regarding him, the influence was really too big. In this moment, he only thought that anything is unimportant, only wants to defend side mother.

Walks into the log cabin with Huo Yun'er, the Huo Yuhao fierce squatting down body grasps mother, actually suppresses not to make the tears flow.

Huo Yun'er gently is touching his hair, crazy tunnel: “My Little Yuhao has grown up, grew up really! The child, these years, you have certainly had many pain.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, he has certainly had many pain, underwent countless tribulations, but in this moment, once misery was completely unimportant. Can let mother ressurection, even if again painstakingly again tired, what was also considered as?

In his heart many words wanted to say to mother obviously, was, in this moment, he anything could not say. Has been several years of orphan, suddenly also became had mother's child, this feeling, was really too preciously and is too for him precious.

The mother and child such are supporting, is gradually calm. Huo Yun'er related own matter to Huo Yuhao.

Originally, Huo Yun'er truly died more than ten years ago, but, Huo Yuhao is first-level Gods, has the ability that ordinary Gods does not have, that is, he can lead few family members to arrive in God Realm.

Even if Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing cannot achieve this point, because only then first-level Gods has such qualifications.

Tang San after is God Realm Law Enforcer, although cannot interfere the world matter easily, but involves Gods, being accommodating some places. Therefore, Dai Mubai after Tang San discussed that in the darkness seeks for the Huo Yun'er soul, making her ressurection arrive at God Realm, although Huo Yun'er three Gods were not continually extremely, but lived finally.

Huo Yuhao is the Dai Mubai posterity, Tang San, when tests Huo Yuhao, to whet Huo Yuhao, how to conceal to Dai Mubai? Therefore, Huo Yuhao all, Dai Mubai knows that he is also clear, Huo Yun'er is in the Huo Yuhao heart the biggest heart knot. Only has to untie this heart knot, can make him truly Gods. Therefore, had at present this occurrence.

However, Huo Yuhao this first-level Gods ability, cannot belt more people arrive at God Realm, quota merely remaining two, has given Huo Yun'er, another, naturally must give Dai Hao. God Realm was lonely, must make Huo Yun'er cavity true feelings report back.

All that on Douluo Continent has, other Huo Yun'er is could not see that but she can actually feel around her grave surrounding area hundred meters all. For serveral days, is she happiest day, because, she can hear every day, before that grave, the sound that oneself that beloved man poured out. The sorrow and vicious tendencies in heart, with this sound and son forthcoming good news, diverge finally gradually. Today sees Huo Yuhao, has her mood completely released?

Huo Yuhao naturally does not know had these many changes, but listened to Huo Yun'er to say after was Dai Mubai her ressurection, in the heart full is grateful. What also has to live importantly compared with mother?

After the Huo Yuhao mood returned to normal some, the matter that also has these years said to mother listens, these difficulties that naturally, receives naturally were neglected by him, but was narrating some happy matters.

God Realm as if no daytime the dark night, has not known how long, the knocking on a door sound has resounded.

Huo Yuhao hurries to stand up, opens the door, sees only outside to stand, is Dai Mubai.

“Ancestor.”Huo Yuhao must kneel down to salute immediately, actually held on by Dai Mubai.

“Was good, in this God Realm, some where that many courtesy. What kind of? Did Yun'er convince you? Was surnamed Dai? You could rest assured that when came after your father that brat to God Realm, looked how I tidy up him, gives your mother to vent anger. This mixes the boy, wholeheartedly is country right, how can actually neglect own family member?”

From beginning to end, actually Huo Yun'er had not said to Huo Yuhao changes surname this matter, but Huo Yuhao is intelligent, something, did not need to say again. Mother ressurection, in his heart resentment read already completely went.

“Ancestor, I am willing to recognize ancestor to return to the birth family.”At the same time was saying, he kneels down once more. This time, Dai Mubai has not prevented, laughs saying: “Good, good and good. Later, you called Dai Yuhao.”

Regarding Dai Yuhao this name, Dai Mubai seems satisfied very much, draws Dai Yuhao to go out of the door, arrives in the courtyard.

One table of food and wine already prepared, the whole family gathered round the table to sit, Dai Mubai took up jug liquor, to oneself one bowl, then has given but actually Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao hurried to receive, to Zhu Zhuqing and mothers but actually, finally is one.

Dai Mubai takes up the liquor bowl, said: “Today this, is congratulates into Gods for you.”

“Xie ancestor.”Sees mother, Huo Yuhao the mood is greatly smooth at this time, in Yin Jin a Cup liquor.

Dai Mubai is also one drinks completely, Ha Ha said with a smile: “Is happy and happy.”

Shifting to a new subject, Dai Mubai asked to Yuhao: “You arrive at God Realm, can once see Tang San?”

Dai Yuhao the face, after will arrive at God Realm, immediately painstakingly the matter of bitter experience said in detail.

Listened to his such saying, Dai Mubai also to stare staring, Huo Yun'er was worry of face.

Zhu Zhuqing snort|hum, said: “Also counter- he! Turns head we to look for him. Looked that he can you be what kind.”

Dai Mubai stared Zhu Zhuqing one, signals with the eyes to her, said: “This matter I also listened to Tang San saying that he to your very much somewhat resentment, his such daughter, since childhood loved seriously, received greatly was so suffering from injustice, no wonder he can so. God Realm is the place of tasteful strength, you are first-level Gods, defeats him not to be certainly impossible, but, you must show your enough strength to him, only has so, may subside his anger, making him believe that you are capable of protecting his daughter. Other you do not need to be worried, if he proposed again makes you probably defeat him, you independently act, insists some time as far as possible, as for other, gives us.”

“Yes, many thanks ancestor.”Listened to the Dai Mubai words, in the Huo Yuhao heart Dading, thinks one and Beibei between them the relations, naturally understand close between old generation Shrek Seven Devils. Two ancestors support to oneself, naturally was much easier.

Having a good time that a meal banquet eats, has eaten meal, Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing make Huo Yun'er stay in the log cabin, they together, bringing Huo Yuhao to soar.

In God Realm, the fog is very low, above the kilometer, is not only that misty clouds. In the fog, has the thick heaven and earth elemental energy fluctuation, during the breath, within the body mental power can the to rush forth ebullition.

Had the urging of Dai Mubai, Huo Yuhao has restrained the mind at this time, transferred within the body mental power to revolve, simultaneously was feeling own body change silently.

Most the chapter, has wanted to say anything, is somewhat vacant, what are more will soon leave moved that. Two years of companion, 5.2 million characters. Thank you, two years in my life has been accompanying me, good happy peerless Tang Sect to accompany your two years in your lives. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-622-part-1





Volume 13

#622 - Big Result


Yes! One are first-level Gods, is God of Emotion. Wish makes the father-in-law approve, must show enough cultivating to be good. That is actually what kind, can insist a longer time before father-in-law?

Dai Mubai as if saw in his heart is thinking anything, light [say / way]: “If you are only want to resist purely, this fought does not need to hit you to lose, your opportunity did not have. Person or god, if did not have the heart of viing for supremacy, how can also display Absolute own ability? Since you can practice to turn into a god, this truth has no reason unclear.”

Listened to his such saying, Huo Yuhao immediately one startled, yes! If did not have including the heart of viing for supremacy, own battle efficiency can also display many, “may and be possible that to be the Wutong father!”Huo Yuhao somewhat bitter and astringent saying.

Dai Mubai disdains snort|hum, said: “You believe that was inadequate by my brothers who your ability can also injure? Believes me, you when the time comes wanted display whole-heartedly on the line. Let alone your impossible wound he, even if you can, that is at God Realm, instead was greatly meddlesome.”

Huo Yuhao has not said anything again, but the ray in eye has been short the beforehand several points to dread.

Initially when enters God Realm, here strangeness, making in his innermost feelings present some fears unavoidably, luckily, when this key has bumped into Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing, making his heart also gradually stabilize, own confidence gradually was also restoring. He after all once was most powerhouse on Douluo Continent, and has defeated invincible myth Beast God Di Tian, the God Realm two characters will take to him the pressure, but after he calmed down at this time completely, this pressure, gradually transformed the power.

The time is not long, the distant place, that palace was already in sight, sees that palace, the Huo Yuhao look immediately becomes earnest, because, Tang Wutong there! In any event, today two ancestors, oneself must see that Wutong is good, must explain to her personally.

Close palace, several golden forms have not blocked their way, but after seeing Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing, they immediately bow to salute.

Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing, although is second-level Gods, because relates closely with Law Enforcer Tang San, status in God Realm naturally also on to develop according to the situation.

Dai Mubai said: “Asked Sea God to come out, we had the matter to consult.”

“Yes, please wait a bit.”A [gold/metal] clothes person rapidly.

The time is not long, Zhen's blue ray drops from the clouds together, is Tang San, but, present he, did not have to chase down Dai Yuhao time that blood red today.

Sees Huo Yuhao, his look concentrates, cold murderous aura ascends immediately, but has a look at Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing again, in the heart murderous aura also weakened several points.

“Mubai, how did you come?”Tang San light asking, in the expression appears somewhat desolate.

Dai Mubai said: “Also not because of this kid. Little San, your also age, but also competes with the child? I know that you love Wutong, but must give me this descendant explanation the opportunity.”

Tang San coldly snorted, said: “Among friendship by our brothers, other matter how, but how this matter is not good. My such daughter, unexpectedly received such big injury in the world, I do not allow him to injure Wutong once more. Only if, he can defeat me.”

The Dai Mubai anger snort|hum, said: “How defeats you? You also really think one are invincible? Yuhao, on, making him have a look at your first-level Gods strength.”

The Dai Yuhao complexion slightly changes, he thinks that and Tang San depending on the relations between Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing, mediated to oneself, can perhaps see Tang Wutong. But who knows that this had not said several words, must begin unexpectedly. In heart immediately awkward.

Tang San coldly looks to him, “do you dare to fight with me?”

Dai Yuhao takes a deep breath, one step steps forward, before the personal appearance flutters, bows to salute to Tang San, “I only want to see one side Wutong. If the senior insists on testing the school, the younger generation is willing to try.”

Tang San has smiled suddenly, smiles disdaining that contemptuous, smiles, “good, I must have a look but actually, why you come to contend with me.”

Tao heavenly power presses erupts suddenly, blots out the sky general, goes toward Dai Yuhao to rush forth, the Tang San cold and gloomy sound reverberates in his ear, “your opportunity, only then this time, looks in the Mubai share, I will not kill you, but after this time, you dare to come again, I erase your memory. Let your forever forgetting Wutong.”

Dai Yuhao stared in a big way the eye suddenly, everyone had own Reverse Scale, he was also same, since arriving at God Realm, he has been withstanding the oppression of Tang San, he adjusted his mentality as far as possible, how does not dare to revolt facing Tang San. But listened to a Tang San such saying at this time, in the heart fighting intent flaming burnt immediately, for Wutong, in order to sees own beloved woman, now anything cannot attend.

A strange brilliance bursts out from Dai Yuhao suddenly, the aura of his whole person also changes. The aquamarine form behind shines together in him, is Ice Emperor.

Ice Emperor, in the Dai Yuhao mood, representing, angrily!

The powerful thought ascends, the Dai Yuhao double pupil shines, on the forehead Eye of Destiny opens, in Eye of Destiny, the strange halos are sparkling faintly, immediately, after Dai Yuhao brain, presents a corona, this corona addendum circle presents for the thorn shape.

Dai Yuhao Spirit Eyes initial ninth Soul Ring, Thorny Halo.

Although to turn into a god, but beforehand Soul Ability actually all exists, moreover had the sublimation, under the function of Divine Consciousness, this Thorny Halo blooms the strange brilliance, Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing of distant place feels the aura that lends, slightly is startled. Good strength big Divine Consciousness fluctuation! Worthily is the first-level Gods strength.

This Thorny Halo naturally came from Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, even if initially were when facing Beast God Di Tian, Dai Yuhao has not used, that was because, he worried that Di Tian through own Soul Ability detected one have absorbed Evil Emperor Soul Ring, thus there is the heart of guarding. Afterward he started Space-Time Ray directly, Beast God really does not beat, because he hid the strength in front.

But now, facing the powerhouse of Tang San this level, where he dares to have hideaway Ah? of least bit

Tang San has gotten rid, he lifts toward the direction right hand of Dai Yuhao, the surrounding all turned into the blue color immediately completely, the terrifying oppression strength ascends instantaneously. The right hand receives, the finger springs outward. Immediately, one group azure bright light rolled to fly in the Dai Yuhao direction.

Although Dai Yuhao does not know what Tang San use is any ability, but by his judgment to Tang San strength, where dares to have the heart of least bit despising.

The Soul Power instantaneous transformation is Absolute Ice, the dark blue ray cuts together suddenly, is Emperor's Sword, Peerless Extreme Ice!

“Bites!”In the resounding sound, Peerless Extreme Ice unexpectedly instantaneous to shatter, changes into the innumerable fragments from the sky to scatter in all directions to flutter about, but that green light group actually as before flew in the Dai Yuhao direction, the speed is not fast, but in the entire flight, is having the extremely terrifying pressure.

[Say / Way] that Tang San disdains: “Visible atheistic ability, wants to resist my Azure Sky Nirvana Divine Thunder?”

Dai Yuhao takes a deep breath, he understands that perhaps any ordinary Soul Ability, before oneself this father-in-law Sir, does not have any function.

The mind receives suddenly, the back Ice Emperor form also instantaneously becomes clear, Ice Emperor look cold looks to Tang San, who no matter she match is, the intense spunk ascends instantaneously, is centered on the body of Dai Yuhao, green jade light shoots up to the sky together, unexpectedly stiffly breaks a slit in the surrounding blue space.

The Dai Yuhao left leg one step steps forward, the meaning of missing bursts out, on the forehead, Eye of Destiny turned into the black and white bi-color suddenly, two halos are the electricity shoot.

In instance that black and white bi-color projects, airborne blue color for it one gloomy, blue world turned into the black and white two colors unexpectedly instantaneously.

Huge vertical eye, as if haunched the entire sky to be ordinary, float behind Dai Yuhao, that black Bai Se (White Color) ray also instantaneously flooded in the entire space.

Tang San, was Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing, on the face reveals the surprised color, but the surprised degree was slightly different. Not is only they, even if Dai Yuhao, surprised inexplicable, Power of Destiny that oneself inspire, unexpectedly formidable in this way?

Soul Expropiation and Casualty of Destiny, two big divine skill in this God Realm, as if bloomed their true brilliance.

Two rays fell on Tang San instantaneously, although the Tang San whole body erupted the intense blue light, but did not have what the effect of impediment to these two rays. The body also turned into the black and white bi-color.

But that Azure Sky Nirvana Divine Thunder, arrived in front of Dai Yuhao at this time.

The Dai Yuhao right fist wields, in the double pupil, presented the Tang Wutong form unexpectedly.

Thinking Dong Fist, thinks of such as Quan Yong. Additional, the anger of mood.

All prevents me to miss the Wutong strength, must wither away in my anger. This is this time thought.

“Bang!”

The black and white bi-color in sky after Dai Yuhao two big divine skill erupt, is gloomy, but, the azure bright ray floods in the entire space.

Dai Yuhao only thought that as if the huge black dragon twined their body, then burst out the unequalled terrifying explosive force. That explosive force fully erupts to soul from the body, the fierce pain, as if must tear into shreds his whole person.

Aquamarine form transformation is Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass, the light joyful sudden gable lives in the body of Dai Yuhao, clouds heaven and earth elemental energy, immediately goes toward his body gathering at the crazy speed.

Octagonal Ice Source Concentration.

Huge heaven and earth elemental energy is washing the body of Dai Yuhao, restores on him to receive the injury that.

But the distant place, the body of Tang San has actually shaken shaking, in the mouth exudes one low stuffily, shivered. Black and white bi-color fluctuation also became fierce several points. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-622-part-2





Volume 13

#622 - Big Result


But under flickers, that black and white bi-color actually diverged, is only the Tang San complexion, seemed are unexpectedly many have wiped palely.

Was he injured? This is the first response of Dai Yuhao.

Yes, Tang San has been injured, has not thought including Tang San that the Dai Yuhao Thorny Halo effect so will be unexpectedly strong. He enough understands Dai Yuhao, but this Thorny Halo is actually his first use.

The Thorny Halo effect is, oneself many were greatly injured, will have 50% direct rebounds to change into the mind injury to the match.

If normally, Spiritual Power of this rebound is impossible to injure Tang San, but in that flickers, on Tang San actually Dai Yuhao Soul Expropiation! Own mind defensive power reduces suddenly.

“Good, you are very good!”Saying of Tang San coldly .

Dai Yuhao hurries the anxious [say / way]: “I am not intentionally, I do not know to be able like this.”

“Was needless to say.”The Tang San right hand lifts, the Huo Yuhao very familiar ray appears together during he grasps. The bright golden color along with it bursting out, is, golden trident.

In Dai Yuhao Azure Sky Nirvana Divine Thunder, although restored several points with the help of Octagonal Ice Source Concentration, actually as before the ache wants to crack. Sees the golden trident, complexion big change, the single is the thought that he can feel the terrifying prestige energy that in that golden trident bursts out.

The Tang San look changes has free time to hoodwink suddenly, the surrounding fog turned into the blue color once more, but this time, is actually the blue sea.

In the Tang San hand the golden trident moved, one after another, golden Halo flew toward Dai Yuhao.

The Dai Yuhao sensation ability is quite formidable, he knows that now most should do, continually is opening Thorny Halo, displays Power of Destiny once more. Only has so, can make Tang San dread.

However, he does not have such to do, that after is his father-in-law, is the Tang Wutong father! Can he injure him?

The personal appearance retrocedes suddenly, Dai Yuhao flies to escape rapidly backward.

However, that golden Halo actually closely associated flickers close.

Dai Yuhao discovered with amazement, when that golden Halo arrives above oneself top of the head, oneself all abilities originally, unexpectedly likely by complete seal generally. Any Soul Ability is unable to use.

That Halo fell, set on oneself. Golden Halo, live in his body tight band. Cannot move again.

“Tang San, do not go too far. You use the indefinite disturbance to a child unexpectedly! Do you want to do?”An angry sound resounds, the ray dodges, the form appears in front of Tang San together not far away, grasped him to prepare the thorn to the Dai Yuhao golden trident. Not is just former God of Emotion Rong Nianbing?

Tang San coldly has swept his one eyes, suddenly, in the hand the golden trident moves again, is golden Halo blooms, Rong Nianbing and he only in close, how regardless of not to have thought that Tang San will get rid to him unexpectedly, immediately by that golden Halo sets on the body, could not be moved.

Moreover, golden Halo also suddenly raise in the distant place, unexpectedly also wraps Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing.

Tang San vision dense looks to Rong Nianbing, said: “Do I want to do? I want to kill this boy. Now, you actually wanted to throw the responsibility to be actually far away, when I have killed him, has thought on reading of my daughter certainly that erases her memory again is. As for you, God of Emotion God Position will reply on you, gives me to keep God Realm to assist me honestly. You wait to look how he dies.”

“You”Rong Nianbing fly into a rage, he cannot think absolutely, Tang San can unexpectedly so. The whole body ray puts greatly, transfers mental power fully, wants to work loose from this golden Halo.

But, Tang San by the indefinite disturbance that the golden trident starts, was known as that God Realm first controls, so is can it be that easy to work loose? If Rong Nianbing also has the position of Gods in the body, and ahead of time is prepared, perhaps also has the possibility of contending. May at this moment, how whatever he stimulates to movement mental power, is unable to work loose from that formidable Halo.

This all looks in the Tang San eye, he only thought that Halo starts to contract inward, the speed is not fast, but is extremely firm, his within the body mental power all transferred, but as before is actually not able to prevent that Halo to the oppression that oneself start.

This pressure is increased rapidly, Dai Yuhao whole body skeleton already oppressed “ka ka”makes noise.

He and he must erase the Wutong memory unexpectedly!

He must kill me.

Wutong and Wutong!

Dai Yuhao was crying out in the heart crazily, within the body mental power and Divine Consciousness, were burning crazily.

But, how that golden Halo is really extremely formidable, how whatever he struggles, is unable to make the speed that golden Halo draws in reduce slightly.

The pressure is getting bigger and bigger, Dai Yuhao started somewhat to suffocate, he even noticed that his body starts, in that oppresses distorts.

Rong Nianbing of distant place, seemed crying out to Tang San anything, but Tang San actually like could not hear, leaned on the golden trident in the ground, coldly looks at itself.

Was dying?

Under the fetter of that terror golden ring, even if Divine Consciousness is inescapable, can only feel the proximity of death unceasingly.

Wutong and Wutong! In the Dai Yuhao heart was crying out crazily.

He does not want dead, he does not think that Wutong forgets itself. Two ancestors were fettered, Teacher was also fettered. If died, Wutong forever forgets itself, again could not see her.

Can't with Wutong in the same place, what significance my to turn into a god have?

No longer silent withers away, in silence, eruption!

Suddenly, Dai Yuhao fierce gaining ground, a gloss beyond description, erupts suddenly from him.

Happy! Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass light shadow appears, joyful mood blooms instantaneously, that strong mood fluctuation merges into one organic whole with his Divine Consciousness and mental power instantaneously, suddenly outward, making the pressure that he bore reduce several points slightly.

Anger! The anger erupts, at this moment, in his heart has many, is angry! Cannot with Tang Wutong in the same place, oneself regard as father-in-law's man actually must massacre itself.

Sorrow! The snowflake dances in the air piece by piece, endless sad bursting out, at this moment, Dai Yuhao as if returned to initially self-created Hao-Dong Three Absolutes time. Thinking Dong Fist, thinks of such as Quan Yong, Recalling Dong Sword, never forgets, Hao-Dong Palm, generation after generations.

Happy! The joyful memory so is always glorious, stormy times that once roommate, on Sea God Lake the Sea God Destiny beautiful pink-blue color surging waves fairy maiden, went through together, blending of heart and heart, this was many joy.

Hatred! The hatred is one painful mood, left Duke's Estate that day, he was hateful, lost Dong'er, Qiu'er and Wutong time, his hatred was dreadful. The hatred, making people crazy.

Wicked! Evil and sinister, this mood Dai Yuhao itself does not have, but he innumerable times had actually felt the wickedness of Evil Soul Master, in mood, this is gloomiest world, at this moment, as if heart of hearts dirtiest thing by this wicked ignition.

Six mood, six eruptions! The sublimation of blooming and state of mind of mood!

On behalf of happy Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass, is representing angry Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion, is representing sorrowful Ice Heavenly Snow Woman, is representing happy Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White), is representing hatred Mermaid Princess Li Ya, is representing wicked Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler!

Six light shadow, appear in Dai Yuhao respectively behind, light shadow blooms, suddenly superposition, suddenly dispersion, but between that superposition and dispersion, on Dai Yuhao also bursts out six color halos, this halo becomes incomparably powerful, unexpectedly stiffly opens that golden Halo slowly, but on Dai Yuhao, is blooming that six color rays.

At this moment, a huge golden form suddenly appears after that six big spirit, golden halo, just like appearing general, before six big spirits and six mood, will swallow completely. One type beyond description gentle, bold and wild, attachment instantaneous surge.

That is......

Strength that loves!

“Wutong! I, love, you”

Dai Yuhao cried out loudly, at this moment, his voice changes into together seven color halos, straight thrust distant place that palatial palace.

Thick light fog reverberates, fluctuates and dispels in the air. Body that golden color Halo, in his slogan, started to present the chaps traces.

The laughter, anger, sorrow and happiness like detesting! Finally, the strength that loves has defeated other mood, fused all mood.

At this moment, Dai Yuhao mental power and Divine Consciousness, his mind, complete is sublimating.

In his heart, did not have the impediment of Tang San, did not have any to worry with angrily, had, but with did not abandon to Tang Wutong endless being in love.

Tang San of distant place, in the hand the Sea God trident wields, golden light, floating circulation, but this time, actually no longer attacks to Dai Yuhao, but melted Rong Nianbing as well as Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing fetter.

Wipes the light smile, appears on Tang San, he very natural uphold hand, holds in the arms the shoulder of Rong Nianbing, but this time Rong Nianbing, complexion actually gloomy as if must drop the water leakage to come, in the look, is flooding endless, grief and indignation!

“Bang!”Is fettering Dai Yuhao golden Halo loudly to shatter, he breaks the barrier, seven color halos change into seven Halo, composes a strange corona behind him, his own aura does not know that be more powerful than many times before, the fluctuations of seven mood are reverberating unceasingly, Divine Consciousness and mental power merge into one organic whole completely. After arriving at God Realm, he had the feeling of that control finally.

Visits him, Tang San is smiling nod, said: “This also almost, a little my son-in-law's appearance.”

Dai Yuhao still reverberates in own mood at this time, hears the Tang San words, stayed, somewhat is out of sorts.

“Dumb kid, has not paid a visit father-in-law.”Dai Mubai is ridiculing the sound conveys from behind.

Dai Yuhao is almost subconscious immediately knees down, has done obeisance to Tang San, “pays a visit the father-in-law Sir.”1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-622-part-3





Volume 13

#622 - Big Result


The Tang San big hand wields, said: “Gets up.”This time he, is smiling, the blue long hair is elegant, that appearance of outstanding ability, moving heart and soul.

Looks at his genial smiling face, Dai Yuhao just likes in the dream, is this that feels embarrassed own father-in-law Sir wholeheartedly? Among this moment, all as if become are how different.

“Dumb kid, if Tang San must feel embarrassed you, you think that you can also live the present?”Dai Mubai said with a smile.

Some Zhu Zhuqing actually enmities [say / way]: “San Ge, you were also too ruthless.”

Tang San shows a faint smile, said: “Me.”

He looks to Dai Yuhao, said: “You with that Ju Zi(orange) matter, I already knew actually. This matter, mistakenly not in you, but the good fortune makes the person. Although we are the gods, but the matter of world is unable to interfere. Past matter on the past, so long as your heart on Wutong good.”

“Reason that has felt embarrassed in you, naturally is some intentions. Initially, I selected you, has deferred also to inherit my God Position way to carry on all sorts of tests to you, that Wang Qiu'er, actually was also I branches out Wutong Divine Consciousness to be attached to that Three Eyed Golden Lion, otherwise, even if it were Destiny Divine Beast, was impossible to have that many spirit wisdom. Therefore, you do not need are the Wang Qiu'er matter feel again sad. She is Wutong part. Until after Wang Qiu'er offers sacrifices to give you, that some Spiritual Consciousness return on Wutong, making Wang Dong'er turn into Wutong thoroughly.”

“Afterward, certain people went to enter, allow you by the position of Gods, but you have actually done according to my test before, although afterward you inherited his God Position not any issue, but in the fusion of ability, many were also short. Just entered God Realm, your oneself ability and God of Emotion ability originally wanted to fuse completely is also very difficult. Therefore, I oppress you with this way, lets you self- fusion under the pressure. Now looks like, the effect is good. In the future, you should be able the pupil surpasses the teacher, to exceed that somebody.”

Rong Nianbing in side angry [say / way]: “Originally this was you plans, was your plot. Tang San, you are quite mean, you also deceived me to pledge a moment ago.”

A Tang San face cloud poor business conditions light [say / way]: “You think that secretly my inheritance, so is easy? Doesn't pay a price to be how good?”

Dai Yuhao asked to Rong Nianbing in a low voice: “Teacher, did you pledge?”

Rong Nianbing ill-humored [say / way]: “To not let him do not injure you, pledged that keeps the God Realm 30 years. Who knows that this fellow was appropriate, not only this play develops to you, develops to me looks. Dai Mubai, your couple already know that is?”

Dai Mubai innocent [say / way]: “Well, I do not know! How I know that I am second-level Gods.”

Rong Nianbing gets angry: “Nonsense, by your crabby, if the Tang San under cruel methods feel embarrassed your later generation, you so will be quiet? What non- achievement?”

Zhu Zhuqing disdains snort|hum, said: “Knows that you were also swindled? I suspect your intelligence quotient very much.”

“You and you......, Snort! Irritated me!”Rong Nianbing air/Qi big mouth and big mouth is panting for breath.

Tang San is hugging his shoulder, said: “Ok, should not be angry, remains to help me not be good? You are not do not know that recently our God Realm was not peaceful, you actually must travel at this time, did the brothers also do? Let alone, you snatched my inheritance, but also compensates my daughter, what do you have not to be unsatisfied? Yuhao this good seedling, was casual can find one?”

Dai Yuhao completely understood now, originally, from the beginning, oneself during the control of Tang San. Perhaps that is similar to the Star Dou Forest general place, is he creates, then sees two ancestors and mother quoted from oneself.

Dai Mubai Ha Ha said with a smile: “You do not have a look, whose type this is. Little San, quickly puts your daughter, had not seen that my this boy was quick anxious?”

Tang San shows a faint smile, said: “Goes, Yuhao, Wutong in the palace, you looks for her following this road. I do not blame you, does not blame you as for her strangely, I do not know.”

“Yes, many thanks father-in-law Sir.”Regardless of currently in the heart has any enmity mood, might as well find Tang Wutong to be important!

golden light spreads together toward that palace following the direction of Tang San finger, Dai Yuhao hurries to run rapidly toward that side.

Gazes after him to enter in the fog, in the Tang San eye reveals several points of disappointed color, “female does not keep, female not to remain greatly greatly!”

A Rong Nianbing face despises visits him, said: “Was good, do not result in cheaply has also shown off cleverness. Haven't I known you? The God Realm eventful time, your treasure son-in-law inherited my position of Gods, from now on is you one big helps inevitably. Does he have other place in God Realm? Your daughter will not leave you, what did you keep sighing here?”

Tang San sighed, said: “Nianbing, you know why I do want you to keep 30 years?”

Rong Nianbing has gawked, “is not these fellows was not convinced, wants while two big Godking not at the noisy point matter? We also feared that they are inadequate?”

Tang San shook the head, said: “Regarding them, I to was not worried, in any event, that is only our God Realm internal matter. What I am worried is another matter. Two Godking depart, God Realm master control power in my hands, therefore, only then I can feel all changes of God Realm. In 30 years, God Realm will perhaps have the big change, as for is anything, now I have not seen clearly. But I can actually feel that is one might make the God Realm destruction catastrophe.”

“Um?”Rong Nianbing look one cold, he knows that Tang San will not be aimless.

Dai Mubai sinking sound track: “Little San, regardless of any situation, we in the same place, worked as one, would going through the difficulty.”

The Tang San forced smile said: “Hope so. This disaster, is not very simple. Why this is I have not passed to the Yuhao reason position of the Gods. Nianbing, you believe that I do not know really you do see the Yuhao matter secretly? Even if busy, regarding own inheritance, has paid attention. I let go the opportunity of this inheritance intentionally, because I must maintain the complete strength, may resolve this future unknown crisis.”

Rong Nianbing said: “That this can Great Tribulation melt?”

Tang San eyes narrows the eyes, said: “Does not see clearly. It is difficult to melt, but also has a slim chance of survival. Does everything possible.”

Rong Nianbing said: “Good. However, a little I must remind you, domestic strength keeps away foreign aggression.”

“Um.”

Dai Yuhao has walked toward the fog deep place following that golden light, the present scenery gradually becomes clear, a palatial palace, appears before him.

Extends golden light to forward, he cannot attend to acclaiming grand of this palace, walks into fast.

Passes through the gate, he saw that a man and a woman two people sit in the hall, is playing chess.

They seem young, the man wears black clothed, the look is handsome, but that female also has the outstandingly beautiful looks, a white clothing, chastely like snow.

Dai Yuhao walks, as if has alarmed them, four vision have simultaneously thrown.

The man stands up, nodded to Dai Yuhao, walks to go forward saying: “Hello, I called Ji Dong. You are Yuhao. Welcome you to arrive at God Realm committee.”

“! Hello.”Is here God Realm committee? In the Huo Yuhao heart somewhat is surprised.

That white clothing female also stands up, Ji Dong said: “This is my wife Lie Yan.”

“Hello.”Dai Yuhao hurries to salute. Although he does not know that who these two people are, but if here is really God Realm committee, that these two status absolutely are not low.

Lie Yan shows a faint smile, said: “Looks for Wutong quickly.”

“Thanks two.”Dai Yuhao apologized two people, continued to go following golden light.

Looks the form that he leaves, Lie Yan says with a smile: “Yuhao is single-minded with the sentiment, looked like past you actually very much.”

Ji Dong he he smiles, said: “I suspected very much that big brother Tang San looks for husband for daughter according to my standard!”

Lie Yan “pū”smiles, said: “Beautiful stench.”

Ji Dong hugs into her the bosom, said: “Actually, the flavor of after the bitter comes the sweet, is most beautiful. I believe that he will experience quickly.”

( To know Ji Dong and Lie Yan story, for details sees makes «Bacchus» also «Yin-Yang Crown» clumsily)

The gold thread has spread to stop to the top layer. The front was a leaf of door, Huo Yuhao lifts the hand to knock knocking in the gate.

“Comes.”A temperate female voice resounds, is very interesting to listen, but the Huo Yuhao complexion actually slightly changes, because he listens, this sound does not belong to Wutong.

Pushes the door to enter, the Huo Yuhao vision actually suddenly contracts.

In the room, two people, stand sit, that station the female wears the pink long skirt, a long hair combs the long scorpion pigtail to dangle gently, can see her fine slender fair beautiful neck from the side, the long skirt beam place grasps gracefully, outlined perfectly her moving stature.

At this time she had turned around, the beautiful appearance, making Dai Yuhao look slightly one dull.

But that sits the person on bed, although can only see the profile, but Dai Yuhao is one recognizes, is that not just long-awaited person?

“You and hello.”Dai Yuhao subconscious gives regards to the female at present, but vision actually throughout on Tang Wutong.

The females arrive in front of him, careful is taking a look at him, but Huo Yuhao actually just likes unsettled.

“I called Xiao Wu, the dancing dance.”Xiao Wu smiles was saying that in beautiful pupil actually full is the color of satisfaction, that is mother -in-law looks at son-in-law's look. Has patted the shoulder of Dai Yuhao gently, then passes through from his side, and general's family takes.

“Wutong!”Does not have other people, where Dai Yuhao also to be able to bear again, says one, threw in front of Tang Wutong.

Tang Wutong sits there, actually unemotionally, the whole person looked like got down immobilization by witchcraft, motionless.

“Wutong. Is I am not good, was I makes a mistake. You make me explain that is good?”Dai Yuhao squats in front of Tang Wutong, grasps she somewhat icy cold both hands in own hand.

The Tang Wutong look seemed to be many several points of appearance, turns head to look to him, but in the beautiful pupil, is actually flooding being at a loss.

“Who are you?”

The simple three characters, are similar to three handle great hammers are ordinary, hammer maliciously in the Huo Yuhao heart. He immediately face whiten sits on the ground, one nondescriptive fear, raises instantaneously from the bottom of the heart. Loosened the hand of Tang Wutong subconsciously, body uncontrolled sitting has fallen to the ground.

His rather Tang Wutong gives scolding he, even drives away him, is not willing to hear her to say such words.

Remembers that she lost the memory, lost to my memory? Didn't know me? She did not know me Ah?

The unequalled fear, made in the Dai Yuhao heart is a confusion.

“Who are you?”Tang Wutong is crooked the head, visits him to ask.

Looks at the fear in his look, Tang Wutong has smiled suddenly, “I thought. You are Huo Yuhao, is Dai Yuhao. You are my man, my husband, my future child's father, that silly, was shouting outside loves my, fool! My fool!”

( The book ends)

Author language:

Lasts for two years, finally had finished this «Peerless Tang Sect», as second of Douluo Continent series, when just started to write, I really am somewhat disturbed. But I set firm resolve to write. Entire two years! More than 700 days and nights, perhaps, in the entire creation process, has not the entirely as desired place as before, but I can actually say that more than 700 days and nights, is the day that I work wholeheartedly.

Was old gradually, is not quite healthy, but whenever writes time, I am always enthusiastic. The sincere emotion of Yuhao to Wutong, from wanting to revenge for mother, to dispels the hatred along with the growth, although the thorn actually marches forward courageously. This is I must show to everybody, I always hope to write some energies the things. The justice is just, on this world can defeat all, only then love, the the love, men and women love and friend love of parents. This is in my heart holds to read, I also want to transmit to you, Tang Sect each brothers and sisters.

The conclusion of «Peerless Tang Sect», means the start of brand-new journey without a doubt. Our new book «Day Hot Main road» has uploaded comprehensively, and temporarily is clicks on the list first. «Day Hot Main road» is I especially has wanted to write, has formed in one's mind a very long work. This time, I must break through, writes has never written theme.

Got used to seeing the growth experience of pursuing a goal with determination, this time, I must make everybody has a look, what is invincible tall Shuaifu, this book has to be called tall Shuaifu to foster the plan. Inside has the much knowledge, is I quotes in the reality, believes that everybody looked, to some of your help. The different functions and machine armor and invincible class, the innumerable amusing things, will show to everybody in this work. We hope that you like.

As for a problem that the Douluo fans have cared about, now I can also answer everybody officially. Everybody has wanted to look, the related Douluo Continent God Realm story, I will write, will write a single issue specially, about 200,000 characters about, will meet with everybody next year. Story background after peerless Tang Sect, in the meantime, takes the upholstery for our future Douluo Continent third.

In this God Realm legend, everybody will see the familiar face, Tang San, Xiao Wu, Dai Yuhao and Tang Wutong, Ji Dong and Lie Yan, they will appear.

Believes that everybody looked at the peerless Tang Sect ending, very much wants certainly to know that actually the God Realm crisis is what, can Tang San lead the gods to melt? These, in the God Realm legend, 11 will reveal for everybody. We hope that you like.

Asked everybody to pay attention my **, I will inform everybody God Realm legend concrete publication time there and serialize the time. With day hot main road conflict, this after is not only a short article, this is a welfare of our Tang Sect.

Joins us ** the method is very simple, ** - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our Tang Sect family|home!

Wishes Tang Sect to be happier, wishes book friend peace and good health to be pleasant. I love you, exceeds to love itself. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-622-part-4
